Healthcare in Africa

The Threat of Climate Change, Natural Hazards and Their Effect on the Increase in Infectious Diseases































Authors and Affiliation:

A. D. Skali*,H.Filali**
*Healthcare Innovation Consultant, CEO TheTowerBrand & ex-COO Luci Health
** Service of clinical pharmacology, FMFC-CHU Ibn Rochd, university Hassan2


Before you begin reading I would like to share a sentence based on my understanding of the possible crisis, on the biological and healthcare front, we will be facing due to climate change.

We must never forget that the goal is not to eradicate all pathogens, or disease vectors. This is practically impossible due to the laws of evolution. What we should aim for is to reduce the risks associated with these pathogens. Everything is in an invisible state of equilibrium, and our goal is to get that equilibrium to be as beneficial for us as a species as possible.



About this book:
This book is intended solely as an introductory overview of the topic based on the extensive reading of various books and publications. It is essential to note that the primary purpose of this book is not profit-oriented. Rather, it aims to provide a concise and comprehensible introduction to the subject matter, thereby making it accessible to a wider audience, this is the reason why some concepts and ideas are repeated more than once, to further facilitate their understanding and show their relevance. This is a work of outreach, rather than a work to further the research in this topic.

The ideas presented within this book are a compilation of insights and knowledge gleaned from multiple sources, including but not limited to books and publications. It is crucial to emphasize that there is no claim of ownership over these ideas or concepts.

For readers seeking a more in-depth exploration of the subject matter, we highly recommend referring to the books listed in the reference section. These texts serve as valuable resources for those interested in delving deeper into the various ideas and concepts touched upon in this introductory work.


Opening introduction
Pr Houda Filali

Climate change can have significant impacts on safety, weather patterns, and food security, which in turn can affect population health and potentially lead to new problems, including the risk of new pandemics. Climate change can lead to more frequent and severe weather events such as hurricanes, floods, and wildfires, which pose immediate safety risks to communities. These events can result in injuries, displacement, and damage to infrastructure. Climate change alters weather patterns, leading to shifts in temperature and precipitation. This can disrupt ecosystems and agricultural cycles, affecting food production and water availability. Changes in weather patterns can lead to crop failures, reduced yields, and decreased food production. 

This can result in food shortages and increased food prices, impacting the nutritional well-being of populations. Climate change can exacerbate existing health issues and lead to new ones. For example, extreme heat events can cause heat-related illnesses, while changing precipitation patterns can lead to the spread of waterborne diseases like cholera. Climate change can influence the distribution of disease vectors (e.g., mosquitoes carrying diseases like Zika or malaria) and impact the habitats of wildlife that may carry zoonotic diseases. 

These changes can increase the risk of new pandemics emerging. As climate change unfolds, it can create a cascade of interconnected problems, such as displacement due to sea-level rise, resource conflicts, and strains on healthcare systems. These can have far-reaching consequences for society.

Addressing these challenges requires global cooperation to mitigate climate change, adapt to its impacts, and strengthen healthcare systems to respond to emerging health threats. Additionally, efforts to promote sustainability and resilience at the community level are crucial in the face of these interconnected challenges.

Certainly, promoting cooperation and collaboration between African countries and various categories of experts is crucial to address the unique challenges that Africa faces due to climate change and other pressing issues.



Table of Contents

Opening introduction	2
What is Human Security?	5
Measuring Human Security	7
Health Security and Development	8
Brief History of Public Health	10
Different Healthcare Approaches and The Concept of Universal Healthcare	14
The european healthcare system	14
The evolution of the WHO	20
What is a disease?	23
The Effects of Covid-19	26
List of Main Pathogens in Africa, both for Humans, Plants and Animals	29
Main human diseases	29
Main plant diseases	31
Main diseases affecting animals	34
Healthcare in Africa	36
The need for better healthcare	38
The case of malaria	41
The case of cholera	41
A different approach	42
Climate Change is Affecting more Things than we can Imagine	44
Economic Impact of Diseases	46
Why is it so hard to solve the problem?	49
The Effects of Climate Change in Africa	52
Lessons taken from previous epidemics	54
The Evolution of how we Understand Pathogens, a Brief History	57
The Twentieth Century	59
Our relationship with pathogens	62
Pathogen and Host Evolution	68
Phylogenetic Conservatism	70
Ecological Fitting	74
The Oscillation Hypothesis of Parasite-Host Interactions	76
Pathogen Evolution in a Changing Environment	86
What does the taxon pulse concept mean for emerging diseases?	90
The effect of human expansion on pathogen evolution	91
Understanding Natural Disasters	93
Disasters and public health	98
Disasters and Infectious Diseases	100
Main causes of disease outbreak after a natural disaster	103
Measures to reduce the damage	105
Reducing Vulnerability to Disease	106
Post-Disaster Response	106
Disaster Management in Japan	107
The Steps After the Red Queen Theory, Pathogen Host Evolution	109
Host pathogens and fitting space	116
Do Hosts Experience Fluctuations in Diversity?	117
Pathogen diversity	119
Understanding Climate Change	122
Impact of Deforestation on Diseases	124
Livestock and Disease Spread	125
Climate change and the evolution of pathogens	126
Evolutionary pressure never stops	127
A Pragmatic Approach: Preserve, Connect, and Allow Evolution to Flourish	128
Pathogens	129
Healthcare and new emerging diseases	129
Climate change and our current situation	132
The Effects of Climate Change in Africa	138
Effects of climate change in healthcare	138
How can we deal with the problem of arising infections caused by climate change?	142
Assessment and control of possible pathogens	144
Education and Cooperation Are Essential	147
Proposal recommendations « the 10 commandments »	150
A Plan for Dealing with Emerging Diseases	151
References	153



What is Human Security?
What is human security? Human security is a concept that helps us deal with important global problems. It's about protecting people's lives and making sure they can have a good life in the long run. It's also about giving people more freedom and keeping them safe from different things that can harm them. This idea focuses on cooperation and helping everyone, rather than just defending against threats.

Human security is a universal concept that applies everywhere, emphasizing prevention to avert problems, encompassing fair trade, quality healthcare, and education for all. It places people at its core, valuing their input in problem-solving and staying vigilant to address potential issues. Additionally, human security recognizes the interconnectedness of various life aspects, such as finances, health, and the environment. When one aspect falters, it can trigger a chain reaction of problems. This approach differs from traditional national security, which primarily aimed at safeguarding countries from military threats, as human security focuses on individual well-being and ensuring everyone has the necessary resources for a fulfilling life.

This helps us understand the problems that people face. Things like not having enough money, being in danger, getting sick, or not having access to healthcare and support can keep people stuck in poverty. These problems are all connected. For example, if we improve healthcare, it can reduce poverty and even prevent conflicts. But on the other hand, diseases can make people poorer and disrupt education.

In our interconnected world, problems in one place can affect others. When one part of the system breaks down, it can cause problems everywhere. This creates cycles of insecurity where things keep getting worse. Because these threats are all connected, we shouldn't prioritize one over the others. Problems can spread within a country and even to other countries and regions.

In this sense, the concepto of human security looks at two types of threats that people face: direct and indirect. 

Direct threats usually involve violence. They can be caused by groups like governments, terrorist organizations, rebels, or paramilitary groups. Sometimes, like in the case of the numerous military revolts in Myanmar, even a country's own government can threaten its people by violating their rights or using violence against them. Policies that exclude certain groups from society can also be a direct threat.

Indirect threats are different. They come from things like economic crises, poverty, disease, disasters, environmental damage, and underdevelopment. These threats are caused by actions or decisions made by groups or institutions, and they can harm human security indirectly. For example, policies related to mining or forestry might harm the environment, which can make it hard for a community to survive. Indirect threats can also happen when people or organizations fail to act and protect others. Dealing with indirect threats requires different strategies.  

Some human security threats are easy to see and measure, like poverty, unemployment, lack of access to healthcare, and education. These threats affect people's basic needs. Other threats are more difficult to measure because they involve how people feel. For example, feeling like you have no control over your life, low self-esteem, being excluded, or living in fear of crime are subjective threats. These threats are often related to people's sense of security.

Threats can also vary in how long they last. Some threats, like hunger, diseases, and poverty, are ongoing problems that can last a long time. Others, like natural disasters or sudden economic crises, happen suddenly and can cause a lot of disruption. Threats can also vary in how severe they are. Some threats can be life-threatening, while others may cause ongoing health problems.

In this sense, risks are different from threats. Risks depend on how likely it is that someone will be affected by a threat and how bad the consequences will be. 

People or communities are more at risk if they live in places where threats are common. For example, if you live in an area prone to landslides or flooding, you're more at risk from those threats. On the other hand, being resilient means you can handle threats better. In places where there isn't much support, short-term problems can lead to long-term economic and political issues. For example, a massive earthquake affected San Francisco, United States, differently than it did Haiti. In Haiti, the earthquake caused a lot of damage and led to a cholera outbreak and many deaths. In San Francisco, the earthquake caused damage, but due to the better response and healthcare system fewer people died.

Poverty and inequality don't always cause insecurity, but they make people more vulnerable to harm. Unfortunately, poor people are more exposed to threats and less able to deal with them. They have fewer options and less influence over how resources are distributed. For example, people who work outside the formal economy are more vulnerable. Lack of access to healthcare and nutrition makes it more likely to get sick and less able to recover. Poverty-related issues like malnutrition and healthcare support problems can cause more deaths than armed conflicts.

Measuring Human Security
Measuring human security is hard because it covers so many different problems. Some people think it should be measured broadly, including many issues, while others prefer a narrow focus.

The narrow approach looks at things like conflict and human rights abuses. It's more about protecting people from immediate dangers like war and violence. The broad approach, on the other hand, includes both immediate dangers and longer-term challenges to safety, well-being, and dignity. It covers both freedom from want and freedom from fear.

Different people have different views on how human security should be measured. Some focus on protecting people from direct dangers like war, while others want to address a wide range of problems. These different views have led to debates about what human security really means and how to measure it effectively.

Human security encompasses safeguarding people from a broad spectrum of threats, categorized into seven key areas. Economic security aims to shield individuals from poverty and joblessness, while food security ensures access to adequate nutrition, preventing hunger and famine. Personal security addresses physical threats like violence, crime, terrorism, domestic abuse, and child labor. Community security works towards averting conflicts rooted in ethnicity, religion, identity, and civil wars. 

Political security strives to protect people from political oppression and human rights violations. Environmental security involves mitigating pollution, resource depletion, natural disasters, and environmental damage, while health security focuses on defending against infectious diseases, unsafe food and water, and limited access to healthcare. 

To realize health security, essential healthcare, disease monitoring, health education, accurate information, and community-based knowledge are essential, while environmental security requires sustainable resource management, environmental preservation, biodiversity protection, and preparedness for natural disasters through early warning systems and protective measures.

A part of environmental security is disaster security, which aims to reduce vulnerabilities to natural hazards. These threats are interconnected,for example, civil conflict can worsen disease outbreaks, and poverty can lead to more environmental damage. These threats can create a cycle of insecurity.

However, human security has faced criticism for being too vague and including too many issues, making it challenging to focus on specific problems. Some argue that it dilutes important issues and lacks clear guidance for research. Additionally, there are debates about whether the focus should be solely on development to prevent conflict or whether development should be an aim on its own.

Critics also suggest that powerful states and organizations may use human security to intervene in weaker states, potentially serving their interests rather than helping the vulnerable. Development agencies have also adopted human security to secure funding by framing development concerns as security issues.

Methodologically, it's challenging to determine causality because threats can be both a cause and a consequence of various issues. Despite these criticisms, human security encourages us to rethink what security means and understand why people are vulnerable. It prompts us to explore the consequences of threats and whether security strategies truly resolve issues or create new ones. Traditional security approaches have often failed to address these vulnerabilities.

Health Security and Development 
The relationship between health and development has evolved over time. In the past, there was optimism that advances in medicine and science would eliminate infectious diseases. It was believed that as countries developed economically and technologically, they would naturally control diseases. This idea was known as Mortality Transition Theory.

Progress in healthcare did increase life expectancy worldwide, but it didn't consider challenges in unstable regions. In some places, life expectancy declined due to conflicts and the collapse of healthcare systems. The assumption that economic growth alone could solve health issues proved inadequate.

In 2000, the World Health Organization (WHO) emphasized the importance of infectious disease control in low-income countries. They argued that without addressing diseases, economic growth alone couldn't improve health. The WHO proposed that developed nations invest a small portion of their income in the health of poor countries to save lives, reduce poverty, and enhance global security.

Health security became a crucial aspect of human security, focusing on people's well-being and protection from threats. Global health gained prominence because the unnecessary loss of life was considered a significant insecurity. Health security recognizes that people's health is essential for overall security and that health programs are affected by conflicts and emergencies.

To achieve human security, cooperation across sectors and disciplines is necessary. Health security and disaster security involve various academic fields and international organizations. Although the definition of health security varies, it generally includes emerging diseases, global infectious diseases, conflicts, disasters, and environmental changes.

 

Brief History of Public Health

Public health has always been focused on disease prevention, an essential part of the broader field of medical science. This concept is deeply entwined with the history of humanity. As far back as recorded history goes, so too are there accounts of diseases that afflicted people. Throughout the ages, human understanding of diseases evolved. In ancient times, ailments were often attributed to divine will, destiny, or moral factors. People frequently associated diseases with malevolent intentions and resorted to practices like witchcraft and religious rituals for their treatment. 

The ancient Greek physician Hippocrates, often revered as the father of modern medicine, introduced a different perspective. He proposed the theory of "bodily humors," suggesting that the human body comprised four essential humors: blood, phlegm, yellow bile, and black bile. Hippocrates believed that an individual's health depended on the balance of these humors. Furthermore, he considered diseases as dynamic processes, arguing that physicians should focus on treating patients as a whole rather than merely addressing specific diseases. His revolutionary ideas challenged the prevailing beliefs that diseases were supernatural punishments. Instead, he emphasized considering individual characteristics, environmental factors, and lifestyle in the treatment process.

The discovery of pathogenic microorganisms marked a significant turning point in the understanding of diseases and their treatment. Girolamo Fracastoro, an Italian physician, introduced the concept of "spores of disease," proposing that diseases were caused by external factors (referred to as "spores") that could be transmitted directly or indirectly. This concept paved the way for understanding the contagious nature of diseases. Austrian physician M.A. Plenciz took this idea further by suggesting that diseases were caused by specific living entities and that each infectious disease was linked to a distinct type of microorganism.

In 1676, Antony van Leeuwenhoek, a Dutch scientist, invented a groundbreaking tool: the microscope. This invention allowed scientists to magnify objects up to 266 times their actual size. With this remarkable instrument, Leeuwenhoek made groundbreaking observations of tiny living organisms that were invisible to the naked eye. His discoveries provided compelling scientific evidence for the existence of these microorganisms, fundamentally altering our understanding of diseases.

During the Qing Dynasty in China, specifically during the reign of Emperor Qianlong (1736–1795), a poet named Shi Daonan documented numerous plague outbreaks. He attributed these outbreaks to rats and poignantly described the devastating consequences. His verses vividly depicted the grim reality of those times, with countless deaths, eerie atmospheres, and desolation. Amid this suffering, he expressed his hopes for divine intervention to restore life and end the plague's scourge.

In ancient times, there was a book called the "Compendium of Materia Medica" written during the Ming Dynasty by Li Shizhen. In this book, it was mentioned that people who exposed their clothes to steam didn't get sick. This is basically talking about a way to kill germs. Historical records tell us that during the rule of Emperor Longqing in the Ming Dynasty, which was a long time ago, around the late 1500s, people were already using a method called inoculation to protect themselves from smallpox. This method later spread to countries like Russia, Korea, Japan, Turkey, and England.

So, when we look at all this, we can understand that public health has its roots in how societies have evolved over time and the progress we've made in science. It's both a science and an art that humans have developed over a long time to fight against diseases. The World Health Organization, or WHO, says in its rules that health isn't just about not being sick; it's about having a body that's in good physical, mental, and social shape. Nowadays, what people want from public health is not only to prevent and control diseases but also to make everyone healthier overall.

As societies became more civilized, they realized the importance of preventing and controlling infectious diseases. People began to carefully study the health of individuals and the whole population. For instance, in the 17th century, a man named John Graunt looked at how people were dying and noticed certain patterns. In the 18th century, Pierre Charles Alexandre Louis and William Farr came up with important ideas for studying diseases and started using numbers and statistics to understand public health better. 

Then, in 1796, Edward Jenner developed a way to protect against smallpox through a process called inoculation, which is like a primitive form of vaccination. This was a big step in preventing infectious diseases. In the mid-1800s, a man named John Snow studied and controlled a cholera outbreak in London. He figured out how to track and manage diseases in communities, which became an important part of epidemiology.

Around the same time, advancements in science, like physics, chemistry, and biology, as well as better ways to measure things, helped us understand how the natural world and our health are connected. For example, Bernardino Ramazzini first talked about diseases caused by things like breathing in dust from rocks or being exposed to lead. 

Claude Bernard studied how carbon monoxide can harm us, which was a key part of figuring out how chemicals can affect our health at work. People also learned more about the chemistry of food and how it affects our bodies, which led to the basics of nutrition science. And knowledge about dangerous things in workplaces led to the start of occupational health and medicine. In the 19th century, Louis Pasteur came up with the idea that tiny germs cause diseases, which was a big deal.

By the late 19th century and early 20th century, we had made big progress in fighting dangerous infectious diseases like smallpox, cholera, plague, and diphtheria. We also got better at looking after our environment, taking care of workers, understanding what we eat, and making sure moms, kids, and young people are healthy. All these improvements helped us develop a set of ideas about public health and how to prevent health problems in whole populations. Governments started to take responsibility for giving healthcare to everyone and using the latest technology to keep people healthy.

In the mid-20th century, public health branched into various fields. Epidemiology emerged, delving into how diseases spread and impacted people's well-being. Its scope encompassed not only infectious diseases but also a wide range of health concerns. Another field, toxicology, established safety standards and investigated how environmental elements like chemicals could jeopardize our health. 

Environmental medicine shed light on how our surroundings, such as pollution, could lead to long-term health issues. The study of how our behaviors influence our health laid the foundation for health education and promotion. Social medicine examined the intricate relationship between our health and the broader social context, considering factors at both macro and micro levels. Furthermore, economics, public policy, and management became intertwined with public health, shaping health economics, health policy, and health management.

In the 1930s and 1940s, forward-thinking individuals like Dr. Chen Zhiqian in China and the World Health Organization (WHO) initiated a paradigm shift in health thinking. They transitioned from merely treating diseases to actively preventing them through lifestyle and behavior modifications. 

In North America, the concept of "preventive medicine" gained prominence, introducing the notion of the "three-level prevention of disease." This approach prioritized halting diseases before they manifested. Public health experts recognized the profound connection between our health and our social environment and the policies in place. They introduced the ecological model, illuminating how everything around us impacts our health. 

The Ottawa Charter for Health Promotion in 1986 emphasized governments' role in health, stressing community development and citizen involvement. This marked the onset of the "Modern Public Health Age," characterized by disease prevention throughout life to ensure universal well-being.

Advances in technology significantly bolstered our ability to study and comprehend public health. Cutting-edge chemical analysis techniques enable the detection and measurement of minute amounts of harmful substances. In microbiology, the focus shifted from merely disease-causing microorganisms to studying their life processes, reproduction, and interactions with our bodies. 

Molecular biology, dealing with life's fundamental building blocks, revolutionized public health research. Statistics, computing, and information technology empowered the creation of intricate mathematical models for public health analysis. Tools like geographic information systems (GIS) aid in large-scale health trend analysis. Vast databases provide abundant information, from the smallest biological details to entire ecosystems.

Public health is a rapidly expanding field that has made significant strides. However, contemporary challenges like shifting lifestyles, climate change, emerging diseases, chemical exposure, altered food production methods, pollution, global mobility, and rapidly spreading diseases require an even broader approach. Public health is integrating more fields and technologies, delving deeper into intricate details while gathering unprecedented volumes of data. Public health and preventive medicine are venturing into new frontiers to confront these challenges proactively.
Different Healthcare Approaches and The Concept of Universal Healthcare

The european healthcare system
Healthcare systems in the European Union (EU) are shaped by a range of factors, including history, culture, and funding models. While these systems are diverse, they share the common goal of addressing the health needs of their populations. 

Every healthcare system's primary objective is to meet the health needs of its population. The effectiveness of these systems depends on available resources. Ultimately, the goal is to improve or at least maintain the health of the population. European healthcare systems are influenced by each country's unique history and culture, but several common models differ in funding, organization, and efficiency. This chapter explores these models, healthcare spending, the role of private health insurance, and patient perspectives.

Ensuring equal access to healthcare services is a fundamental right. Healthcare policies aim to achieve this through regulatory systems that consider financial and structural needs and uphold bioethical principles, including equal access, consistent quality, and equitable resource allocation. Healthcare, in contrast to health protection, involves healthcare facilities and services dedicated to enhancing health through disease prevention, early detection, treatment, and rehabilitation.

European societies prioritize accessible healthcare for all, regardless of income. Limited resources necessitate efficient tools, including different organizational forms, financing sources, and payment methods. Various healthcare models exist in Europe, with financing and organizational forms shaping each country's unique system. These models include Bismarck's insurance-based model, Beveridge's supply-based model, the Residual model, and Siemaszko's model (less common).

These models serve as templates adaptable to each country's context. Healthcare financing and organization reflect national traditions and translate into distinct objectives, such as equity and efficiency. Financing healthcare systems involves transferring money from the population to service providers, typically through third-party payment mechanisms. This approach reflects a consensus that healthcare should not rely solely on a free market.

In 1948, after World War II, the United Kingdom introduced a healthcare system known as the Beveridge model, named after Lord William Beveridge. This model is about providing healthcare services to all citizens, ensuring social security, and it's funded by general taxes. The government oversees healthcare services, and they are free of charge. Hospitals get their funds mainly from the central budget, and there are also optional extra insurance options for better care.

Another model limits the government's role in providing healthcare. Here, people pay voluntary premiums, and the private sector plays a significant role. Public health is separate from individual healthcare, and funding comes from private insurance or direct payments. The public sector only covers individuals in special need, like the very poor or elderly.

In Central and Eastern Europe, there was a model called Siemaszko/Semashko's model, which was based on tax-funded healthcare services, providing free and comprehensive care to everyone, with the state having a monopoly on healthcare. However, this model is now considered outdated, and these countries are moving towards insurance-based systems.

The Semashko model is a type of healthcare system where healthcare services are provided to everyone for free. Unlike the Beveridge model, which funds national healthcare through special taxes, the Semashko model gets its funding from the national budget. It's named after Nikolai Semashko, who was in charge of healthcare in the Soviet Union. This model is still used in Russia and many other countries that were once part of the Soviet Union.

In this model, the government is in charge of healthcare, and medical services are provided by a network of government institutions overseen by the Ministry of Healthcare. These services are free and equal for all citizens, with a focus on preventing diseases. The model includes government-owned medical facilities and healthcare workers who are salaried by the state. Private medical practices are not allowed, and all doctors work for the government.

In the past, the entire country was divided into districts, each with its outpatient hospitals and local doctors. These doctors were trained to handle most common illnesses, and more complex cases were referred to regional hospitals.

A unique aspect of this model is the "method of dynamic dispensary surveillance," which involves closely monitoring and planning the treatment of serious diseases.

The Beveridge model is a healthcare system where the government provides healthcare to all its citizens using income taxes. This model was first set up in the United Kingdom in 1948 by William Beveridge. In this system, most hospitals and clinics are owned by the government, and some doctors and healthcare workers are government employees. There are also private institutions that get paid by the government. With the government as the only payer, it reduces competition in healthcare, which helps keep costs lower. Using income taxes to fund healthcare means that services are free when you use them, and your taxes cover your healthcare expenses.

This model sees healthcare as a basic right, so everyone who is a citizen gets coverage and access to healthcare. Many countries use variations of the Beveridge model along with other healthcare approaches. Most of these countries have a universal healthcare system, which means that all residents can access healthcare.

The Beveridge model was created by William Beveridge, a British economist and social reformer. His ideas led to the creation of the National Health Service (NHS) in the UK in 1948. Since then, this model has been adopted in many parts of Northern Europe and the world.

Nowadays EU member states have different ways of sharing the costs of healthcare. Some countries ask patients to pay for some of the healthcare services, like prescribed medicines or specialist doctors, through co-payments, which can be flat fees or a percentage of the cost. Most countries have a way to exempt low-income and disadvantaged groups from these costs. There's also a system called co-insurance, where patients pay a set portion of all healthcare services. In some countries, insurance funds manage both compulsory and voluntary insurance, collecting money from people's income and covering healthcare costs either when services are used or by repaying later.

Many countries use tax-based systems where a central public institution provides healthcare services. But having government funding doesn't mean everything is owned by the government or that all healthcare workers are government employees. In some places like Greece and Portugal, most doctors working outside of hospitals are government employees. Payment systems for healthcare providers can include fee-for-service (paying fixed charges for services) or capitation (fixed payment per person). Some countries are also experimenting with paying based on diagnoses or achieved medical outcomes.

The healthcare sector is a significant part of the EU's economy, accounting for a large portion of the workforce and GDP. However, the rising costs of healthcare and the effects of the economic crisis have raised questions about its financial sustainability. Public expenditure on healthcare is a significant part of government budgets, making up about 15% of all government spending in 2010. This spending is expected to increase in the future due to factors like population size, health status, and technological progress. The share of GDP allocated to health spending varies among countries, with the Netherlands, France, and Germany allocating the highest percentages and Romania and Turkey the lowest. It's important to consider both the health spending to GDP ratio and health spending per capita to understand the level of health spending.

The other side, the concept of Universal Health Coverage
Universal healthcare is often seen as a new idea, focused solely on medical care. And some argue it should strictly control access to hospitals and concentrate on what the healthcare system can directly provide.

The World Health Organization (WHO) once emphasized the importance of comprehensive primary healthcare (CPHC). They viewed universal health coverage (UHC) as an extension of CPHC, making certain primary healthcare features more accessible. This shift, however, was driven by the World Bank, which has a significant role in global healthcare funding.

Universal Health Coverage is a healthcare system that aims to provide all individuals and communities with access to essential health services without suffering financial hardship. In essence, it ensures that everyone can obtain the healthcare they need when they need it, regardless of their ability to pay. UHC encompasses a broad range of healthcare services, from preventive to curative, and includes services related to health promotion, disease prevention, treatment, rehabilitation, and palliative care. The primary objective of UHC is to achieve equity in healthcare access and financial protection, making healthcare a fundamental human right.

Comprehensive Primary Healthcare, on the other hand, is a holistic approach to healthcare that focuses on providing essential health services at the first point of contact within the healthcare system. CPHC emphasizes the importance of primary care as the cornerstone of healthcare delivery. It includes a wide range of healthcare services such as health promotion, disease prevention, diagnosis, treatment, and coordination of care. Moreover, CPHC places a strong emphasis on community involvement, addressing the social determinants of health, and ensuring the continuity and coordination of care across different levels of the healthcare system.

The key difference between UHC and CPHC lies in their scope and focus. UHC is a broader concept that primarily deals with ensuring that everyone has access to healthcare services without financial barriers. It encompasses not only primary care but also specialized and hospital-based services. In contrast, CPHC is a specific approach that centers on the provision of comprehensive and integrated primary healthcare services. It emphasizes the importance of preventive and basic care delivered at the community level.

Another distinction is that UHC is a goal or objective for healthcare systems on a national or global scale. It sets a target for governments and policymakers to work toward achieving universal access to healthcare. CPHC, on the other hand, is an approach to healthcare delivery that can be implemented within the framework of UHC. It provides a strategy for organizing and delivering healthcare services, with primary care as its core component.

While the WHO recognizes that welfare and development are crucial for health, it has prioritized medical factors like timely access to health services. This has allowed governments to step back from their commitment to provide free CPHC to everyone. The idea that health services depend on welfare and overall development, as stated in the Alma Ata Declaration, was abandoned, and the private sector was introduced for efficiency.

The use of the terms "primary healthcare" and "UHC" can be confusing. It may give the impression that the government is still responsible for providing these services.
In India, for example, the Draft National Health Bill 2009 aimed to ensure access (coverage) rather than comprehensive care at all levels of public sector services. It focused more on clinical coverage through public and private institutions and defined "affordability" as an individual's ability to pay.

This shift is a departure from the constitutional understanding that health should eventually become a fundamental right. The specifics of UHC differed from the original concept of primary healthcare, which covered more than just clinical care and included support from secondary and tertiary care.

The shift from "care" to "coverage" reflects changes in global health priorities and the influence of organizations like the WHO and the World Bank. This transition also highlights the complexities of healthcare systems and the impact of inequality on healthcare policies.

In Western countries during the 18th and early 19th centuries, healthcare was either given by charitable organizations or paid for by individuals. Later on, in the late 19th and early 20th centuries, other ways of payment emerged, like mutual benefit societies and limited national or private insurance for certain groups. There were also efforts to prevent diseases and destitution through measures like isolation, institutionalization, and sanitation rules.

The Second World War brought together these fragmented healthcare providers in Britain and led to the creation of the national health services (NHS). In contrast, Germany and France adopted insurance-based healthcare systems. France had a strong private sector influence, while Canada leaned towards state-led systems. Later Germany moved away from compulsory insurance due to conflicts between insurance organizations and doctors, and this conflict was resolved with the introduction of the social security system.

Most developed countries, during their industrial revolutions, established strong welfare systems that included healthcare. After World War II, these services were further expanded through state interventions, supported by economic growth and wealth from colonies. 

The importance of socioeconomic development in improving health was not fully recognized at that time. Instead, medical interventions and technology were given credit for better health.

Canada, despite its economic integration with the USA, embraced universal healthcare, while the USA resisted it due to concerns about socialism and high costs. In Europe, social contracts and state commitments to equity and infrastructure allowed for the emergence of universal healthcare. However, health services often remained separate from welfare planning.

In developed countries, healthcare became more corporate, focusing on cost containment through administrative controls. This shift reduced the autonomy of healthcare practitioners and favored administrative and bureaucratic controls. These changes led to the rise of health maintenance organizations (HMOs), which increased healthcare costs and favored private insurance systems and the pharmaceutical industry.

This trend also created the industrial-medical complex, which aimed to capture medical markets in developing countries but didn't prioritize universal healthcare for these nations. In the USA, efforts to expand state insurance faced strong opposition in Congress, resulting in the Affordable Care Act being re-framed and passed as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.

The World Health Organization (WHO) had a different job when it started in 1948. Its main role was to keep an eye on global disease outbreaks and help countries work together to control diseases that could spread across borders. Later on, it began training healthcare workers in less developed countries.

At that time, big supporters of WHO liked the idea of using advanced technology to fight diseases like malaria and smallpox. This approach appealed to the United States from 1958 to 1968 because it promoted modernization and allowed global tech companies to grow. Despite this, WHO gained respect for successfully eradicating smallpox in developing countries from 1968 to 1978.

As more countries gained independence from colonial rule and joined organizations like the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD), they started demanding fair trade and more investment in development. Within WHO, there was a long debate about how to improve health. Some wanted to focus on technology, while others believed in improving people's living conditions.

In 1978, the Alma Ata Declaration on Comprehensive Primary Healthcare (CPHC) was passed, emphasizing socio-economic development for better health. However, a year later, the Rockefeller Foundation organized a conference promoting selective healthcare over CPHC. During the 1970s, the World Bank also began to see the value of investing in health projects.

By 1982, the World Health Assembly froze WHO's budget, and in 1985, the World Bank reduced its funding, showing its disapproval of WHO's Essential Drug Policy. The World Bank had a growing influence on WHO because WHO relied heavily on external funding, much of which came from the World Bank.

By 1990, the World Bank controlled over half of WHO's budget, and this financial dependence limited WHO's actions. The World Bank started pushing for privatization of healthcare and reducing investments in the public sector. This financial pressure led WHO to partner with major stakeholders for global health.

These partnerships included drug companies, private financial institutions, NGOs, the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, and UN organizations. They set the agenda for WHO, focusing on technological solutions like universal immunizations and fighting diseases like HIV, AIDS, tuberculosis, and malaria.
Despite the influence of these partners, WHO endorsed universal health coverage (UHC) in 2005. In 2009, donors pledged billions to support UHC. The idea behind UHC was to use international resources to finance healthcare systems and provide health services for countries with lower GDPs.

However, this approach didn't necessarily reduce costs for users, and private insurance only covered a small portion of the population. By 2011, despite various insurance programs, many people still couldn't afford healthcare.
The transition from the WHO's original goal of comprehensive primary healthcare to universal health coverage was influenced by its financiers and resulted in a shift from assistance and cooperation to control and market penetration in the global health landscape.

In the 1970s, when the global capitalist system faced its second economic crisis, competition among developed countries changed into cooperation led by their global financial institutions. These institutions offered financial aid and loans at lower rates than the global market, but in return, they required countries to make structural changes to their economies and healthcare systems.

Many less developed countries accepted these changes, while developed nations implemented some austerity measures affecting employment and wages but still heavily invested in their welfare systems. However, even these developed countries underwent significant changes in their healthcare systems, like the NHS in Britain. In contrast, the USA, while protecting its healthcare investments, managed to expand its national insurance coverage despite resistance from private interests.

The private sector, particularly in developed nations, began demanding more involvement and financial coverage as partners in universal health coverage (UHC) programs. European countries, the USA, and Australia continued to invest a significant portion of their national income in healthcare.

After the collapse of the USSR and the end of the Cold War, opposition to healthcare sector reforms weakened. International financial institutions started influencing the direction of peripheral economies through conditional loans, leading many countries to limit their welfare sectors and open them to global markets.

The World Bank's shift from focusing on wealth to well-being under Robert McNamara created a foundation for the UHC strategy. Originally, comprehensive primary healthcare (CPHC) aimed to meet community health needs through affordable primary-level care, fully supported by higher levels of healthcare and state funding. 

However, this concept transformed into selective primary healthcare (SPHC) in the 1980s, emphasizing technology over social aspects of public health.
In the 1990s, terms like "social security net," "international standards," and, later, the "information society" were introduced for middle-class consumption. In 2000, the United Nations (UN) announced the Millennium Development Goals (MDGs), including a focus on health. These MDGs were eventually replaced by the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs), with a renewed commitment to partnerships but with little reflection on the MDGs' failures.

Under the guise of global partnerships for development, several commitments were made to pool resources for the benefit of the world's poor. This approach emphasized market strategies and turned healthcare services into commodities, favoring technological interventions, privatization, and insurance systems. The goal was to deepen the connections between public and private sectors and shift funding to private players for technological interventions.




What is a disease?
This may not seem like a relevant question, but sometimes taking a moment to make sure that we are on the same page is essential, especially when treating complex subjects. 

The simplest definition of a disease would be, a condition that makes the body not work well. An infectious disease is one caused by germs that can spread from person to person, directly or indirectly. Germs, also called microbes, are tiny things everywhere. Most are harmless, but some can make you sick. Germs spread when you touch someone who is sick or through their saliva, blood, or when they cough or sneeze, among others. Germs can also be on things you touch. Insects or animals can carry germs, and so can dirty water, food, soil, or plants.

There are four main types of germs: bacteria, fungi, parasites, and viruses. Bacteria are one-celled microbes that give off toxins and can cause illnesses like strep throat or urinary tract infections. Fungi are simple organisms, including things like mushrooms and yeasts. Athlete's foot is a common fungal infection. Parasites are usually incapable of living on their own at least in one of the different steps in their vital cycle. Protozoa and worms are examples of parasites. Malaria is caused by a protozoan parasite. Lastly, viruses are tiny “capsules” that invade cells, multiply, and make people sick. HIV/AIDS and the common cold are caused by viruses.

Germs cause infections by getting into our body through the skin or inner surfaces like our lungs or stomach. Our body tries to fight them with its defense system, but sometimes the germs win, and we get sick. If our immune system can't stop the germs, we get an infectious disease. Some diseases make germs release harmful things that can damage our body. These diseases can spread to other organs or systems. Sometimes, our immune system fights so hard that it hurts us, called immunopathology.  

Germs vary in how harmful they are, how easily they spread between people, and how long it takes to get sick after being infected. Epidemiologists study how infectious germs are. They use a number called R0 to measure it. For example, COVID-19 had an R0 of 2.5 at first, meaning one infected person could infect 2.5 others. By July 2020, it was as high as 5.7. New variants may spread even faster. In contrast, SARS had an R0 of 3.5, while measles was one of the most contagious diseases with an R0 of 16. This number helps scientists understand how diseases spread.

There are two main types of disease threats to human security: endemic diseases that are always around, and epidemic and pandemic diseases that are sudden and widespread. Endemic diseases are often overlooked, while epidemics and pandemics have been a concern for a long time.

An epidemic is when a disease affects many people in a community or region more than expected, and it can happen at an unusual time. A pandemic is an epidemic that spreads to many countries and continents. Both epidemics and pandemics often involve new diseases or variants with little immunity in the population. They can spread quickly and have a high rate of people getting sick and dying.

Endemic diseases are constant in a specific group of people or area and don't usually spread to other places. For example, malaria is endemic in parts of Asia and Africa. HIV/AIDS is a pandemic, but it has also become endemic in Africa. An outbreak happens when there are more cases than expected or when a new area is affected. If it's not controlled, it can turn into an epidemic. For instance, dengue fever outbreaks have happened in Hawaii, but they were controlled and didn't spread to other parts of the US or the world. An outbreak is considered "out of control" when each sick person infects two others.

Before the 19th century, people's life expectancy was only 29 years, primarily due to diseases and infections during childbirth and wounds. Infectious diseases caused most premature deaths until the late 20th century when non-communicable diseases took over. Improvements in sanitation, vaccines, and antibiotics greatly increased life expectancy, reducing death rates from infectious diseases by 0.8% annually throughout the last century.

While we've made impressive strides in treating bacterial infections, there are limited antiviral drugs for emerging viral infections, and up to this day smallpox seemed like the only disease completely eradicated through vaccination, although now we can see some new cases in war zones. 

The key to controlling infectious diseases is breaking the chain of transmission, which is challenging and requires strong coordination and state capacity. However, there has been substantial progress in reducing mortality rates from infectious diseases. From 2000 to 2010, deaths from HIV/AIDS, TB, and malaria fell by 46%, 36%, and 35%, respectively, in low-income countries, and this trend continued from 2010 to 2020.

Despite declines in deaths from major diseases, the number of disease outbreaks has increased significantly since 1980. Emerging and re-emerging diseases (ERD) are infectious diseases that are on the rise. The WHO focuses on researching the emergence and re-emergence of diseases.

There are at least 30 infectious diseases known to be re-emerging or spreading globally. Tuberculosis, in particular, is making a comeback, with nearly one-third of the world's population having latent TB infections. Additionally, outbreaks of cholera, anthrax, yellow fever, dengue fever, chikungunya, typhoid, West Nile virus, artemisinin-resistant malaria, and plague have occurred.

In 2015, the WHO gathered scientists and health experts to prioritize emerging disease pathogens with epidemic or pandemic potential. They identified seven diseases as top priorities: Crimean-Congo hemorrhagic fever, Filovirus diseases (Ebola and Marburg), highly pathogenic emerging Coronaviruses (MERS and SARS), Lassa fever, Nipah virus, Rift Valley Fever, and an unknown "new disease" requiring urgent attention. Three other diseases, chikungunya, Severe Fever with Thrombocytopenia Syndrome, and Zika, were also considered important. Diseases like tuberculosis, malaria, avian influenza, and dengue were excluded because they already receive substantial funding.

Pathogens can be more deadly than guns, bombs, or even weapons of mass destruction. Among pathogens, viruses stand out because of their potential to cause pandemics, which pose a significant risk to human security. Before the Covid-19 pandemic, experts believed that influenza was the most likely virus to trigger a pandemic.

Influenza viruses are particularly concerning because they constantly mutate, making it challenging to eliminate them through vaccines. In contrast, diseases caused by viruses like measles, mumps, and smallpox have been controlled or eliminated due to their genetic stability, making vaccines effective. Coronaviruses, including those responsible for SARS and Covid-19, share this genetic instability, making them dangerous and potentially resistant to drugs and vaccines.

As Covid-19 continues to produce new, more infectious variants, there is growing concern that vaccines may struggle to keep up.

Predicting pandemic risk involves two factors: the likelihood of a new infectious or re-emerging disease emerging (spark risk) and how easily it can spread through human populations (spread risk). The probability of a severe influenza pandemic, causing around 600,000 deaths worldwide, is about 3% in any given year. For a pandemic with a higher case fatality rate, causing approximately 6 million deaths, the probability is 1%. A pandemic as deadly as the 1918 flu has a probability of less than 0.02%.

Pandemics can overwhelm healthcare systems, leading to more deaths from other diseases due to healthcare shortages. This has a severe impact on developing countries with less prepared healthcare systems.

Endemic diseases, which persist in specific regions, also impose significant costs on many countries worldwide. Most of these countries, mainly in the developing world, lack adequate support to combat diseases that don't easily spread, like neglected tropical diseases. The significance of infectious diseases as a human security issue gained attention during the AIDS crisis in the 1980s, primarily due to concerns about the virus causing instability in African states. While HIV/AIDS has had a devastating impact, there are other endemic diseases with high morbidity and mortality rates that deserve more attention, such as diarrheal diseases.
The Effects of Covid-19
In 2020, a major event occurred when the World Health Organization declared a pandemic called Covid-19. This pandemic affected countries globally, leading to tough decisions by governments. It caused flight cancellations, economic challenges, complete global shut-down and overwhelmed hospitals. The virus didn't care about borders and it impacted people from various backgrounds in the same way.

The media and governments shared many suggestions on dealing with the pandemic's symptoms but often ignored its root causes. These include unrestricted development, changes in food production, encroachment into natural habitats, and ongoing civil conflicts. Instead, much attention focused on developing vaccines, which is impressive but doesn't address the underlying issues like environmental destruction, poverty, and inequality.

In 2020, the world was introduced to Covid-19, a new virus that has raised many questions. Covid-19 is termed a novel virus because it had not been previously seen in humans. It typically shows symptoms like fever, body aches, a persistent cough, and loss of smell. Bats are believed to be its primary reservoir, but pangolins may have played a role as an intermediate host.  

Covid-19 is highly contagious and primarily spreads through airborne aerosols. What complicates matters is that many infected individuals, estimated at 20-40%, show no symptoms. Both asymptomatic and pre-symptomatic individuals can transmit the virus, but the extent of their contagiousness remains uncertain.

The virus has disproportionately affected the elderly and those with underlying health conditions, but it has also caused long-term health issues in young and previously healthy individuals. Some speculate that exposure to a high viral load might contribute to severe cases, but this theory lacks solid confirmation. Additionally, the long-term effects on "long-haulers" are still not fully understood.

Governments failed to prioritize health security despite warnings from organizations like the World Health Organization. Pandemics and epidemics gain political attention during outbreaks but fade afterward. The Covid-19 pandemic highlighted the political and economic consequences of infectious disease outbreaks, but it's uncertain if this will lead to a different approach to health security.

Borders are irrelevant when it comes to health threats, and vaccine nationalism may hinder global health security. While some countries have vaccine advantages, many others lack production capabilities, raising concerns about equitable access and the emergence of new variants.

Climate-related disasters like droughts, wildfires, storms, and floods are increasing, with the Global South bearing the brunt. Take Bangladesh, for instance, one of the world's most climate-vulnerable nations, frequently grappling with storms and flooding. Cyclone Bulbul, a relatively modest Category 3 storm, struck its coast in November 2019. Though it resulted in a relatively low death toll, the loss of over 72,000 metric tons of crops valued at $31 billion exacerbated the country's existing food insecurity. 

Furthermore, climate change in Bangladesh, coupled with the constant threat of storms, leads to a surge in eco-refugees and internally displaced persons (IDPs), intensifying pressure on already overcrowded urban centers. While it may appear that massive storms in Bangladesh have limited global repercussions, the interconnected nature of our world challenges such a narrow viewpoint. 

These disasters have far-reaching consequences, including food insecurity, displacement, and global instability. Addressing climate change is essential to prevent further crises.

Disasters are a big problem, but they often get less attention than they should. They mess up how society normally works and make it hard to cope. Disasters can also push vulnerable groups deeper into poverty, creating traps where it's tough to escape from being poor. On top of poverty, disasters can lead to other problems, like diseases that spread and create complex emergencies. It's strange that even though disasters happen so often, we mostly focus on getting ready to respond after they've already hit instead of preventing them. We should be thinking about long-term solutions like addressing climate change and short-term strategies like reducing disaster risks.

You might think that public health issues don't relate to political science, but the Covid-19 crisis has shown us how interconnected these challenges are with various fields like development studies, disaster studies, environmental studies, humanitarian studies, human rights, public health, and public policy. The global response to this crisis highlights the importance of interdisciplinary approaches to understanding the problems and threats we face as a global community.

The Covid-19 pandemic showed that regardless of a country's wealth and power, diseases can cause significant damage. However, most infectious diseases and disasters have a much more severe impact on developing countries. We need to understand why this is the case by examining the challenges these countries face. 



List of Main Pathogens in Africa, both for Humans, Plants and Animals

Main human diseases
1. Malaria Parasite (Plasmodium spp.):
   - Main Characteristic: Malaria is caused by several species of Plasmodium parasites and is transmitted through the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. It primarily infects red blood cells, leading to symptoms such as fever, chills, and anemia.Malaria continues to be a major cause of death in Africa, with hundreds of thousands to over a million deaths annually, primarily affecting young children.
   - Area of Influence: Malaria is widespread throughout sub-Saharan Africa, with high transmission rates in regions with suitable mosquito breeding habitats.

2. HIV/AIDS (Human Immunodeficiency Virus/Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome):
   - Main Characteristic: HIV weakens the immune system by attacking CD4 cells, making individuals susceptible to various infections and cancers. AIDS is the advanced stage of HIV infection. HIV/AIDS has claimed millions of lives in Africa since the epidemic began. In recent years, the annual death toll has decreased due to improved access to antiretroviral therapy, but it still remains a significant health challenge.
   - Area of Influence: Sub-Saharan Africa has the highest prevalence of HIV/AIDS globally, with Southern and Eastern Africa being the most affected regions.

3. Tuberculosis (Mycobacterium tuberculosis):
   - Main Characteristic: Tuberculosis primarily affects the lungs and can lead to symptoms such as persistent cough, weight loss, and fatigue. It is transmitted through the air when an infected person coughs or sneezes. Tuberculosis is a leading cause of death in Africa, with hundreds of thousands of deaths annually.
   - Area of Influence: Tuberculosis is widespread in Africa, with high burdens in countries like South Africa, Nigeria, and Kenya.

4. Ebola Virus:
   - Main Characteristic: Ebola causes a severe and often fatal hemorrhagic fever, with symptoms including fever, vomiting, diarrhea, and internal bleeding. It is transmitted through contact with infected bodily fluids. Ebola outbreaks have resulted in thousands of deaths during major outbreaks, but the number of annual deaths varies widely depending on outbreak occurrence.
   - Area of Influence: Ebola outbreaks have occurred in several Central and West African countries, including the Democratic Republic of Congo, Guinea, Sierra Leone, and Liberia.

5. Yellow Fever Virus:
   - Main Characteristic: Yellow fever can cause fever, jaundice, and bleeding. It is transmitted by Aedes mosquitoes. Yellow fever outbreaks can lead to a significant number of deaths in affected regions during outbreaks, but annual deaths may be lower in non-outbreak years.
   - Area of Influence: Yellow fever outbreaks can occur in parts of West and Central Africa.

6. Cholera (Vibrio cholerae):
   - Main Characteristic: Cholera causes severe diarrhea and dehydration. It is primarily transmitted through contaminated water and food. Cholera outbreaks can lead to thousands of deaths in affected areas during outbreaks, but the annual death toll can vary.
   - Area of Influence: Cholera outbreaks are common in areas with poor sanitation and access to clean water, including parts of Africa.

7. Lassa Fever Virus:
   - Main Characteristic: Lassa fever is an acute viral hemorrhagic fever. It is transmitted through contact with infected rodents or their excreta.Lassa fever can lead to deaths, but the annual number of deaths may not be as high as some other diseases on this list.
   - Area of Influence: Lassa fever is mainly found in West African countries, including Nigeria, Sierra Leone, and Guinea.

8. Trypanosoma brucei (African Trypanosomiasis or Sleeping Sickness):
   - Main Characteristic: Trypanosomiasis causes fever, neurological symptoms, and sleep disturbances. It is transmitted by tsetse flies.
   - Area of Influence: Sleeping sickness is endemic in some parts of sub-Saharan Africa, particularly in regions where tsetse flies are prevalent.

9. Schistosomiasis (Schistosoma spp.):
   - Main Characteristic: Schistosomiasis is a parasitic disease that affects the urinary and intestinal systems. It is acquired through contact with freshwater contaminated by infected snails. Sleeping sickness leads to deaths, but the numbers may not be as high as some other diseases.
   - Area of Influence: Schistosomiasis is prevalent in many freshwater areas across sub-Saharan Africa.

10. River Blindness (Onchocerca volvulus):
   - Main Characteristic: River blindness is caused by a parasitic worm transmitted through the bite of infected black flies. It can lead to skin lesions and vision impairment, including blindness. River blindness can cause significant morbidity and vision impairment but may not always result in deaths.
   - Area of Influence: River blindness is endemic in parts of West and Central Africa.

11. Buruli Ulcer (Mycobacterium ulcerans):
   - Main Characteristic: Buruli ulcer is a skin disease that causes open sores and ulcers. It is believed to be transmitted through contact with contaminated water or soil. Buruli ulcer is not typically fatal, but it can lead to disability and long-term health effects.
   - Area of Influence: Buruli ulcer has been reported in several West and Central African countries.

12. Rift Valley Fever Virus:
   - Main Characteristic: Rift Valley fever can cause fever, severe illness in animals, and in humans, symptoms ranging from mild flu-like illness to severe hemorrhagic fever. It is transmitted through the bite of infected mosquitoes.  Rift Valley fever can lead to deaths during outbreaks, but annual numbers may vary.
   - Area of Influence: Rift Valley fever outbreaks have occurred in parts of East and North Africa.

13. Dengue Virus:
   - Main Characteristic: Dengue fever causes flu-like symptoms, including high fever and severe joint pain. It is transmitted by Aedes mosquitoes. Dengue can lead to deaths, but the number of annual deaths in Africa may not be as high as in some other regions.
   - Area of Influence: Dengue outbreaks can occur in parts of Africa, particularly in urban areas with Aedes mosquito populations.


Main plant diseases

1. Cassava Mosaic Disease (CMD):
   - Main Characteristic: CMD is caused by various viruses and results in mosaic-like patterns on cassava leaves, stunted growth, and reduced tuber production. CMD can lead to significant yield losses, with estimates ranging from 20% to 80% of cassava production in affected areas. Economic losses due to CMD can amount to millions of dollars annually in affected regions.

   - Area of Influence: CMD is a significant threat to cassava production in many African countries, especially in East and Central Africa.

2. Maize Lethal Necrosis Disease (MLND):
   - Main Characteristic: MLND is caused by a combination of maize chlorotic mottle virus (MCMV) and sugarcane mosaic virus (SCMV). It leads to severe stunting, yellowing, and necrosis of maize plants.  MLND can result in substantial yield reductions, with losses varying from 30% to 100% depending on the severity of the outbreak. MLND can cause significant economic losses, impacting both smallholder farmers and national maize production.

   - Area of Influence: MLND has affected maize crops in East Africa, including Kenya and Tanzania.

3. Banana Xanthomonas Wilt (BXW):
   - Main Characteristic: BXW is caused by the bacterium Xanthomonas campestris pv. musacearum. It causes wilting, bacterial ooze, and rotting of banana plants.
   - Area of Influence: BXW is a major threat to banana and plantain crops in East and Central Africa. Destroyed: BXW can lead to total crop loss in affected banana and plantain plantations. Economic losses due to BXW can be devastating for smallholder farmers and commercial banana growers.


4. Cocoa Black Pod Disease:
   - Main Characteristic: This fungal disease, caused by Phytophthora spp., leads to dark, sunken lesions on cocoa pods, reducing cocoa bean quality and yield. Cocoa black pod disease can lead to substantial losses in cocoa pod production, potentially affecting entire harvests. The economic impact of cocoa black pod disease can be significant in countries with a substantial cocoa industry.
   - Area of Influence: Cocoa black pod disease affects cocoa production in several West African countries, which are major cocoa producers.

5. Rice Blast (Magnaporthe oryzae):
   - Main Characteristic: Rice blast is a fungal disease that causes lesions on rice leaves, stems, and grains, leading to reduced grain quality and yield. Rice blast can result in varying levels of yield reduction, depending on the rice variety and management practices.
Economic losses due to rice blast can affect rice production and livelihoods in regions with significant rice cultivation.

   - Area of Influence: Rice blast affects rice cultivation in various African countries, particularly those with significant rice production.

6. Cassava Brown Streak Disease (CBSD):
   - Main Characteristic: CBSD is caused by Cassava brown streak virus (CBSV) and results in brown streaks on cassava roots, making them unmarketable.  CBSD can lead to partial or complete crop loss in cassava fields. Economic losses due to CBSD can have a significant impact on cassava-dependent communities.

   - Area of Influence: CBSD is a major threat to cassava production in East and Central Africa.

7. Potato Late Blight (Phytophthora infestans):
   - Main Characteristic: Late blight is a fungal disease that causes dark lesions on potato leaves and tubers, leading to reduced yield and quality. Potato late blight can result in significant yield reductions, especially if not managed effectively. Economic losses due to late blight can affect both small-scale and commercial potato farming.

   - Area of Influence: Potato late blight affects potato cultivation in various African countries, particularly those with potato production.

Certainly, here are additional examples of main plant diseases affecting staple foods in Africa, along with their main characteristics and areas of influence:

8. Wheat Stem Rust (Puccinia graminis f. sp. tritici):
   - Main Characteristic: Wheat stem rust is a fungal disease that causes reddish-brown pustules on wheat stems and leaves, leading to reduced wheat yield and quality. Wheat stem rust can lead to significant yield losses, with estimates ranging from 10% to 70% of wheat production in affected areas. Economic losses due to wheat stem rust can impact both small-scale and commercial wheat farming, potentially costing millions of dollars.

   - Area of Influence: Wheat stem rust has been a concern in North and East Africa, affecting wheat production in countries like Ethiopia and Kenya.

9. Sorghum Anthracnose (Colletotrichum sublineolum):
   - Main Characteristic: Sorghum anthracnose is a fungal disease that causes dark lesions on sorghum leaves, stems, and grains, resulting in reduced grain quality and yield.  Sorghum anthracnose can result in yield losses ranging from 20% to 60% depending on the severity of the outbreak. Economic losses due to sorghum anthracnose can affect regions with significant sorghum cultivation, impacting food security and livelihoods.

   - Area of Influence: Sorghum anthracnose affects sorghum cultivation in various African countries, particularly those in the semi-arid regions.

10. Sweet Potato Virus Disease (SPVD):
    - Main Characteristic: SPVD is caused by various viruses and results in yellowing, curling, and distortion of sweet potato leaves, reducing root yield.  SPVD can lead to substantial yield losses, with estimates ranging from 20% to 80% of sweet potato production in affected areas. Economic losses due to SPVD can be significant, affecting smallholder farmers and communities reliant on sweet potato as a staple crop.

    - Area of Influence: SPVD is a significant threat to sweet potato production in several African countries, including Uganda and Tanzania.

11. Tomato Yellow Leaf Curl Virus (TYLCV):
    - Main Characteristic: TYLCV is a viral disease that causes yellowing and curling of tomato leaves, stunted growth, and reduced fruit yield. TYLCV can result in varying levels of yield reduction, depending on the tomato varieties grown and management practices. Economic losses due to TYLCV can impact tomato production and the livelihoods of farmers, particularly in regions with significant tomato cultivation.

    - Area of Influence: TYLCV affects tomato cultivation in various African countries, including Nigeria and Senegal.

12. Cowpea Aphid-Borne Mosaic Virus (CABMV):
    - Main Characteristic: CABMV is a viral disease that affects cowpea plants, causing mosaic patterns on leaves, reduced pod formation, and yield loss. CABMV can lead to yield losses ranging from 20% to 80% of cowpea production in affected areas. Economic losses due to CABMV can affect regions with substantial cowpea cultivation, impacting food availability and income.

    - Area of Influence: CABMV poses a threat to cowpea production in West and Central African countries.

13. Citrus Canker (Xanthomonas axonopodis):
    - Main Characteristic: Citrus canker is a bacterial disease that results in raised, corky lesions on citrus fruit and leaves, reducing fruit quality. Citrus canker can result in varying levels of fruit loss, affecting citrus yields. Economic losses due to citrus canker can impact citrus production and the citrus industry in affected regions.

    - Area of Influence: Citrus canker impacts citrus cultivation in several African countries with citrus industries, such as South Africa and Egypt.

Main diseases affecting animals

1. Rinderpest (Cattle Plague):
   - Main Characteristic: Rinderpest is a highly contagious viral disease that affects cattle, buffalo, and some other cloven-hoofed animals. It causes high fever, nasal discharge, oral lesions, and can lead to death.
   - Area of Influence: Rinderpest was historically a major threat to cattle populations in Africa but was successfully eradicated through vaccination campaigns.

2. Peste des Petits Ruminants (PPR):
   - Main Characteristic: PPR is a viral disease that primarily affects sheep and goats. It causes fever, nasal discharge, pneumonia, and can lead to high mortality rates in affected herds.
   - Area of Influence: PPR is widespread in various African countries, particularly in East, West, and North Africa.

3. Contagious Caprine Pleuropneumonia (CCPP):
   - Main Characteristic: CCPP is a highly contagious bacterial disease that affects goats and sometimes sheep. It causes severe respiratory distress, pleuropneumonia, and high mortality.
   - Area of Influence: CCPP has been reported in several African countries, including parts of East, West, and North Africa.

4. Lumpy Skin Disease (LSD):
   - Main Characteristic: LSD is a viral disease that affects cattle and is characterized by fever, nodules or lumps on the skin, and sometimes eye and nasal discharge.
   - Area of Influence: LSD outbreaks have been documented in various African countries, including those in North, East, and Southern Africa.

5. Gambian Trypanosomiasis (Nagana):
   - Main Characteristic: Nagana is a parasitic disease transmitted by tsetse flies. It affects cattle and other livestock, causing fever, anemia, and weakness.
   - Area of Influence: Nagana is prevalent in tsetse fly-infested regions of sub-Saharan Africa, including West, Central, and East African countries.

6. East Coast Fever (ECF):
   - Main Characteristic: ECF is a tick-borne disease caused by the protozoan parasite Theileria parva. It primarily affects cattle and causes symptoms such as high fever, labored breathing, and lymph node enlargement.
   - Area of Influence: ECF is prevalent in East and Southern Africa, where it poses a significant threat to cattle populations.

7. Foot and Mouth Disease (FMD):
   - Main Characteristic: FMD is a highly contagious viral disease that affects cloven-hoofed animals, including cattle, sheep, and goats. It leads to fever, blisters on the feet and mouth, and decreased milk and meat production.
   - Area of Influence: FMD outbreaks occur in various African countries, with sporadic cases reported across the continent.

8. Bovine Ephemeral Fever (BEF):
   - Main Characteristic: BEF, also known as "three-day sickness," is a viral disease that primarily affects cattle. It causes a sudden onset of fever, muscle stiffness, and lameness, usually lasting for a few days.
   - Area of Influence: BEF is reported in parts of Africa, particularly in regions with suitable vectors (biting midges).

9. Heartwater (Cowdriosis):
   - Main Characteristic: Heartwater is a tick-borne disease caused by the bacterium Ehrlichia ruminantium. It affects cattle and can lead to symptoms such as high fever, respiratory distress, and neurological signs.
   - Area of Influence: Heartwater is prevalent in various African countries, especially in areas with a significant tick presence.

10. Avian Influenza (Bird Flu):
    - Main Characteristic: Avian influenza is a viral disease that primarily affects birds, including poultry and wild birds. It can cause respiratory and digestive symptoms in birds.
    - Area of Influence: While primarily a disease of birds, avian influenza outbreaks have been reported in some African countries, with implications for poultry farming.

Healthcare in Africa
Diseases don't care about borders, and they can spread easily from one country to another.

Today, we face new health challenges like obesity, diabetes, heart disease, and hypertension, which are made worse by global factors like unhealthy food and tobacco. These issues are affecting Africa too, but the global health discussion often leaves them out.

In recent years, there's been a lot of talk about how diseases can affect everyone, no matter where they live. We've seen diseases like AIDS and HIV impacting African countries severely. But when it comes to discussing these global health issues, Africa's voice often goes unheard.

Some people believe that Africa is on the sidelines when it comes to global health decisions. They think that Africa is seen as a place where diseases come from. This view can be traced back to the past when many European countries wanted to protect themselves from diseases in Africa.

When it comes to diseases, we're all connected. Diseases can travel quickly between countries, and they don't care about borders. For example, malaria is a disease that's common in Africa, but it can also be a risk to people in other parts of the world when someone with the disease travels.

In today's world, there are many factors that make us vulnerable to diseases, from international travel to the food we eat. All of these factors affect our health, and we need to find ways to work together to address them.

So, while Africa may have been left out of some global health discussions in the past, we're all in this together. Our health is connected, and we need to find ways to protect and promote it, no matter where we live. It's crucial for us to acknowledge the challenges posed by globalization, including the rise of non-communicable diseases and the impact of unhealthy lifestyles, as well as the global movement of people and goods. These factors have made public health a complex global challenge that requires collaborative efforts from all regions. 

African countries have long faced serious health problems, with diseases like HIV/AIDS and malaria causing high rates of sickness and death. But there are other diseases, often called "orphan" or "neglected" diseases, that also affect the health of African people.

Sub-Saharan Africa is particularly affected by HIV/AIDS, accounting for a large majority of global cases. HIV is often linked with tuberculosis and other infections, making it even more deadly. Tuberculosis is a significant cause of death among people with HIV, especially in Africa.

One major issue is that many African countries lack the healthcare infrastructure to handle these diseases effectively. The burden of communicable and infectious diseases, along with the orphan diseases, has created a situation often described as "global health apartheid." This means that most research and development (R&D) funding is directed towards diseases that primarily affect wealthier countries, leaving diseases that affect Africa and other developing regions with fewer resources.

Addressing this imbalance is crucial if African nations are to achieve their health-related Millennium Development Goals.

Beyond infectious diseases, African societies face new challenges related to non-communicable diseases (NCDs) like obesity, diabetes, cancer, and heart conditions. These health problems are on the rise due to factors like the marketing of tobacco, unhealthy food, and the global spread of unhealthy lifestyles in developing countries.

Tobacco is a significant contributor to this issue, with multinational tobacco companies targeting developing countries. These companies have succeeded in reaching millions of people in these regions, contributing to the growing number of people suffering from tobacco’s side effects.

Similarly, the fast-food industry has expanded across Africa, leading to increased obesity rates. In many African cities, you can find long lines of people, especially young individuals and families, at fast-food restaurants. These trends are driven by a desire to adopt a Western lifestyle but come with health risks.

Global health problems need global solutions that involve many groups - countries, international organizations, businesses, and civil society. Some of these solutions involve partnerships between governments and non-governmental organizations. These partnerships have challenged the traditional idea that states have all the power when it comes to global issues, a concept that dates back over 300 years.

To address these global health problems from an African perspective, we need to understand that global health isn't just about infectious diseases. It also involves activities outside the healthcare sector, especially in international trade. This trade is often driven by businesses seeking profit. African perspectives on global health challenges should consider how international trade agreements, like those governed by the World Trade Organization, impact health, such as access to essential medicines and privatization of healthcare.

African countries can improve health security and ensure the right to good health for their people by building strong healthcare systems. As former WHO Director-General Brundtland noted, it's in everyone's interest, including wealthier countries and corporations, to reduce disease burdens in the developing world, as it benefits economic growth, health, and the environment.

In this changing landscape of health sovereignty, it's crucial to reshape global health measures in the 21st century to address both infectious and non-communicable diseases affecting African societies.


The need for better healthcare
Global health has witnessed gradual improvements over the past five decades, yet it remains in a precarious state, marked by occasional outbreaks of severe epidemics, such as avian and swine flu, as well as the increasing prevalence of lifestyle-related illnesses like diabetes and hypertension. Diseases that were once believed to be under control in the 1980s have resurfaced, leading to significant morbidity and mortality, and threatening to erode the health gains achieved over the past few decades. 

In the mid-1980s, HIV and AIDS emerged and later became a global pandemic with far-reaching consequences. Additionally, the outbreak of avian influenza (H1N5) between 2003 and 2009, though resulting in relatively few fatalities, caused worldwide concern.  

These instances reveal the vulnerability of global health systems, exacerbated by the effects of globalization. Globalization has facilitated the rapid spread of pathogens across borders and perpetuated conditions of underdevelopment and marginalization, particularly in Africa.

While globalization has brought about positive changes, such as improved access to health information, greater global consensus on shared health challenges, and increased funding for health programs compared to the 1990s, it has also exacerbated issues like inequality and poverty. This has resulted in a weakened state in the realm of health policy, thereby creating opportunities for various actors, including non-governmental organizations (NGOs), to bolster health responses, but also leading to weakening of the health measures at national and regional levels.

Health governance encompasses mechanisms, processes, leadership, and institutions that ensure people's health needs and rights are met. It includes vital components such as health systems, disease control, information management systems, acquisition of essential technologies, inter-sectoral coordination involving both private and public sectors, synergy between primary and secondary healthcare, infrastructure development, alignment between health and economic policies, and health insurance and social security.

The relationship between Africa's health sovereignty and globalization is intricate, involving both advantages and disadvantages. Africa must effectively harness the benefits of globalization, such as technological advancements, the free flow of information, access to capital, and the role of the private sector. Simultaneously, it must address the historical disparities perpetuated by globalization.

In recent years, the COVID-19 pandemic has emerged as a stark reminder of the interconnectedness of global health. This novel coronavirus, which was first identified in Wuhan, China, in late 2019, rapidly spread across the world, leading to a global health crisis. The pandemic highlighted the challenges of managing infectious diseases in an interconnected world. Countries scrambled to implement measures to contain the virus, including lockdowns, travel restrictions, and mass vaccination campaigns.

COVID-19 exposed things we can improve in both national and global health measures. Some nations struggled to coordinate their responses effectively, leading to disparities in healthcare delivery and outcomes. At the same time, the pandemic emphasized the need for global cooperation in areas like vaccine distribution and research collaboration. It also underscored the importance of strong healthcare systems capable of handling crises.

While global health has made progress, it remains vulnerable to a range of challenges, from infectious disease outbreaks to the rise of non-communicable diseases. Africa's response to these challenges must involve strengthening its internal measures and advocating for changes in global health measures. The emergence of COVID-19 serves as a poignant example of the complex and interconnected nature of global health and the need for robust health systems and effective global cooperation.


Understanding Africa's health challenges involves recognizing how diseases are linked to underdevelopment and poverty. Global health means that health problems are not confined to one country; they affect the entire world. Individual countries cannot handle these problems alone because they are beyond their control. 

Globalization, with its increased international travel and communication, has made health issues more interconnected. It has also led to more people moving between countries, including vulnerable groups like the sick, refugees, and trafficking victims. This complicates efforts to manage public health.

It has spurred innovation in health policies and technology adoption but has also weakened states and institutions' capacity to promote health. The spread of ideas and cultures has influenced lifestyle choices that affect health, such as diet and behavior. Cardiovascular disease, once common in high-income countries, is now a growing issue in Africa, alongside communicable diseases.

Cognitive globalization, which involves the spread of ideas about health management, influences how health policies are made and implemented. Western medical ideas often dominate, while alternatives like traditional African medicine are marginalized. Donor programs tend to promote Western biomedicine, limiting the spread of diverse medical ideas. This approach favors high-tech, hospital-based healthcare over primary care, even though it may not always be the most effective.

Western values, which prioritize individualism and pathogen-focused approaches, often take precedence in global health, overshadowing values that prioritize communities and environmental factors. African medical thought emphasizes group identity and eclectic therapies. 

Africa, finds itself in a relatively disadvantaged position within this global power structure, primarily due to historical factors related to its integration into the global order during the era of colonial rule. The traditional notion of health as an essential human right, a concept championed at the Alma Ata conference in 1978, is gradually yielding ground to a perspective that views health as a tradable commodity, one whose accessibility and enjoyment are increasingly regulated by market dynamics. This paradigm shift is beginning to influence how we define health challenges, measure their impact, and allocate resources to address them.

To address these challenges, we need proactive public policies that protect vulnerable populations from the negative impacts of globalization and create opportunities for their well-being. However, focusing solely on national policies is insufficient to transform Africa's health situation. The complexity of global issues requires global solutions. Africa faces a significant share of the global health burden, characterized by disease incidence and challenges within health systems. These challenges are interconnected, as a rise in illness when health systems are underdeveloped further weakens these systems.

Worldwide, more people die from preventable and treatable diseases than from violence and accidents. According to WHO's 2011 statistics, out of 54.6 million deaths, 49.6 million were due to illnesses. The majority of these deaths occur in children under five and people aged 30 to 49. These disease-related deaths make up 91% of global mortality, with the highest number among those over 70 years old.

The interconnectedness of these challenges makes finding effective responses complex. Addressing both the supply-side issues within health systems and the demand-side issues related to disease incidence is essential for progress in global health.

The case of malaria
Malaria in Africa today serves as an example of how globalization can transform an endemic disease into a virulent epidemic. Africa hosts the majority of malaria-endemic countries, with 43 out of 106 worldwide. In 2010, Africa accounted for 79.5% of global malaria cases, resulting in 90% of all malaria-related deaths, with 86% affecting children under five. Nigeria, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Burkina Faso, and Mozambique reported the highest malaria-related deaths.

Effective prevention and treatment methods exist but remain inadequately accessible in the most affected regions, especially in Africa. Challenges include funding shortages for essential resources like bed nets, insecticides, drugs, and diagnostics, along with supply-side issues such as weak distribution systems, inefficient healthcare infrastructure, and poor government coordination.

Vector and pathogen resistance to insecticides and antimalarials poses a threat to malaria control efforts. This situation undermines the global Roll-Back Malaria campaign. Malaria's economic impact is often underestimated, with its costs affecting businesses, individuals, and households. It perpetuates poverty and hampers economic growth in malaria-endemic regions.

The persistent burden of malaria and other infectious diseases has driven many skilled workers to migrate from rural areas within Africa to healthier working environments in Western countries, Asia, and the Americas. Healthcare workers, in particular, bear the brunt of these diseases, leading them to seek more favorable employment opportunities abroad. This exacerbates the issue of brain drain and high rates of emigration, especially among healthcare professionals who struggle to practice effectively in areas with limited healthcare infrastructure, low salaries, and a scarcity of essential medical equipment and services.

The case of cholera
Diarrheal diseases are a significant health issue worldwide, especially among infants and children. They impact more people than we might think. In 2010, around 1,445,800 individuals died from diarrheal diseases, with 666,022 of them being children under five years old. Surprisingly, this death toll was higher than that of major diseases like measles, malaria, tetanus, diphtheria, pertussis, meningitis, and hepatitis.

Cholera is a significant contributor to these diseases, introduced to parts of Africa centuries ago through trade. It remains a problem due to poor environmental and sanitation conditions. Poverty and inadequate living conditions, including malnutrition, lack of clean water, and poor sanitation, are closely linked to diarrheal diseases. These diseases are preventable and treatable, but in Africa, many people die due to limited access to essential medications. Some argue that these high death rates are a result of global economic inequalities that trap people in poverty.

They thrive in areas with limited access to healthcare facilities and unreliable health information. Political instability can also contribute to outbreaks, as seen in Zimbabwe's cholera epidemic in 2008. This crisis resulted from economic collapse and political turmoil, allowing the cholera virus to spread, affecting the poor in neighboring countries like South Africa, Mozambique, and Botswana.

Addressing Africa's health issues requires understanding the impact of globalization on public services. It has led to market-oriented healthcare, reducing the role of national institutions. Structural adjustment programs imposed by organizations like the World Bank and IMF weakened the African state and reduced social spending. As a result, healthcare declined, and donor countries, agencies, and NGOs began to dictate health priorities and programs. These external actors have significant influence over health policy in Africa.

Western-style NGOs and social movements provided healthcare to the poor but often didn't promote strengthening African state institutions. Instead, they focus on specific issues like HIV/AIDS. This in turn created a great dependence, which is now causing an increase in the problems in healthcare due to the decline in NGO funding. 

A different approach
When governments fail to provide necessary health resources, other stakeholders like NGOs step in. The question is, how can these stakeholders work together effectively to ensure accountability?

We also need to hear the voices of individuals in vulnerable situations and mobilize them for action. One way to do this is by reviving indigenous community participation processes that have worked in the past.

This approach involves everyone having a say, leaders earning respect, and accountability for progress. It addresses a range of concerns, from climate change to HIV/AIDS, poverty, and conflict.

One method, called "conceptual events," is a way to bring different stakeholders together to construct shared frameworks for understanding and solving problems. It's a cooperative, trans-disciplinary approach that encourages cross-cultural communication.

Conceptual events are based on participatory action research principles, where all stakeholders reason together as equals and bridge their differences through dialogue, reflection, and action. Trust is crucial in this process.

These events go beyond simple information gathering; they involve all stakeholders in reflecting on challenges, exploring options, and creatively finding solutions rooted in indigenous knowledge and culture.

In Zimbabwe, Malawi, and Uganda, there were events where people came together to understand the risk of HIV better. These events created a shared understanding and a sense of unity among the participants. They emphasized the importance of relieving human suffering through collective efforts.

These events also led to the development of frameworks that went beyond individual beliefs and views. They didn't change people's scientific, spiritual, or moral perspectives but rather strengthened them. These frameworks provided a basis for culturally appropriate solutions.

During these events, the emotional and moral aspects of participants' humanity became a driving force for action. They felt a strong ethical obligation to address the issues at hand and form a moral community that transcended their individual affiliations. This moral community increased their sense of responsibility and allowed them to come up with practical and sustainable solutions.

The key to the success of these events was a moral imperative to reduce human suffering. This imperative motivated stakeholders to collectively address problems and be vulnerable in finding solutions.

Conceptual events have the potential to bring together diverse perspectives and groups to find solutions to various issues like HIV/AIDS, water scarcity, and the effects of climate change on health and food security. While these events can be successful, they require time to build trust, often spanning several years.

However, funders tend to prefer shorter-term programs, which can be a challenge for sustaining these initiatives. The method of conceptual events can foster genuine collaboration by providing a common ground and ethical purpose for all stakeholders.

In the quest for solutions, the stories of scientists and indigenous people need to converge. This process involves bridging the gap between scientific and indigenous truths, which can lead to innovative and effective solutions for fundamental human problems.

To take action, there must be a dynamic process that involves vulnerability at both the individual and group levels. This process builds trust, acknowledges the moral imperative for dialogue, and ultimately translates shared knowledge into action.

 Climate Change is Affecting more Things than we can Imagine
The world is currently grappling with a profound health crisis exacerbated by the rapid shifts in our climate and the ever-increasing influence of human activity. This evolving scenario has led to the proliferation of diseases, both familiar and novel, which not only threaten human health but also disrupt the ecosystems upon which we rely for our sustenance.  

This critical issue is not confined to specific geographical locations or regions; it is a global phenomenon that affects all nations alike. These pathogens find their way into our lives through various vectors, including soil, water, food, and arthropods, which play a significant role in their transmission. What is particularly concerning is the increasing frequency with which new diseases emerge, posing significant challenges to healthcare systems and our ability to manage and mitigate their impact.

In light of the interconnectedness of our world and the ease with which diseases can spread, it is imperative that we remain vigilant and proactive in our efforts to combat emerging infectious diseases. By doing so, we can strive to mitigate their impacts on public health, protect our ecosystems, and safeguard our economies from the potentially devastating consequences of these evolving health threats.

Scientists have been sounding the alarm about them for quite a while, mainly because of changes in our environment. Our planet's climate is changing, and it's not just a slow change; it's speeding up. Even the predictions made about the year 2100, which were made decades ago, now seem way off the mark.

Now we're facing a series of outbreaks, and our healthcare systems can barely keep up. We often don't even know where the next outbreak will occur because we've done a lousy job of keeping track of these diseases. What we do know is that these diseases are much better at finding us than we are at finding them. This problem isn't new; it's been ongoing for a while, but we're not adequately preparing for these outbreaks.

Our ancestors in Africa moved from the forests to the savannah thousands of years ago. This transition brought us in contact with new pathogens from animals. As we settled down, farmed, and urbanized, we created even more opportunities for pathogens to infect us.

In the last 50 years, our population has exploded, and globalization has made it easier for diseases to spread worldwide. Rapid transit and a growing population have created a real-time crisis. Climate change, driven by human activities like burning fossil fuels, has disrupted the climate stability that marked the Holocene. This change affects temperature, precipitation, and storm patterns, which, in turn, impact ecosystems and disease patterns.
Economic Impact of Diseases

Pandemics and epidemics have been occurring more frequently in recent times, and they are harder to predict than endemic diseases. Unlike storms that meteorologists can monitor, these disease events can be highly unpredictable. Economists generally agree that these unpredictable disease events, like pandemics and epidemics, have the potential to cause severe economic damage to countries.

For instance, a flu pandemic could lead to losses in the billions or even trillions of dollars due to factors like mortality costs. The World Bank estimated that a flu pandemic similar to the 1918–1919 flu could cost about 5% of the global GDP or roughly $3 trillion. Another study suggested the global economic cost of such a pandemic could be close to 12.6% of GDP, with the greatest impact on non-OECD countries. More recent assessments indicate that even a moderately severe influenza pandemic could cost 0.6% of global income due to income loss and mortality.

Endemic diseases, once thought to have minimal economic impact, have also been recognized as having significant negative effects on economies. Diseases like HIV/AIDS, malaria, and tuberculosis have resulted in lower labor productivity, reduced investment, and decreased tourism receipts in affected regions. These diseases contribute to economic disparities by impacting the poorest households the most.

Surprise disease events, which become pandemics, have particularly far-reaching economic consequences. These events disrupt all sectors of the economy, including agriculture, manufacturing, and services. Shortages and rising prices of essential goods can also occur. The question with pandemics/epidemics is whether they lead to long-term economic scarring, where the impact persists beyond the outbreak's duration.

One notable example before COVID-19 was the SARS pandemic, which cost over $54 billion, affecting world markets significantly. The economic impact of COVID-19 is ongoing and predicted to be substantial, with many countries experiencing sharp economic contractions. 

Disease epidemics, even if they don't reach pandemic levels, can also have substantial regional economic impacts. The Ebola virus outbreak in West Africa resulted in enormous economic losses, estimated at $2.8 billion for the three most affected countries and around $500 million across the rest of the continent. Growth rates in these countries were much lower than expected, leading to hardships such as food shortages.

Scholars argue that some of the economic costs of disease outbreaks result from individual actions to prevent getting sick rather than from actual infections. People avoiding activities and not going to work to prevent illness can have a more substantial economic impact than the disease itself. Surveys in Hong Kong, Taipei, and the United States during epidemics showed that many people feared getting infected, even when the actual infection rates were quite low.

Unlike diseases that are always present in a region (endemic diseases), pandemics and epidemics are more profoundly affected by the global economy and measures like lockdowns. The response to a pandemic can have more significant economic consequences than the disease itself. Uncoordinated efforts by millions of individuals to avoid infection can lead to border closures, canceled events, disrupted trade, and import bans from affected countries. These measures can be controversial but may be necessary when tracking and tracing are difficult.

Service sectors like travel, tourism, and restaurants are the hardest hit during pandemics, while other sectors may be affected differently depending on the country's economic structure. Shutting down businesses for two months can lead to severe financial problems for many European firms.

Massive unemployment rates can occur during a pandemic as businesses close down. In the first wave of the COVID-19 pandemic, over 20 million people were unemployed in the US, with high unemployment rates in other countries as well.

Tourism is severely affected by disease outbreaks, leading to significant losses. For instance, during the SARS outbreak, Beijing alone lost $1.4 billion in tourism revenue, far exceeding the direct medical costs. COVID-19 has had a catastrophic impact on tourism and travel, causing airlines to go bankrupt and requesting substantial government aid. The World Travel and Tourism Council (WTTC) warned that 50 million jobs in the industry were at risk.

Endemic infectious diseases can also harm tourism and a country's income. Greece, Spain, and Italy, which now rely heavily on tourism, had underdeveloped tourism industries due to malaria issues in the past. Once they eradicated malaria, they were able to grow their tourism industries and generate income.

Pandemics can severely affect the hospitality industry, including hotels, restaurants, bars, and cafes. These businesses suffer during outbreaks, and even when they reopen, they can't make up for lost business. People tend to avoid these places during lockdowns, and it's unlikely they'll suddenly double their visits once restrictions are lifted. This also impacts the supply chain, affecting catering and laundry services. For instance, during the MERS outbreak in South Korea, the food sector saw a 10% drop in 2015. Hong Kong's retail and hospitality industries were also affected by SARS. Hourly workers face the most significant challenges, and liquidity problems arise in the industry.


This can lead to skill loss, mental health effects, and reduced capital. Endemic diseases affect productivity more broadly, often affecting individuals in their prime working years. HIV/AIDS, for instance, is a leading cause of death among young adults in Africa. Infectious diseases also lead to more days when potential workers cannot work. Diseases like hookworm and malaria can have a substantial impact on productivity. 

Agriculture is heavily impacted, with fewer workers available for food production. This leads to increased food prices and, in some cases, switches to less labor-intensive crops, affecting exports.

Low productivity levels have wider economic consequences. They reduce exports and increase imports of expensive healthcare products, leading to balance of payment issues. In strategic sectors like mining, labor shortages result in higher wages and production costs, reducing international competitiveness. Foreign exchange shortages can also occur. Infectious diseases discourage investment, particularly in endemic areas. The COVID-19 crisis has already led to a drop in private investment, potentially reducing GDP and affecting potential economic output.

Investors tend to avoid areas where infectious diseases are widespread because it creates economic uncertainty. For example, in sub-Saharan Africa, eliminating diseases like malaria and HIV/AIDS could increase foreign investments by up to 33%. An example of the risks involved is a mining company that invested $1.4 billion in Mozambique but faced 7,000 cases of malaria and 13 deaths among its employees within two years.

HIV/AIDS also discourages investment as businesses have to spend more on healthcare, employee training, and sick-leave allowances. This additional cost is sometimes referred to as the "AIDS tax," which used to account for as much as 10.8% of total compensation costs before antiretroviral therapy (ART). After ART, it reduced to about 1–2%.

Businesses face various costs related to infectious diseases, including recruiting and training new employees to replace those who become sick or pass away. Absenteeism due to illness or caregiving responsibilities, as well as time off for funerals and grieving, also impact business operations. High labor turnover can result in a less experienced workforce, leading to reduced productivity. For instance, in Botswana and Kenya, absenteeism due to HIV or AIDS and burial costs were found to be significant factors in increased labor costs.

Research has shown that diseases like HIV/AIDS cause significant morbidity and mortality among workers. For instance, in Zimbabwe, the Railway Corporation experienced a 15% annual employee turnover rate, with over 10% of the workforce dying from AIDS-related illnesses. Similar effects were observed in other regions, like Barclays Bank of Zambia, which lost over a quarter of its employees to the disease during the peak of the crisis. These diseases not only affect infected individuals but also their caregivers, who often need to take time off work. In total, infectious diseases have a negative impact on labor productivity and economic output.
Why is it so hard to solve the problem?
When it comes to climate change and emerging diseases, it's never just one thing, and the outcomes depend on various factors. Some aspects of life are complicated and can't be simplified. For example, as we improve food production, more people demand more food, leading to higher poverty levels. Better healthcare means more people live longer, but it also strains healthcare systems. Decreasing birth rates can reduce population pressure but affect public health funding. Many demands on land use and climate change can lead to conflicts.

Two important things to consider are tipping points and threat multipliers. Tipping points are moments when changes happen that can't be undone, like a point of no return. We might not realize when we're approaching these tipping points because changes happen gradually over generations. One tipping point we're nearing is our ability to respond to disease outbreaks, which is getting weaker. Our ignorance about potential diseases and our lack of concern about it are pushing us closer to this tipping point.

Threat multipliers make existing problems worse. Climate change, population growth, are threat multipliers for emerging diseases. In turn, emerging diseases make poverty, famine, drought, conflict, and migration worse. This is why many countries see emerging diseases as a national security issue. If it's a security issue for every country, it's a global threat.  

Science operates like an evolving system and should rely on principles of adaptation rather than rigid notions of efficiency. 

Effective adaptation in science requires three things: 
1. The ability to specialize and generalize.
2. Cooperation.
3. Division of labor.

Scientists are quite skilled at these tasks when given the freedom to be creative and adaptable. However, management systems rarely reward such behavior, even though it is often crucial in finding solutions to common problems.

Many managers prefer to avoid making decisions, fearing that they might make the wrong choice and be held responsible. This leads to a preference for "best practices," which essentially means sticking to what has worked in the past. However, this approach only works if the present and future resemble the past, which is not the case in our rapidly changing world. Scientists resent being overmanaged because it fosters fatalism and can even lead to nihilism.

The prevailing response to the intertwined challenges of climate change and emerging diseases is "business as usual." However, this approach is ineffective.

Dealing with emerging diseases is costly. The past decade has shown that these diseases directly impact our health, ecosystems, and essential food and water resources. While it's challenging to precisely measure the costs, it's clear that they are substantial. These costs are an imperfect indicator of the challenges posed by emerging diseases, and as these diseases continue to spread, treatment costs and productivity losses will likely become unsustainable.

The annual cost of responding to emerging diseases is enormous and growing. The scientific literature on this topic reveals that while potential costs are discussed, actual costs are rarely provided. There is no clear evidence that our current approach to dealing with emerging diseases is economically sustainable.

We often underestimate the danger posed by diseases. The 1918 influenza pandemic, while unlikely, had devastating consequences. In today's world, with a growing global population and increased population density, a similar pandemic could wreak havoc, as the case of Covid-19 has shown. 

We should be more concerned about the gradual buildup of diseases that have a high probability of occurrence but low immediate impact. These diseases, even if mild and localized, still cost us economically when they emerge. Even after we develop resistance, they can persist as ongoing problems, like "pathogen pollution." For example, West Nile virus is no longer a major acute problem in North America, but it remains a chronic issue that requires ongoing resources. Norovirus outbreaks in schools and on cruise ships may not be deadly pandemics, but they lead to significant productivity losses due to school closures and parental absence.

Our knowledge of known and potential pathogens is limited, with only about 10% documented. This lack of information is concerning because we can't prepare for a threat we don't even know exists. Emerging infectious diseases (EIDs) are not rare; they are more common than we think. And climate change is making pathogens more widespread, turning our planet into an evolutionary minefield. Human population growth and globalization accelerate the introduction of pathogens into new regions and ecosystems.



The Effects of Climate Change in Africa
In recent years, a consensus has emerged within the scientific community, indicating that human activities are playing a substantial role in the accumulation of greenhouse gases in the Earth's atmosphere. This accumulation, in turn, contributes significantly to the rise in global temperatures and brings about alterations in the planet's hydrologic cycle. Such changes have profound implications, particularly with regard to access to natural resources such as water, arable land, and vegetation, as well as their impact on vulnerable ecosystems. 

The consequences of these shifts are most keenly felt in regions with limited adaptive capacity. These areas are often characterized by poverty, inequality, insufficient infrastructure, competing health priorities, and subpar service delivery systems. Tragically, these are the very regions that will suffer the most severe repercussions of climate change.

According to the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), the African continent is poised to bear the brunt of the global climate crisis. This assertion is based on the premise that the adverse effects of climate change will disproportionately affect nations that are least responsible for the factors contributing to climate change and, at the same time, least equipped to cope with its consequences. This recognition dates back to 1992 when the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change (UNFCCC) explicitly acknowledged the impending impact of climate change on the most vulnerable states.

Climate change has evolved into a formidable developmental challenge that affects both present and future generations. It is especially critical for impoverished populations in low- and middle-income countries, given their heightened vulnerability to the adverse health impacts associated with climate change. It is noteworthy that of the 50 poorest countries in the world, 36 are located in sub-Saharan Africa, according to data from the International Monetary Fund (IMF).

The susceptibility of African nations to the effects of climate change is exacerbated by the inherent unpredictability of spatial patterns of impacts. Planning effective policies becomes a formidable task due to shifting climate projections and the unreliability of data. This complexity is further compounded by the interplay of multiple environmental and societal stressors.  

In recent years, African governments have garnered international recognition for their efforts to implement much-needed economic reforms, address issues of peace and security, strengthen measures and accountability mechanisms. The continent has witnessed remarkable achievements at the community and regional levels across diverse geographical regions. 

For instance, from 2004 to 2012, Africa experienced annual economic growth rates exceeding 5.2%, according to the International Monetary Fund (IMF). However, this growth rate declined by nearly 50% in 2009 due to the global financial crisis, rebounded to 5.6% in 2010, but eventually dipped to 4.9% by 2012. During this period, some African nations achieved stabilization in the number of new HIV infections, with a decline in AIDS-related deaths in select countries, as reported by UNAIDS in 2013.

As outlined by the United Nations Economic and Social Commission for Asia and the Pacific (UN ESCAP), good healthcare measures encompass several essential components. It is participatory, involving the engagement of diverse stakeholders. It is consensus-oriented, aiming to achieve agreement among relevant parties. It is accountable, ensuring that decision-makers are answerable for their actions. It is transparent, facilitating openness and accessibility of information. 

Good measures are responsive to the needs of the populace, effective and efficient in its operations, equitable in its distribution of resources and benefits, and inclusive, recognizing and accommodating the interests of marginalized groups. Importantly, it adheres to the rule of law, ensuring that decisions and actions conform to established legal frameworks. Moreover, it seeks to minimize corruption, promote the voices of minorities, and listen to the concerns of the most vulnerable members of society.”

In the context of climate change and health measures, these principles take on significant relevance. Climate change measures necessitates inclusive decision-making processes that actively involve communities in decisions that directly impact their health and well-being. This approach draws parallels with primary healthcare, where community engagement in health-related decisions has demonstrated tangible benefits.  

Effective climate change measures require attention to community-level action. While certain public health impacts of climate change, such as epidemics, may necessitate top-down national or state responses, community-based initiatives often play a critical role.

Climate change has a significant influence on diseases like malaria and dengue fever. Rising temperatures affect the spread of disease-carrying mosquitoes, increasing the risk of infection. Malaria, for example, is projected to affect millions more people by 2080 due to mosquito migration caused by higher temperatures. Dengue fever is also sensitive to climate change, with increased temperatures and precipitation elevating the infection risk.

Climate change also affects food security, water safety, and exposure to diseases like malaria and diarrheal diseases, which are significant health risks in sub-Saharan Africa. Adequate nutrition is essential for health interventions, particularly in managing AIDS and preventing infant HIV/AIDS.

There is also evidence linking climate change to conflicts in Africa, often driven by resource scarcity and migration. Rising temperatures increase the likelihood of conflicts, with climate models predicting a substantial increase in armed conflicts in Africa by 2030. Events in Rwanda, Darfur in Sudan, and the Democratic Republic of Congo illustrate this connection.

Many people in Africa rely on burning solid fuels indoors for cooking and heating, which can negatively impact health. Improving energy efficiency can have co-benefits for health. Integrating climate-related initiatives into healthcare planning can be mutually beneficial.

Non-state actors are increasingly involved in global climate change politics, attending COP meetings and advocating for climate action. African countries have worked together to develop a unified stance on climate change, emphasizing sustainable development and compensation for environmental losses caused by industrialized nations. They call for reforms in financial mechanisms and increased funding for climate change strategies in developing countries.

The rise of non-state actors in climate change measures may lead to fragmentation and competition for resources. Understanding their motivations and the impact of their involvement is essential for effective measures. Private sector donors also play a crucial role in funding climate change programs, but their motivations need further examination.

Adaptation and mitigation strategies for climate change require the involvement of local institutions. In Africa, it's essential to establish a strong foundation for practical and sustainable interventions by enhancing the role of local institutions and tapping into indigenous knowledge. The importance of local institutions in addressing climate change's health measures effects and the potential of indigenous knowledge remain underexplored topics.

These strategies include maintaining mutual awareness of climate change, incorporating technical approaches in health programs, aligning health policies with sustainable development principles, and strengthening the evidence base for climate change interventions that benefit vulnerable populations.


Lessons taken from previous epidemics

The fight against HIV/AIDS has been ongoing for years, with Africa facing a disproportionate impact due to its population size. This epidemic has challenged African health systems and is now compounded by the potential health effects of climate change. There are valuable lessons from the HIV/AIDS response in Africa that can be applied to climate change and health governance. AIDS has also weakened social and human capital in Africa, making the population more vulnerable to climate change effects.

Engaging with communities, entrepreneurs, philanthropists, and political leaders has been crucial in the fight against HIV/AIDS, and a similar approach should be taken for climate change and health measures. Both mitigation and adaptation strategies for climate change have parallels in HIV prevention, treatment, care, and support. Food security has gained importance in the AIDS response and plays a role in HIV programs' adequacy.

The AIDS efforts in Africa emphasize community mobilization, education, social justice, equity, support for the poor and marginalized, technology transfer, capacity building, sustainable development, advocacy, and transparency. These efforts have received substantial development assistance. However, critics argue that disease-specific programs can weaken overall healthcare systems, leading to inefficiencies.

AIDS has also posed challenges to state healthcare measures, with different approaches taken by African governments. Some denied the epidemic's severity, while others openly addressed it, resulting in varied outcomes. Climate change-related health effects should not follow a siloed approach but rather integrate with existing healthcare systems.

The health workforce crisis is severe in Africa, but health workers can lead climate change advocacy. Physicians and health workers can advocate for food security, renewable energy access, and sustainable development, as these issues have significant health co-benefits.

Research on the health effects of climate change is crucial, especially in Africa, where limited data exists. The lack of scientific evidence hampers planning and resource allocation. Research should focus on building data sets linked to climate and health, behavior changes, disease surveillance, and economic evaluations of adaptation and mitigation strategies. Governance challenges also exist in supporting research institutions and universities to generate necessary scientific information.  

Infectious diseases are a primary concern regarding climate change, but other factors, like the physiological effects of extreme heat, are equally important. Africa lacks research capacity, emphasizing the need for collaboration and the creation of African health and climate research groups.

While there's growing media attention to how African people might be affected by climate change, there's still not enough scientific evidence on this. Developing countries, might face more serious consequences, but we have limited data overall. Some research has focused on how climate change affects specific diseases but hasn't looked at the bigger picture of how it impacts the overall health of populations.

To address this, good measures can help strengthen research infrastructure in African countries. This would speed up development and support research that spans different fields. It's essential to maintain long-term surveillance of population demographics, which is done through organizations like the INDEPTH Network in various African countries. For instance, in Ethiopia, irregular rainfall patterns have been linked to disease outbreaks, leading to a significant increase in local population mortality over two years.

Building a stronger network of researchers in the southern hemisphere, would be highly beneficial for the continent. This collaborative approach can help fill the research gaps and provide valuable insights into the health impacts of climate change.



The Evolution of how we Understand Pathogens, a Brief History
For ages, humans have been aware of organisms residing both inside and on other organisms. When processing food, such as meat, poultry, or fish, people often encountered external parasites like fleas, ticks, and lice, as well as internal parasites like worms. Similarly, humans themselves played host to various organisms. However, inquiries into the roles of these organisms and their origins were only recently addressed. 

In the late 1600s, Antonie van Leeuwenhoek's powerful lenses unveiled a concealed realm of microorganisms. Termed "animalcules," some of these microorganisms were suspected to be linked to diseases. However, it took over a century, until 1796, for Edward Jenner to pioneer smallpox vaccination, even before the discovery of viruses, which were beyond the scope of microscopic observation at the time. It was more than half a century after Jenner's groundbreaking work that a connection was established between these minuscule microorganisms and human suffering. 

While Darwin acknowledged the existence of parasites, he viewed diseases as outcomes of an evolutionary struggle between predator and prey, rather than a direct result of microorganisms. Although he hinted at the notion of a coevolutionary struggle between hosts and parasites, this insight did not lead to a comprehensive understanding of the role of pathogens in diseases during his era.

Darwin discerned a difference between conflicts among individuals of the same species and mutual dependencies between distinct species. He believed that host evolution stemmed from competition among host organisms, while parasite evolution arose from competition among parasites. However, he failed to grasp the idea that parasites and hosts might be integral to each other's fight for survival. This concept of mutual evolutionary influence would not be formally conceptualized until nearly a century later.

By the mid-1800s, humans had amassed considerable knowledge about medicines and formulated various theories regarding disease causation. It was Louis Pasteur who made remarkable strides in comprehending diseases between 1858 and 1865. He presented experimental evidence against spontaneous generation of life, demonstrated that microorganisms caused fermentation, and introduced pasteurization to preserve milk. While other scientists later connected Pasteur's insights to the notion that many diseases might also be attributed to microorganisms, their evolutionary roles remained enigmatic until the late 20th century.

Wheat stem rust, a devastating disease, had been recognized since ancient times and was even associated with the decline of the Roman Empire.But it wasn’t until the 17th century, European farmers observed a link between barberry plants and wheat stem rust. And only later, research unveiled that the fungus causing wheat stem rust had a complex life cycle, requiring development on both wheat and barberry hosts. This realization fostered the understanding that eradicating specific biodiversity associated with disease transmission could complement medication and vaccination in combating diseases.

The late 1800s were a time of significant change and debate in the field of evolutionary biology. There were three main competing theories to replace Darwin's ideas about how evolution worked.

1. Geographic Isolation: Darwin initially believed that new species could form when populations of a species were isolated from each other geographically. Over time, these isolated populations might evolve in different ways due to natural selection acting on them separately.  

2. Orthogenesis: This theory proposed that evolution was driven by an internal mechanism, but the specifics of this mechanism were unclear. Some thought evolution was a process of perfecting and specialization. The German entomologist Theodor Eimer, for instance, believed that evolution followed a predetermined path, but he disagreed with the idea of a positive perfecting internal drive.

3. Neo-Darwinism: This perspective emerged in response to a perceived lack of optimism in Darwin's theory. Herbert Spencer, a British sociologist, played a role in transforming Darwinism into neo-Darwinism by emphasizing the concept of "survival of the fittest." Neo-Darwinism suggested that selection not only favored existing traits but also included mechanisms to enhance the fit between organisms and their environments.

Despite their differences, both orthogeneticists and neo-Darwinians faced a paradox: If evolution was perfecting and ensuring the survival of the fittest, why did so many pathogens exist? Neo-Darwinians tried to resolve this paradox by suggesting that selection would reduce the harmful effects of pathogens over time, leading to less harmful associations between pathogens and their hosts. This idea became widely accepted but has been challenged.

By the late 1800s, our understanding of infectious diseases was growing rapidly, thanks to scientists like Louis Pasteur. He proposed that microorganisms were responsible for many diseases. However, the recognition of disease-causing agents also brought optimism because knowledge of these agents meant they could be controlled. Various compounds were used as medicines, some of which were toxic and ineffective. This era saw the development of vaccines, with the term "vaccin" used for all vaccines, not just the one created by Jenner for smallpox. Research into vaccines often started with animals, as experimenting on animals was less controversial than experimenting on humans.

Pasteur's ideas initially faced controversy, but over time, vaccines were developed for various diseases like fowl cholera, anthrax, rabies, and more. This confirmed the germ theory of disease, showing that microorganisms caused diseases. The importance of vaccination for public health and the economy became clear.

Around the same time, Robert Koch developed techniques for growing bacteria in agar cultures, thanks to further refinements by Julius Richard Petri. This allowed scientists to study various bacteria, revealing a wide microbial diversity. And in 1892, the first virus, the tobacco mosaic virus, was isolated, paving the way for further research.

Natural history played a crucial role in understanding diseases. Scientists discovered that mosquitoes transmitted diseases like yellow fever and malaria, which led to efforts to control these diseases by eradicating mosquitoes. However, despite the complexities of the microbial world, health specialists focused on practical disease control rather than evolutionary aspects.

Texas cattle fever was successfully tackled by understanding that ticks were responsible for its transmission. The research showed that an infectious disease could depend on an intermediate host, leading to the importance of eradicating ticks rather than developing a vaccine for the disease.

The Twentieth Century
Vernon Kellogg was a prominent figure in the late 1800s and early 1900s, challenging traditional Darwinism. He argued for the need for a new theory to explain how organisms adapt to their environments more promptly. Kellogg disagreed with Darwin's idea that adaptation traits must exist in low numbers before environmental changes occur.

Kellogg proposed that new species originate through geographic isolation followed by natural selection acting on variations within the population. However, his views on pathogen-host systems had contradictions. While he believed in selection's role in evolution, he also thought host-specific parasites should always indicate geographic speciation. He resolved this by suggesting that parasites are highly adapted to their hosts, shielded from natural selection by the uniformity of the host's environment.

Kellogg categorized parasite-host relationships based on geography and host dependency, including cases of closely related parasites and hosts in separate areas (attributed to genealogy), parasites and hosts from different regions (with only hosts evolving into new species due to environmental differences), and parasites on unrelated hosts in the same area, challenging geographic isolation theories.

Orthogeneticists believed parasites were highly specialized and entirely reliant on hosts, focusing on host-specific parasites to uncover mechanisms of parasite-host relationships and emphasizing "true" or obligate parasites responding exclusively to the host's environment.

Heinrich Fahrenholz suggested that the presence of the same or related parasites on different host species could reveal host relationships, arguing that parasites were as dependent on hosts as free-living organisms were on their habitats, leading to parallel host and parasite phylogenies.

In this era, Neo-Darwinians primarily studied interactions between specific pathogens and hosts within their environments, focusing on understanding the adaptations enabling pathogens to thrive in their specific niches. This approach, influenced by Kellogg's Neo-Darwinian vision, emphasized narrow adaptations to specific environments, unveiling these adaptations and explaining their evolutionary development. This shift recognized the pivotal roles of both pathogens and hosts in understanding the evolution of pathogen-host relationships.

This perspective was evident in studies of plant-phytophagous insect interactions, which displayed strong host specificity without clear patterns based on host relatedness or geographic distribution. This realization shifted the focus of evolution away from individual host species to common traits shared by host species.

Around the same time, Dutch biologist Émile Verschaffelt's discovery of the chemical basis of plant odor influenced insects' choices of host plants for feeding and laying eggs. Insects were attracted to specific host plant traits rather than nutritional value. American entomologist Charles Thomas Brues further supported this idea by noting that certain conservative traits in host plants were primary attractions for phytophagous insects.

Vincent Dethier expanded on this work, highlighting the role of plant chemicals in attracting or repelling insects. These chemical features, he argued, could be widespread among plant species, contributing to ecological specialization.

Neo-Darwinians and orthogeneticists both acknowledged that changes in behavior could lead to new selections and the emergence of traits. However, they had different interpretations of how ecological specialization influenced evolution. This diversity of perspectives is common in science when researchers agree on observations but differ in interpretations due to the lack of a definitive method for reconstructing evolutionary history.

The first half of the 20th century witnessed significant developments in disease research and public health. The "medicate, vaccinate, eradicate" approach became established to address diseases affecting a growing human population. Alexander Fleming's 1928 discovery of penicillin revolutionized medicine, spurring the search for other natural substances to combat diseases. Chemistry's industrial application allowed for the identification and improvement of antibiotics like chloroquine.

In the 1920s, researchers began applying population genetics concepts, particularly in veterinary medicine, to health issues. They observed that the presence of a pathogen in a host population did not always lead to disease outbreaks. Not everyone fell ill, and outbreaks were sporadic. This suggested that immune individuals within a host population might prevent the pathogen from persisting indefinitely.

In 1923, researchers studying livestock health introduced the term "herd immunity." They realized it had both positive and negative aspects. On the positive side, deadly diseases that spread quickly tended to burn out rapidly. On the negative side, failing to maintain the required immunity level in a population could lead to periodic and intensified disease returns.

Natural immunity in a population decreased without regular epidemics to eliminate non-immune individuals. To maintain high immunity, vaccination became crucial, coinciding with the increasing complexity and cost of vaccine production.

Mass vaccination efforts successfully controlled foot-and-mouth disease in Europe, but it persists in parts of Asia and Africa. Developing a yellow fever vaccine, initiated in 1912, took 25 years and relied on a chance virus mutation. Despite luck playing a role, this success encouraged vaccine development for various diseases.

Research on insect-transmitted diseases like malaria and yellow fever expanded after the discovery of ticks transmitting Texas cattle fever. Disease control meant eradicating the responsible ticks. Meanwhile, vaccine use against bovine tuberculosis declined as systematic infected cattle slaughter proved more effective.




Our relationship with pathogens
Parasites carry information about their hosts' behaviors, ecological niches, and historical connections, often referred to as "parascript." However, deciphering this complex information remained a formidable challenge. Geographers and orthogeneticists encountered difficulties related to host specificity and ecological factors in pathogen-host interactions. They lacked objective methods to reconstruct phylogenies and validate their hypotheses, leading to circular reasoning and hindering progress.

By this time neo-Darwinism had already assimilated some elements of the geographers' and orthogeneticists' frameworks. While geographic isolation was acknowledged as a key driver of species divergence, natural selection took center stage in mainstream evolutionary biology.

The transition toward a coevolutionary perspective, notably championed by Paul Ehrlich and Peter Raven in their work on plant-insect interactions, was gradual and did not immediately extend to the study of pathogen-host systems. This delayed the fusion of evolutionary biology with the field of infectious disease.

During this period, the medical community focused predominantly on empirical and technological advancements. Advanced culturing techniques and genetic analysis laid the foundation for contemporary studies of pathogen evolution. Concerns arose regarding pathogen resistance to antibiotics and the development of vaccines for diseases like polio and rubella. While breakthroughs were celebrated, the challenges in producing vaccines became increasingly apparent.

In the 1960s and 1970s, the concept of herd immunity gained prominence as a strategy to control disease outbreaks through mass vaccination programs. However, this approach presented hurdles, as achieving widespread vaccine production required advanced manufacturing capabilities, which only became available after World War II. Furthermore, delivering vaccines at the necessary scale for herd immunity in impoverished regions posed financial challenges. And unfortunately, the cost of vaccine production did not decrease substantially despite technological advancements.

This era witnessed a shift from dealing primarily with existing pathogens to addressing emerging diseases. Global commerce facilitated the movement of pathogens to new regions, where some of them successfully adapted to new hosts, making eradication efforts challenging. 

Efforts to combat disease led to large-scale campaigns aimed at eliminating environments suitable for pathogen transmission or their vectors. DDT was initially used effectively to control disease-transmitting insects, but its indiscriminate use caused ecological damage and led to its ban in 1972. This highlighted the conflict between disease control and ecosystem preservation.

Until the late 20th century, studying the evolution and interactions of diseases with their hosts presented significant challenges. Researchers lacked a clear method for constructing phylogenetic trees (family trees) of disease-causing microorganisms based on robust evidence, impeding the study of microbial evolution. Although molecular biology advances provided data for constructing microbe family trees, a method for interpretation was required.

The foundation for such a method had long existed in the practices of numerous taxonomists. However, it was German entomologist Willi Hennig who formally articulated an objective approach to reconstruct these family trees. This method involved analyzing observable characteristics of organisms independently of any theories about their origins, offering a potent tool for the study of evolution. Phylogenetic trees, which depict species relationships, became indispensable in various evolutionary investigations.

In 1979, the scientific community engaged in discussions about two aspects of parasite evolution that could be explored through family trees. The first was "cospeciation," where parasites and their hosts coevolve. In cases of cospeciation, the family trees of parasites and hosts closely align, indicating a tight association. Nevertheless, this similarity may not provide detailed insights into the mechanisms of coevolution, as it could stem from shared geographic isolation or other factors.

The "maximum cospeciation perspective" aimed to unite geographical and inherent evolutionary approaches in studying disease evolution. It suggested that parasites were highly specialized for specific hosts, closely tracking host evolution. At that time, finding evidence of cospeciation was prioritized over explaining the mechanisms.

However, comparing the family trees of pathogens and hosts revealed limited cospeciation evidence. Pathogens didn't always evolve in tandem with their hosts, and geographic distribution alone couldn't explain the patterns due to episodic isolation events and interregional movement.

Coaccommodation, focuses on how pathogens and hosts evolve together. Researchers in this field aim to understand how pathogens develop new associations with hosts and how this impacts their traits. To do this, they need to distinguish between two types of associations: those formed through descent and those formed through colonization.

Genealogical information from organisms themselves can provide insight into their past. Because of this, two models of coaccommodation have emerged. 

The first is called resource tracking or sequential colonization. When a pathogen attempts to colonize a new host, several outcomes are possible: it may fail, successfully colonize by finding the same resources as its ancestral host, diverge evolutionarily while on the new host, or colonize a host with a new resource. If the pathogen already possesses traits to use the new resource, it may establish itself on the new host. If it further speciates, a new pathogen species using the new resource emerges. 

A specific case is called phylogenetic tracking, where a new host species evolves, characterized by an evolved form of the required resource. The pathogen associated with the ancestral host colonizes this new host, and some of its individuals adapt to the new resource, eventually forming a new pathogen species. For this to happen, the ancestral host species must persist after the speciation event.

The second class of models revolves around coevolutionary arms races, which are refinements of earlier coevolution models. They assume that coevolving associations are maintained through mutual adaptive responses. In these models, pathogens harm their hosts, leading to the evolution of host defenses. In response, some pathogens evolve counterdefenses. If these counterdefenses provide advantages, they spread within the pathogen species, allowing them to infect hosts more effectively.

Despite the concept of cospeciation being less common than expected, many pathogen-host associations are established when pathogens switch or add new hosts. Most pathogens have a narrow host range, often limited to a single host species. Understanding how pathogens evolve by changing hosts while maintaining specialized associations requires investigating whether certain traits persist across associations. Some traits are phylogenetically conservative and remain consistent through changes in host associations.

In the field of coaccommodation, the term "ecological fitting" has been used to describe cases where pathogens associate with different hosts in different locations, suggesting that while pathogens may be ecologically specialized, they have flexibility in host use. The idea of "evolutionary anachronisms" refers to ancestral traits that no longer serve their original function due to extinction but persist in a species' traits, and may also have a role in some host-parasite relationships.

Many pathogens don't stick to just one host, and they often change hosts. However, most pathogens are associated with only a few host species. So, how can they have such limited host ranges yet change hosts? The traits that allow pathogens and hosts to have specialized associations must somehow be related to how they switch hosts. This suggests that these traits must be unique to each time they change hosts.

To investigate this, we can ask whether any of these specializations persist when they switch hosts. In other words, do these traits stay the same even when the host changes? It seems that some of these traits do remain consistent. For example, when we think of "malaria," we immediately associate it with "mosquitoes" (transmission dynamics) and "blood cells" (microhabitat preference), even if we don't specify the exact malaria species, host, or location.  

In 1980, Dan Janzen raised an important question: when can we call the relationship between pathogens and hosts "coevolution"? He pointed out that just because pathogens and hosts are closely associated doesn't necessarily mean they've evolved together. Later, he introduced the term "ecological fitting" to describe cases where a pathogen is associated with one host in one place and a different one in another place. Janzen believed that while most pathogens may be specialized for certain environments, they still have some flexibility in their choice of hosts.

This can also be seen in the case of insect-plant relationships. The complex relationship between plants and insects can be traced back to the Verschaffelt-Dethier school of thought. 

The Verschaffelt-Dethier school recognized that plants produce various chemicals as part of their natural defense mechanisms or for other ecological purposes. These chemicals can have different effects on insects that come into contact with them.

One key idea of this school of thought was that some chemicals produced by plants act as attractants to certain insects, drawing them towards the plant. In contrast, other chemicals act as repellents, deterring insects from feeding on or laying their eggs on the plant. Insects that are attracted to plant chemicals they can metabolize have an easier time making decisions about where to find food and suitable places to lay their eggs. In contrast, insects that are repelled by noxious plant chemicals face greater challenges in these decisions.

The Verschaffelt-Dethier school suggested that these chemical interactions between plants and insects played a crucial role in the evolution of insect traits. Insects that could metabolize or detoxify plant chemicals had an advantage and were more likely to survive and reproduce, passing on their advantageous traits to their offspring.

They understood that the chemicals produced by plants could attract some insects while repelling others. Insects that liked the scent of certain plant compounds could easily find food and places to lay their eggs, while those repelled by these compounds had a tougher time. This led to the evolution of detoxification mechanisms in some insects to cope with noxious plant compounds. 

But when it comes to pathogens and hosts, we wonder how they can keep up constant conflicts, as suggested by coevolutionary arms races. Wouldn't it be simpler for them to just avoid each other if one becomes harmful to the other? This idea aligns with the concept that evolution tends to take the path of least resistance, aiming to resolve conflicts rather than intensify them.

To understand this better, we need to analyze how ecological specialization evolves. By the early 1980s, researchers started using phylogenies to connect ecological specialization with traits that remained consistent over time. They found that many functional traits, including those related to how pathogens spread and where they thrive, tend to stay the same within certain groups of species. This supports the idea that the right adaptations existed before they were needed, a concept in line with Darwin's thinking.

A theory known as the geographic mosaic theory of coevolution (GMTC) emerged to explain these evolving patterns. It suggests that specialists and generalists exist in the world, and coevolution mainly involves specialists. GMTC proposes that specialists can evolve from generalists and that geography plays a crucial role in this process. For instance, a generalist parasite can encounter multiple hosts in different locations, leading to the development of specialist parasites for each host. Similarly, when a pathogen is limited to one host but that host is geographically isolated, different populations of the host species can undergo diverse selection pressures, leading to coevolution within these populations. However, the GMTC doesn't necessarily require both sides (pathogen and host) to evolve reciprocally.

The phylogenetics revolution didn't provide a new theory for pathogen-host evolution but raised questions about existing theories. It's puzzling how associations can be so specialized that they require pathogens and hosts to be in close geographic proximity for long periods while still allowing them to switch hosts and expand their ranges, as observed in most pathogen-host studies. Phylogenetic studies show that specialized traits are both highly specific and remain consistent over evolutionary time.

This paradox opens up opportunities for further exploration and understanding. The parasite paradox is a puzzling situation where parasites, which are typically considered specialized in their ecological roles, show some unexpected patterns:

Specialists vs. Generalists: While we expect specialized parasites to evolve from more adaptable generalists, there are more specialists in nature. This contradicts the idea that specialists should be rare.

Emerging Diseases: Some diseases are emerging more rapidly than expected, suggesting that parasites are developing the ability to infect new hosts faster than random genetic mutations can explain.

Changing Hosts: Studies comparing the evolutionary history of parasites and their hosts often reveal frequent changes in host preferences, which seems at odds with the idea of parasites being highly specialized.

This paradox is especially relevant when it comes to understanding and responding to emerging diseases, which have significant negative impacts on human health. We initially expected parasites to be so specialized that they would have a hard time switching to new hosts, and that coevolutionary processes with their existing hosts would provide a strong barrier against emerging diseases. However, this expectation doesn't align with the reality of increasing disease emergence.

To tackle this paradox and effectively respond to emerging diseases, we need to integrate various perspectives and theories. This challenge requires us to rethink our existing ideas, invest in research and technology, and develop a new paradigm for understanding and managing emerging diseases. Simply put, we need a fresh approach to address the growing problem of emerging diseases.

New partnerships, including support from the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, have been formed to develop antiparasitic drugs. However, these can be too costly. For example, developing a new antimalarial drug in 2005 cost about $300 million with a 50 percent failure rate, which is not sustainable.

Vaccination efforts faced challenges too. Developing new vaccines became slower and more expensive due to the complexity of emerging pathogens. Mass vaccination programs were often too costly for poor countries, and wealthy nations saw little reason to invest in them.

Efforts to destroy disease-transmitting elements of biodiversity have had some success, like eradicating rinderpest and controlling foot-and-mouth disease. However, this approach conflicted with climate change and biodiversity protection goals. Despite these challenges, eradication became more attractive, even if it faced public criticism.


Pathogen and Host Evolution
Darwin's original ideas were sometimes criticized and seen as outdated by modern thinkers. Many discussions about evolution centered around Darwin's "On the Origin of Species" as the foundation of neo-Darwinism, which simplifies evolution into "variation, selection, adaptation."

Darwin believed that evolution resulted from the interaction between two causal agents, the nature of the organism and the nature of the conditions (environment). He emphasized that organisms produce offspring, which are not identical, and that they act in their own interest. This autonomy from environmental conditions leads to a struggle for survival and a necessary misfit between organisms and their environments.

Darwin understood that organisms varied in their ability to cope with their surroundings, leading to a struggle for survival. Natural selection was a consequence of this struggle, not the ultimate law. It eliminated less well-adapted variants, but it was not the higher law; rather, it resulted from the conditions of existence, including the nature of organisms and the environment.

Darwin's perspective was that organisms had to survive in changing environments, not just in current conditions. This view highlights the importance of adaptation to changing circumstances.

Darwin's "higher law" refers to the overall governing principles of existence, which he defined as the interactions between the nature of organisms and their environmental conditions. His view emphasized that living systems take their past history with them and that much of their characteristics and functions are shaped by their evolutionary past. The concept of phylogeny, or the evolutionary tree, helps explain why similar species can exist in different environments.

Twentieth-century biologists sought more direct and heroic explanations for evolutionary processes, sometimes departing from Darwin's more nuanced view. However, none of these variations on the evolutionary framework anticipated the challenges posed by emerging diseases.

In a Darwinian system, life's abilities come from the information passed down through generations. This inheritance makes living things have a historical aspect. They can reproduce, grow, and live, leading to both differences and similarities among individuals. Even though each of us is unique, we share common features with our family members, some of which have been around for a very long time. 

Inherited information also plays a crucial role in sustaining life. Organisms use this information to interact with their surroundings, obtaining the necessary resources to survive. It determines what materials and energy they require and how they acquire them, even in challenging conditions. 

Inherited information enables organisms to both exploit and explore. They extract what they need from their environment while also discovering and adapting to new conditions. This duality is a fundamental characteristic of life, and organisms can switch between these behaviors as needed.

Evolutionary and ecological explanations for traits that serve specific functions usually focus on efficiency in resource utilization, which helps in survival. However, these explanations have a limitation: if an organism becomes too specialized in its needs and abilities, it may face extinction when environmental conditions change. Life, as we understand it, must be adaptable to changes, both small and large. 

Ecological fitting, which refers to how well an organism fits into its environment, is crucial in this context and helps us understand how pathogens can have specific lifestyles but still adapt to new conditions and hosts. Ecological fitting involves three types of phenomena. 

Co-option is when an existing structure takes on a new function, often because two organs initially performed the same task. This process allows for evolutionary transitions without the need to create entirely new structures. Traits that serve no apparent purpose at first can eventually become important for survival when organisms encounter new environments or develop new habits. These traits, which Darwin referred to as "complex laws of growth" or "mysterious laws of the correlation of parts," can evolve to become essential.

The idea of preadaptation, which means that traits can be useful in new situations without the need for new structures to evolve, led to some confusion in the past. It was proposed that certain traits could serve new functions by co-opting existing useful traits. This concept evolved over 30 years and was extended to include the co-option of traits to serve new purposes.

Early geneticists, inspired by Gregor Mendel, studied how hereditary units functioned. Some believed that adaptation was accidental due to random mutations, which led to a paradox. If adaptation was random, why did it seem so well-suited to the environment? This paradox remained unanswered.

Neo-Darwinians disagreed on preadaptation. Some dismissed it, while others saw the potential for individuals preadapted to enter new niches and eventually give rise to new species.

The term "preadaptation" had a problem because it implied a direction or purpose in evolution, which wasn't accurate. Predicting a trait's future based on its current state is challenging, as natural selection operates in the present with hindsight revealing its effects. Stephen J. Gould and Elisabeth Vrba introduced the concept of "exaptation" to eliminate the idea of evolutionary foresight.  

Persistent traits being co-opted for new functions are common in interspecies associations. This concept also applies to understanding the origins of pathogen-host systems. Hosts likely existed before pathogens, and co-option of preexisting traits may have allowed them to become pathogens.

For instance, parasitic flatworms share life-history traits with their free-living relatives, suggesting that they don't have specialized traits for parasitism but rather co-opted existing traits to thrive in a host-parasite context. This process of co-option likely set the stage for the diversity of trematodes and tapeworms in the Neodermata group.

Phylogenetic Conservatism
In the context of evolution, inherited traits tend to exhibit a degree of stability and do not undergo drastic changes over time. Herbert Ross, noted that certain insect groups displayed infrequent major changes in traits related to their habitats or behaviors. This infrequency suggests that evolutionary changes occur less frequently than the gradual process of species evolving over extended periods. Consequently, species often adhere to established traits that prove advantageous, and when changes do occur, they may not always follow predictable patterns.

This concept of conservatism in evolution has implications for the diversity of relationships between parasites and their hosts. Closely related parasite species can share similar traits, even if they inhabit different environments or utilize different host species. A notable example is malaria, consistently transmitted by mosquitoes worldwide. This consistency arises from the conservative nature of evolution, where various mosquito species inherit this ability from a common ancestor. While this conservation enables a unified approach to combat malaria, it also presents certain drawbacks.

Evolutionary conservatism fosters ecological similarities between species, allowing for the replacement of different species without drastically altering ecosystems. This is akin to how the introduction of rabbits from one region to another with similar species can lead to competition due to shared biological traits stemming from a common ancestor. A parallel can be drawn with how malaria affects different hosts.

Additionally, the persistence of evolutionary anachronisms, traits that originated in the past but remain relevant today, has its significance. These traits serve as reminders of past environmental conditions and can confer survival advantages if similar conditions resurface. Given the slow pace of change in inherited traits, anachronistic traits endure even as the environment undergoes rapid transformations.

Some scientists used to think that pathogens could only survive on a few ideal hosts and that they would die off if they couldn't find them. This idea made it seem like pathogens had to produce a massive number of offspring in the hope that a few would find the right host.

But plasticity changes the rules of this host-finding game in favor of the pathogens. As Darwin suggested, natural selection favors those who can't find their preferred host, yet are still capable of surviving. Survival is essential in evolution, even if it doesn't mean thriving. Pathogens that can survive in less-than-perfect hosts are good examples of this adaptability. So, plasticity allows pathogens to deal with situations when their preferred host isn't available.

The capabilities of organisms and the opportunities they have depend on their nature and the conditions they face. Think of it as the abilities of a player in a game and the circumstances in which they play. How well an organism survives depends on how its abilities match the environment it's in. However, having the right abilities doesn't guarantee survival because both abilities and environments have limits.

We can think of the entire playing field as "function space." Each species uses only a small part of this space because they have specific traits inherited from their ancestors. This defines how they interact with their environment.

Within function space, there's a smaller area called "fitness space." This is where organisms with the right traits survive and reproduce. Others with different traits have no place here. Organisms produce more offspring than fitness space can support. Some traits are better suited to specific environments, but not everything is optimal. This allows for variation, and organisms can explore new possibilities when conditions change.

Sometimes, conditions in fitness space change due to environmental shifts. If selection was too strict, species would go extinct. But because of variation and exploration, some offspring adapt and survive. Fitness space is not rigidly defined. It's a bit "sloppy," meaning it can accommodate different traits. This sloppiness is crucial for coping with changes in the environment. It also leads to the evolution of new traits and species.

The environment is full of opportunities. When new species evolve, they create new opportunities for other species, including pathogens (disease-causing organisms). This is why we have so many different pathogens on Earth. Recent research has shown that fitness space is indeed more extensive than the specific areas where organisms thrive. This supports the idea that nature allows for flexibility and adaptation.

Organisms have certain abilities, and the world they live in offers various opportunities. Survival depends on how well their abilities match the environment. The environment isn't fixed; it can change, and sloppy fitness space allows for adaptation and the emergence of new possibilities. This adaptability ensures the diversity of life on our planet.

When we look at how pathogens survive and interact with hosts, it's like studying a game. But instead of players, we have pathogens, and instead of a game board, we have the world they live in.  

We often study how pathogens and hosts evolve together. They depend on where they are and what hosts are around. We call this the "opportunity space" for pathogens.

A pathogen's "fitness space" is like its playing field. It's made up of where it can live, the hosts it can infect, and how it spreads. Fitness space can be a bit messy because of two things. First, geography and hosts are not evenly spread out. Second, pathogens are more focused on surviving where they are than exploring new places.

Geography determines where hosts live and where pathogens can spread. We can figure this out by looking at where pathogens are now and where similar conditions exist on Earth. This helps us understand their fitness space.

Pathogens have to move between hosts to survive. We need to find places where the right conditions exist for this movement. If we know how pathogens spread, we can find these places. By using ecological niche modeling, we can map out the fitness space for a pathogen.

Hosts are essential for pathogens because they provide the resources needed to survive and reproduce. Some hosts share similar resources because they come from the same family tree. Others have unique resources specific to them.

Host resources fall into four categories. First, some resources are unique to a single host species (like a special trait only one host has). Second, resources can be shared by a group of closely related hosts (like a family trait passed down through generations). Third, resources can be ancient traits shared by a group of hosts but not inherited from a common ancestor. Lastly, some resources evolve independently in different host species.

When pathogens and hosts evolve together, it's called "cospeciation." But sometimes, we don't see a perfect match between their evolutionary trees. This is where "cophylogeny analysis" comes in. It helps us understand how pathogens adapt to different hosts over time. Cospeciation can be tricky because it assumes a one-to-one match between pathogens and hosts. But in reality, things are more complex. So, we use cophylogeny analysis to estimate how pathogens might adapt to different hosts.

In the context of game theory, the study of pathogen survival and host interactions can be seen as a strategic game. The pathogens and hosts are the players, and the "opportunity space" represents the playing field where they make decisions.

In game theory, players aim to maximize their payoffs. In this scenario, a pathogen's "fitness space" can be thought of as its set of possible payoffs. It includes where it can live, which hosts it can infect, and how effectively it can spread. The fitness space is like the pathogen's potential rewards.

Geography plays a critical role in defining the game board. It determines the location of hosts and sets the boundaries for the game. Players (pathogens) need to make strategic moves across this board to find and infect hosts.

The pathogens' strategies involve moving across the geographic landscape to find suitable hosts. Understanding how pathogens spread is akin to analyzing the players' strategies in the game. Ecological niche modeling helps identify the strategic moves available to pathogens.

Hosts provide essential resources for pathogens' survival and reproduction. In game theory terms, these host resources can be seen as valuable assets or resources that players (pathogens) need to obtain to increase their payoffs.

Pathogens that can adapt to different hosts gain an advantage in the game. This adaptability ensures their survival and success, even when faced with changing conditions, similar to how strategic flexibility is valuable in competitive games.

Some people find comfort in the idea that every species has a perfect place in the world. However, in reality, if conditions change, the species that used to fit perfectly may go extinct.

The concept of 'sloppy fitness space' helps explain this. It means that there's always room for species to adapt and change. But this also means that predicting a species' future behavior based on its past is challenging. Pathogens, in particular, can surprise us when conditions change.
Ecological Fitting
The concept of ecological fitting relates to how living organisms adapt and thrive in their specific environments. It encompasses the idea that these organisms possess certain traits that can be modified or adjusted when the right conditions or opportunities present themselves. Think of it as nature's way of allowing species to 'level up' when the circumstances are favorable.

On the other hand, 'opportunity' refers to the vast array of places and conditions on Earth where these traits can lead to successful living. It's a broader concept than just the actual locations where specific species are typically found. When we say that an opportunity is extensive, we mean that there's a lot of room for various traits and adaptations to work effectively.

The dynamic interaction between ecological fitting and the wide-ranging opportunities available in an environment plays a crucial role in shaping how organisms evolve over time. Sometimes, specific traits act as 'filters,' meaning they limit the range of places where a species can successfully live. In other instances, these traits help a species take full advantage of new and different environments.

Some species tend to focus on exploiting a single niche within their environment. In other words, they specialize in a particular location, host, and mode of survival. These specialized conditions act as filters, promoting strong coevolutionary relationships between the species and their environment. It's like they've found their 'sweet spot' and have fine-tuned themselves to excel there.

On the flip side, some organisms adopt a more exploratory approach. When their environment undergoes changes, they actively seek out new opportunities and attempt to connect with new, favorable conditions. This inclination toward exploration allows these species to expand their range and become more versatile in terms of their survival strategies. They are the 'adventurers' of the natural world.

So, think of living organisms as oscillators, constantly switching between specialization and adaptation based on the ever-changing world around them. The interplay between their inherent traits and the environmental conditions they encounter plays a pivotal role in shaping the course of their evolution.

This ongoing process of adaptation and exploration is nature's way of ensuring that species remain resilient and capable of thriving in a world that is constantly evolving. It's a delicate balance that hinges on the flexibility and inherited traits of organisms, ensuring that they can navigate and succeed in a world full of opportunities.

Ecological fitting plays a crucial role in how species adapt and succeed in their environments. This concept revolves around the idea that when specific environmental cues and resources become widely available, organisms can develop specialized traits or capabilities. This adaptation allows them to excel in their surroundings.

One of the fundamental aspects of this process is exploration. When particular environmental factors or resources are abundant, or when traits can serve multiple purposes, it creates an opportunity for organisms to specialize and adapt while retaining the ability to form new associations. Moreover, exploration paves the way for the evolution of new abilities. For example, many pathogens possess the capacity to survive and thrive on hosts different from their typical ones.

To illustrate this concept further, let's delve into an example involving the giant liver fluke, scientifically known as Fascioloides magna. This parasite primarily affects various species of ungulates, including livestock and deer, in North America, where it takes up residence in their livers. Its life cycle is intricately linked with snails and aquatic vegetation. Despite its specialization, this parasite can successfully thrive in different geographical locations due to the widespread availability of the specific ecological conditions it requires.

Ecological fitting and exploration are pivotal mechanisms that enable organisms to adapt and flourish in different environments. They empower species to develop specialized traits while retaining the capacity to colonize new areas when favorable conditions arise. The investigation of frog parasites serves as a compelling illustration of how the specific traits of both hosts and parasites influence their interactions across diverse ecosystems.

What makes these parasite communities, which live in various hosts in different places, similar? Surprisingly, they share a fundamental similarity. They are organized based on specific and unchanging characteristics inherited by both the hosts and parasites. These characteristics are so influential that they shape the community structure regardless of the environmental conditions. Whether it's in the temperate forests and grasslands, tropical dry forests, and tropical wet forests, the pattern remains the same.
The Oscillation Hypothesis of Parasite-Host Interactions
When studying pathogen evolution, we focus on two critical factors: their adaptation to existing hosts and their potential to explore new opportunities with unfamiliar hosts. We need to delve deeper into how they acquire these abilities, uncover hidden capabilities, and understand how these factors play out when they encounter new chances.

When opportunities are scarce, pathogens tend to maximize what's available because exploring uncharted fitness spaces often doesn't yield favorable results. Conversely, when opportunities are abundant, pathogens tend to evolve by exploring new fitness space, often leading to success.

The ratio of successful space to the total available space determines if pathogens become specialists or generalists, and this can change over time as the environment evolves.

The Oscillation Hypothesis suggests that species, groups of organisms with common traits, exhibit oscillating behavior due to individual organisms' tendencies to oscillate. This can result in local changes in the range of hosts a pathogen infects due to fluctuations in environmental conditions. On a larger evolutionary scale, pathogens initially expand their host range as opportunities arise for exploring more fitness space, leading to the emergence of new pathogen lineages, each specializing in a specific niche.

There are four ways in which these oscillations in host range can start: 
By changing the existing trophic structure so that previously hidden but susceptible hosts become accessible, 
Introducing new susceptible hosts to the ecosystem, 
Moving the pathogen to new geographic areas where previously unexposed hosts reside, 
Enhancing the pathogen's capabilities over time through evolutionary changes. 

These factors create opportunities for pathogens to form new associations by broadening their scope within the fitness space, which eventually leads to diversification as they specialize within specific niches.

Complex systems are those where the whole is more than just the sum of its parts. When individual things interact in particular ways, they create complex systems. To understand these systems, we need to grasp how individual members interact based on simple rules. These interactions produce properties that go beyond what we can learn from studying each member individually. For example, we can't predict how traffic flows in a city just by knowing how each person drives. We must consider how multiple drivers, following similar rules, interact in various situations. These system-wide properties, not evident from individual behaviors, are called emergent properties. 

The oscillations in the host range of pathogen species are examples of emergent properties. We can't foresee these oscillations by looking at the behavior of individual pathogens. Similarly, diseases caused by pathogens emerge from the interactions between pathogens and their hosts. We can't predict these diseases by solely studying the properties of the pathogens. This supports the idea that we should study host-pathogen systems as complex systems, focusing on how pathogens interact with their hosts.

Life is complex, with cells forming creatures, creatures forming groups, and groups creating communities. Each level has unique properties from lower-level interactions. Darwinism, explaining species change, is rooted in this complexity, showing that evolution results from organism-environment interactions, influenced by biological history.

Network analysis helps understand complex systems, revealing properties beyond individual elements. These networks store valuable information and exhibit complex behaviors. They show that pathogens can behave differently depending on the host species, challenging fixed categories.

Computer simulations, like agent-based models (ABM), help us understand complex systems. These models simulate individuals with specific characteristics and behaviors, allowing them to interact over generations and reveal complex properties observed in nature.

The insights provided by agent-based models (ABM) and the study of pathogen-host interactions, have potential implications for understanding the emergence and impact of diseases like COVID-19.

COVID-19, caused by the novel coronavirus SARS-CoV-2, is believed to have originated in bats and potentially passed to humans through an intermediate host, possibly a wildlife species at a seafood market in Wuhan, China. ABMs and similar models can help us understand how pathogens like SARS-CoV-2 can jump from animals to humans (zoonotic transmission). By simulating interactions between different host species and pathogens, researchers can identify potential pathways and factors that facilitate such transmission events.

The ability of pathogens to colonize new host species is a critical factor in their spread. In the case of COVID-19, the virus has demonstrated its ability to infect a wide range of hosts, including humans and various animal species. Understanding how a pathogen's host range can expand, as discussed in the text, helps us anticipate and mitigate the risks associated with emerging diseases. This knowledge can inform strategies to prevent future zoonotic events.

The text highlights the role of genetic diversity in pathogen populations and how it relates to their ability to adapt to new hosts. In the case of COVID-19, monitoring the genetic diversity of SARS-CoV-2 is crucial for tracking its evolution and identifying potential variants of concern. ABMs can provide insights into how the virus might evolve in response to selective pressures, such as changes in host populations or interventions like vaccination.

ABMs can simulate the dynamics of disease spread within populations, considering factors like transmission rates, population mobility, and interventions. In the context of COVID-19, these models have been used to assess the effectiveness of public health measures, vaccination campaigns, and travel restrictions. They help policymakers make informed decisions to control the spread of the virus and prevent overwhelming healthcare systems.

The ability of pathogens to colonize new host species, even if they are suboptimal hosts, is a key concept discussed in the text. This has relevance for understanding how viruses like SARS-CoV-2 can infect humans and potentially other animal species. The concept of pathogens exploring new fitness space underscores the importance of ongoing surveillance of zoonotic diseases in both human and animal populations.

They demonstrated that new host species can be integrated easily through ecological adaptation, without the need for new mutations. The key to establishing these new associations relies on the survival of pathogen variants in their original host that then migrated to the new host. After successful colonization, sexual reproduction and mutations created new variants, as expected. This allowed the pathogen population to persist and adapt within the newly colonized fitness space.

Generally, when pathogen species have more diverse variations, they become better at incorporating new host species into their fitness space. However, this relationship is not linear in complex systems. Even when pathogen variation is minimal (meaning the pathogen population is nearly uniform), new hosts can be colonized more often than anticipated. This unexpected finding has significant implications for understanding the emergence of infectious diseases.

On the flip side, continually increasing pathogen population variability doesn't always translate into a corresponding ability to colonize more hosts. There is a limit to this capacity. This capacity to adapt to new host species also increases over time as the pathogen accumulates evolutionary novelties and recombination events. This accumulation of variability mirrors how real species accumulate spontaneous mutations over time, independent of environmental changes.

Continually increasing pathogen variability doesn't always mean a corresponding ability to colonize more hosts. There is a limit to this capacity, which increases over time as the pathogen accumulates changes and recombination events.

Pathogens explore potential fitness space continuously, colonizing suboptimal hosts and persisting, sometimes causing diseases. This challenges our understanding of accidental infections, suggesting many undetermined viral infections may be colonization attempts by new or previously encountered pathogen species.

When a pathogen infects new host species, it undergoes a significant reduction in genetic diversity due to the "founder effect." This process is observed in various viruses when they jump to new host species. For instance, the genetic diversity of viruses like SARS-CoV is more extensive in their original bat hosts than in humans, which are recipients of the virus.

This initial drop in genetic diversity during the establishment of new pathogen populations can pose challenges to public health. The fitness of pathogen variants depends on specific characteristics that allow them to thrive in their host. One of these characteristics is R0, which measures a pathogen's ability to transmit within a population. When R0 is equal to or greater than 1, the pathogen can successfully spread within the host population, but if it's less than 1, colonization fails.

R0 is often referred to as the "basic reproduction number" because it provides a fundamental understanding of a pathogen's potential to spread in an idealized scenario where everyone is susceptible, and no control measures are in place.

It quantifies the transmission potential of a disease. If R0 is greater than 1 (R0 > 1), it means that, on average, each infected person is spreading the disease to more than one other person, indicating that the disease has the potential to become an outbreak or an epidemic. If R0 is less than 1 (R0 < 1), it means the disease is unlikely to sustain transmission within the population, and it will eventually die out.

R0 is influenced by several factors, including the duration of infectiousness, the contact rate between infected and susceptible individuals, and the probability of transmission per contact. For different diseases, these factors vary, and therefore, R0 values differ.
The length of time an infected individual remains contagious is a significant factor. Diseases with longer infectious periods tend to have higher R0 values. The frequency and intensity of interactions between infected and susceptible individuals are essential. Diseases that spread through close contact or in crowded settings often have higher R0 values.

This factor represents the likelihood of disease transmission when an infected person interacts with a susceptible person. Diseases with high transmission probabilities have higher R0 values. The proportion of the population that is susceptible to the disease plays a critical role. If a large portion of the population is susceptible, R0 tends to be higher.

Areas with high population density can facilitate disease transmission, particularly for diseases spread via respiratory droplets or close contact. The presence of immunity, whether through previous infection or vaccination, can reduce the number of susceptible individuals and lower R0.

Human behavior, such as hygiene practices, mask-wearing, and adherence to public health measures, can influence disease transmission and, subsequently, R0. For vector-borne diseases, the efficiency of the vector (e.g., mosquitoes for malaria) in transmitting the pathogen to humans is a critical factor.

Climate and environmental conditions can impact the survival of pathogens and vectors, affecting disease transmission rates. The availability and effectiveness of treatments, vaccines, and public health interventions can reduce the transmission of infectious agents and lower R0.

Some diseases exhibit seasonal patterns of transmission due to factors like temperature and humidity, which can influence R0. Changes in the pathogen's genetic makeup can impact its transmissibility and R0. Factors related to the host population, such as age, genetics, and underlying health conditions, can affect susceptibility and, consequently, R0.

Understanding the value of R0 is crucial for public health officials and epidemiologists. It helps in making decisions about implementing control measures like vaccination, quarantine, and social distancing. If R0 is known and is above 1, then interventions are necessary to reduce transmission and prevent an outbreak.

It's important to note that R0 is not a fixed value for a pathogen but can vary based on the population, environmental conditions, and behaviors of both the pathogen and the host. For example, the R0 of a disease like COVID-19 can vary depending on factors like mask-wearing, vaccination rates, and public health measures.

If any degree of fitness exists, specific pathogen variants can quickly colonize new hosts. The founder effect favors the pathogen variants from the original host that can adapt best to the new host or environment. This means that when opportunities arise for random and unexpected host colonization, we are more likely to see the emergence of diseases. This explains why the same pathogen can infect some hosts commonly but spreads slowly within their populations, while it rarely infects other hosts but rapidly spreads when it does.

Empirical data about emerging infectious diseases (EIDs) support this pattern. Diseases like Ebola, SARS, and influenza in humans, as well as Q fever in goats and cattle, have rapidly spread among new host populations. However, some EIDs, like Hendra viruses, herpes B, and Q fever in humans, struggle to colonize new hosts effectively.

One critical aspect highlighted by the model is the colonization of the edges of the compatibility curve, which represents the fitness of the pathogen-host association. Pathogen variants located at the edges of this curve may not be an ideal fit for the host, but they can still successfully colonize and spread in a new host species. These variants often exhibit high pathogenicity and virulence, causing severe diseases. This scenario is especially relevant for transient associations and may apply to long-term associations as well.

Pathogenicity refers to a pathogen's potential to cause disease in a single host, while virulence measures how much damage the pathogen causes to the host. Pathogens that are highly pathogenic and virulent often exist at the edges of the fitness curve. These variants may not be a good fit for the host, but they can cause severe diseases when they do infect. This is important because it suggests that pathogenicity and virulence are not necessarily indicators of a pathogen becoming an enemy attacking a new host but rather an exploration of its fitness space.

The models suggest that when pathogens move to infect different hosts far away, they might end up on the edges of their adaptability, which can lead to severe outbreaks of diseases. So, it's crucial to study these unusual pathogen types, especially after new diseases appear. These odd variants may come from host species that are quite different from the new host, posing a big worry for deadly epidemics.

When pathogens jump to new hosts, how much they change depends on how similar the old and new hosts are. Over time, the pathogens in the new host might become very different or stay quite similar to the old ones. This process often means that only a small part of the old pathogen population makes the jump, changing which pathogen types are common in the new host. How much the new population of pathogens is different from the old one also depends on how they share genes.

This model challenges the idea that pathogens need to change their genes a lot before they can infect new hosts. When poorly adapted pathogens are rare in the old host, regular ways of studying them might not find these less common types, giving us a wrong idea about their differences and how easily they can infect new hosts. But if some less common types from the old host can infect the new host well, they are more likely to be found when we study them.

When the old host and the new one are very different, only a few of the less common pathogen types from the old host may be able to infect the new one. If we don't study the old population well, we might wrongly think that new types had to appear for the new host to get infected.

These findings are important for controlling pathogens, especially when hosts are moved to new places. In these situations, the pathogen population might be small and not have many types, making it hard to find them using regular checks by health inspectors. This could let them slip through, posing hidden threats to travelers, tourists, crops, animals, and imported goods.

"Propagule pressure", in the context of pathogens, refers to the intensity or quantity of pathogenic agents (such as viruses, bacteria, or other disease-causing microorganisms) introduced into a new environment or population. This concept is crucial for understanding the dynamics of disease spread and outbreaks. Here's an explanation tailored to pathogens:

When a pathogen is introduced to a new population or location, it carries with it a certain number of infectious agents. Propagule pressure in the context of pathogens underscores the significance of the quantity or number of infectious agents introduced. A higher propagule pressure means that a larger number of pathogens are introduced into a new area or population. This can happen through various means, including human travel, migration of infected individuals, contaminated materials, or environmental factors.

The concept suggests that the likelihood of a disease successfully establishing itself in a new environment or population is often positively linked to propagule pressure. In simple terms, the more infectious agents introduced, the higher the chances of at least some of them causing infections and leading to a disease outbreak.

High propagule pressure can result in increased genetic diversity among the introduced pathogens. This diversity can be advantageous for the pathogen because it may enhance its ability to adapt to new conditions, evade host immune responses, or develop resistance to treatments. In the context of infectious diseases, particularly those caused by emerging or novel pathogens, high propagule pressure is often associated with an increased potential for rapid spread and outbreaks. Pathogens with higher propagule pressure are more likely to establish sustained transmission within a susceptible population.

Understanding propagule pressure is critical for public health management and disease control. Efforts to reduce propagule pressure, such as strict quarantine measures, vaccination campaigns, or improved hygiene practices, can be effective in preventing the introduction and spread of infectious diseases.

Scientists and epidemiologists use the concept of propagule pressure to study how diseases emerge and spread in new areas or populations. By quantifying and monitoring propagule pressure, they can assess the risk of disease introductions, predict potential outbreaks, and develop strategies for disease prevention and management.

The abilities of organisms are inherited independently of the availability of suitable environments. This means that more organisms are produced than can survive, and some may end up in less than ideal conditions. The frequent occurrence of diseases when hosts change indicates that pathogens often find themselves in initially unfavorable conditions. These results reaffirm the importance of survival in less-than-ideal conditions, as highlighted by Darwin's theory of evolution.

The scenarios presented by computer simulations align with real-world epidemiological outcomes and provide insights into how emerging infectious diseases (EIDs) can originate through different dynamics of host colonization. These scenarios have implications for disease prevention, mitigation, and control efforts. EIDs can arise through one or a combination of three host colonization dynamics:

1. Continuous colonization by a single pathogen variant, sustained by recurring colonization, when transmission from the new host is challenging. An example is hantaviruses that primarily infect rodents but can cause diseases like hantavirus pulmonary syndrome (HPS).

2. Colonization resulting from one or only a few exposures that produce new pathogen populations capable of persisting in the new host species. Limited contact or low propagule pressure initially reduces the variability of the new population, but reproductive isolation from the original population can lead to differentiation.

3. Multiple colonization attempts that increase the likelihood of establishing a new pathogen population by expanding the number of distinct variants in the new host species. Intense and continuous propagule pressure can result in a few successful colonization events followed by rapid population expansion. 

When pathogens move from one host to another, it doesn't always mean they're stuck there forever. If a pathogen colonizes Host A and then moves to Host B, it can still survive in Host A. This means that colonization can go both ways, from A to B and from B to A. Some call the movement from A to B "spillover" and the reverse, from B to A, "spillback." However, they're essentially two sides of the same coin.

Host colonization is like stepping stones in a river. Hosts are like islands in a vast sea of potential resources for pathogens. Initially, it might seem challenging for a pathogen to reach a distant host, but pathogens have their ways. They accumulate new traits as they adapt to different hosts, expanding their range.

Adding a new host is easier if it's similar to the original host. However, pathogens can also reach dissimilar hosts by colonizing intermediate hosts whose ranges overlap. This is called "stepping-stone host-switching." It allows pathogens to colonize hosts that are quite far from their original host.

Pathogens are resourceful in exploring their surroundings. Sometimes, they encounter hosts that couldn't have been predicted based on simple coevolutionary models. Consider the scenario of an insect pathogen exploring a primate host. Humans mainly live in cities and don't typically eat insects, while primates in forests occasionally consume them.

This scenario allows insect viruses to explore primates as a resource. Over time, the pathogen in the insect population adapts to the primate's frequency of variants, leading to a limited variability of the pathogen in primates. However, continuous sampling of the primate by the pathogen occurs whenever primates ingest insects. This increases the chances that the primate will be exposed to variants capable of colonizing them. This process resembles natural selection, as only capable variants survive and reproduce in primates.

Hunters in the forest, who may consume primate meat, can unknowingly transport the virus from primates to humans. Humans are similar enough to primates as a resource for the virus variants that have been sampled, selected, and amplified by primates. In this example, primates serve as samplers, selectors, amplifiers, and even as ecological bridges, providing opportunities for host colonization that would otherwise be limited.

Using models, we can make educated guesses about how Ebola spreads in Africa. Evidence suggests it may come from fruit bats and insect-eating bats. To find the true source, we need to study all creatures in outbreak areas more thoroughly. Previous research has been limited, but we're pretty sure the virus still exists in these places, though it may not always affect humans due to deaths in native primates or hunted animals.

Now, picture a world where diseases use existing hosts but also keep searching for new ones. This ongoing movement reduces the variety of diseases in newly infected hosts. Over time, these diseases accumulate changes and expand their abilities. The second model suggests that, given enough time, these disease populations that continuously move into new hosts can even become new types of diseases. This cycle continues as long as there are new hosts to infect.

The flu has a similar history. It likely started in birds and moved to pigs, leading to human flu strains. Pigs can carry multiple flu types, and when they get infected with different types simultaneously, it can create dangerous strains. Although these strains don't last long in evolutionary terms, they can cause problems. This ease of flu viruses jumping between hosts raises concerns about the origins and potential dangers of the 1918 Spanish flu, which killed millions.

Just like individual creatures switch between using familiar resources and trying new ones, disease types also go back and forth between specializing in a few hosts and spreading to many. This is due to the interaction between hosts and diseases through ecological fitting.


These cycles happen on both short and long timescales. They are challenging to observe in real-time but become evident through experiments when we expose ourselves to new types of hosts we haven't encountered before. These cycles are more noticeable when we consider the big picture of evolution. They weren't recognized before because the methods used to study them assumed that creatures and diseases usually specialize and evolve together.

These cycles occur when diseases and creatures repeatedly change how they interact with each other. They can create entirely new connections between hosts and diseases and even lead to the emergence of new disease types.

Diseases are highly adaptable, capable of exploring new hosts and using them. Their ability to adapt to different hosts allows them to switch between exploring and using the resources available. This means that even diseases that specialize in a specific host can easily start infecting new types of hosts, especially if their original host is widespread and doesn't change much. In evolutionary terms, these back-and-forth movements in the types of hosts they infect should be visible whenever opportunities arise. So, while we often see changes in conditions as challenges, for diseases, they are chances for survival.

Pathogen Evolution in a Changing Environment

Evolution isn't just about competition for resources; it's also about finding ways for different organisms to coexist. Organisms can adapt to different environments, allowing them to live together. But when the environment remains stable, it becomes crowded with specialized species, which face extinction when things change.

Decreasing connections or isolation encourage specialization and innovation, while increased connections promote generalization through exploration and adaptation. When environmental stability decreases connections, organisms tend to specialize. This leads to oscillations, where changes in conditions alternate between generalization and specialization, fueling evolutionary diversity.

Ecologists have considered this idea for a long time. They thought of dynamic changes as cycles, where certain species would come and go over time, affecting overall diversity.

Philip Darlington, an ecologist, observed insects, especially beetles. His research suggested that new species and traits emerged in "centers of diversification," which expanded and contracted due to environmental changes. New species formed during isolation, and when barriers broke down, expansion and diversity followed. This process applied to islands and mountains, with larger areas having more species.

So, the story of life's diversity isn't just about competition; it's about how organisms adapt to changing conditions and coexist in an ever-evolving world.

Darlington's observations influenced E. O. Wilson, who used "taxon cycles" to describe groups of species affected by short-term changes. These groups expanded and contracted as conditions allowed. Taxon cycles occurred without creating or bringing in new species.

Taxon cycles can affect entire communities and are linked to succession, where species change the environment to the point they can't survive there anymore. New species replace them, taking advantage of the changes. The area may eventually return to its original state, but this process doesn't inherently increase diversity over time.

Wilson, along with Robert MacArthur, developed the equilibrium theory of island biogeography, suggesting that the number of species on an island depends on a balance between species arriving and leaving. Islands can only support a certain number of species, and when that limit is reached, no new species can arrive without displacing an existing one. While interesting, this model mostly overlooks the formation of new species.

Some scientists argued that the creation of new species plays a significant role in biogeography. They suggested that geographic barriers lead to the formation of new species in isolated populations, differing from Darlington's view. Island biogeography and vicariance biogeography complement each other. Island biogeography focuses on species movement, while vicariance biogeography looks at species' origins. Combining both theories could give us a better understanding of how biodiversity evolves.


Islands tend to have fewer species compared to mainland areas due to their smaller size and isolation. Larger islands typically support more species than smaller ones because they offer more habitat diversity and resources.

Islands closer to a mainland source of species tend to have higher species richness because they receive more frequent colonization and immigration events. The equilibrium model of island biogeography suggests that over time, the number of species on an island will reach a dynamic equilibrium where immigration and extinction rates balance, leading to a relatively stable species richness.

Vicariance biogeography explores the distribution of species in relation to historical geological events, particularly the splitting of once-contiguous landmasses by geological processes. It considers the impact of these events on species' distributions and evolutionary history. Key aspects of vicariance biogeography include:

Vicariance biogeography focuses on geological events such as continental drift, tectonic plate movements, and the formation of geographical barriers (e.g., mountain ranges, oceans) that divide previously connected populations. Vicariance events can lead to speciation, where populations on opposite sides of a geographic barrier evolve independently, potentially resulting in the formation of distinct species. This approach often identifies biogeographic regions based on shared geological history and species distribution patterns.

These two biogeographic concepts can be integrated to provide a more comprehensive understanding of how species disperse, evolve, and adapt to changing environments. 

Islands themselves can be influenced by vicariance events. For example, islands can form due to geological processes like volcanic activity or continental drift. Understanding the geological history of islands helps explain their current biodiversity.

Islands are natural laboratories for studying speciation. When a new island is formed (e.g., through volcanic eruptions), it creates isolated habitats where populations can diverge and eventually form new species. Island biogeography principles can be applied to understand colonization patterns of species on newly formed islands. The distance from a mainland source and island size can influence which species are more likely to colonize and establish populations.

In 1979, Terry Erwin, an expert in beetles, introduced the "taxon pulse hypothesis." This idea built upon Wilson's concept of taxon cycles and aimed to explain how species disperse and form new ones over long periods. Taxon pulses are different from taxon cycles because they occur over a long time and involve expanding into new suitable habitats when barriers break down. This can lead to different outcomes for species, like some becoming restricted to certain areas, some spreading widely, or even the creation of new species due to barriers.

It refers to a relatively rapid appearance of new species or a surge in the population of existing species within a specific taxonomic group. The taxon pulse concept is closely related to the study of macroevolutionary patterns and events in the history of life on Earth.

Taxon pulses typically involve a sudden burst of diversity within a particular group of organisms. This can manifest as the appearance of numerous new species within a relatively short geological timeframe. Taxon pulses are often temporary events, meaning that the increased diversity or abundance is not sustained over long periods. It represents a relatively brief episode in the evolutionary history of that taxon.

These pulses are often associated with significant environmental changes or opportunities. Environmental factors such as climate shifts, habitat availability, or ecological niches becoming vacant can trigger the rapid diversification of a taxon. Taxon pulses are sometimes linked to adaptive radiations, which occur when a group of organisms rapidly diversifies to exploit various ecological niches. For example, following a mass extinction event, survivors may quickly evolve and diversify to fill empty niches.

The evidence for taxon pulses is typically found in the fossil record. Paleontologists analyze fossils of organisms within a particular taxon and look for patterns of rapid diversification or abundance increase.

One classic example of a taxon pulse is the Cambrian Explosion, an event around 541 million years ago when many major animal groups (phyla) appeared in the fossil record within a relatively short geological period. Another example is the Cretaceous Radiation of angiosperms (flowering plants), which led to a significant increase in plant diversity.


Taxon pulses involve repetitive patterns in history, where species have been associated with each other for various durations and arrived under different circumstances. They result in complex combinations of expansion, isolation, and mixing, leading to increased diversity over time. The process alternates between expansion and isolation, creating a diverse community of species.

Changes in the environment can either be specific to certain groups of species or affect entire communities. These changes can make species come closer together or drive them apart in a space where they can thrive, known as fitness space.

Some changes are short-term and local, leading to cycles where species come and go but don't create new ones. This relates to disease emergence on a small scale. When changes are more significant and long-lasting, it leads to both small and large-scale evolution. The "taxon pulse" is a term for how different species take advantage of these significant changes that alter their fitness space, sometimes expanding it and sometimes limiting it. When pathogens encounter new fitness space, they explore and exploit it.

Climate change is one significant source of these environmental changes, and the study of taxon pulses suggests that it has always played a role in shaping biological diversity. This concept is crucial for understanding how diseases can emerge in different environments.

It's essential to note that environmental changes can have both positive and negative effects. While they have driven the incredible diversity of life on Earth, sudden and substantial changes can also pose challenges. In recent history, we've enjoyed relatively stable climate conditions, which have given us a false sense of security. However, as our world undergoes rapid and continuous changes, we must adapt to cope with these natural events.

To deal with the emergence of new diseases, we need to understand what's happening now and why it's happening. To do this, we must look at the evolutionary history of species. Evolution is like a long story made up of many snapshots that become meaningful when we connect them into a continuous narrative. 

What does the taxon pulse concept mean for emerging diseases? 

When environments change, species adapt and explore new areas. Pathogens, which cause diseases, are adept at this. They adjust to changes, often driven by climate shifts, leading to interactions between different species. Pathogens are highly adaptable, and there's much more to learn about them.

For example, consider schistosomes, parasites living in the blood vessels of mammals and birds, causing schistosomiasis, affecting millions of humans.

Schistosomes have a history of expansion and isolation between Asia and Africa. They originated in Asia, moved to Eurasia and eastern Europe, then to African, altering their host preferences along the way. This example shows how the concept of taxon pulses can lead to complex interactions between pathogens and hosts, affecting everything from local disease outbreaks to regional ecosystems.

Many viruses, protists, worms, and arthropods that infect humans came from animals. The concept of taxon pulses helps explain these relationships. But to understand why we have so many pathogens, we need to look at human evolution.

Our ancestors left trees six to eight million years ago, adapting to new environments, becoming skilled hunters, and spreading worldwide. As they moved, they influenced disease dynamics.

Modern humans arrived in the Western Hemisphere 15,000 to 23,000 years ago, interacting with ancient human groups like Neanderthals. This increased disease spread. Humans developed technology and grew in numbers, impacting disease spread. We carried old diseases from Africa and acquired new ones through interaction with environments.

Around 12,000 years ago, during the Holocene or Neolithic period, stable climates led to settlement and agriculture. Domesticating animals for food and companionship increased disease sharing, creating challenges in human disease history.

Diseases tied to our domesticated animals can reveal tales about our food chains, farming centers, and urban growth. Take tapeworms, for instance, a group known as Taenia, which can infect people worldwide. These tapeworms usually reside in meat-eating animals like cats, dogs, hyenas, and bears. Their life cycles involve plant-eating animals before ending up in meat-eaters.

Scientists explored the history of these tapeworms. Initially, they believed these parasites began infecting humans around 15,000 years ago when we started domesticating animals like cows and pigs. However, genetic analysis suggests a longer history, about two to three million years.

Interestingly, these tapeworms didn't come from domesticated animals but from wild ones like lions, hyenas, and bears. Early humans likely got them from consuming prey already infested with these tapeworms. Over time, these parasites adapted to various hosts, including humans.

While the exact origin remains uncertain, it's likely these tapeworms were present in early humans during their transition from plant-eaters to scavengers and active hunters. As humans spread and domesticated animals, they unintentionally carried these tapeworms with them, broadening their distribution.

As our ancient ancestors explored new territories, they encountered different diseases carried by insects and animals. Inadvertently, they introduced these diseases to new regions, leading to the spread of diseases like West Nile virus, chikungunya virus, and Zika virus.

Many other diseases affecting humans and livestock likely had their origins in Africa. For example, river blindness in Africa originally came from cattle. Tuberculosis, caused by Mycobacterium tuberculosis, initially emerged in Africa with our ancestors and later spread across America.  
The effect of human expansion on pathogen evolution
Throughout human history, when we started taming animals and diseases began to spread, they became linked. This began during the Neolithic era, particularly in the last 600 years. It's worth noting that many diseases have ancient origins, connected to Neanderthals, and modern humans.

Some diseases trace back to the Pleistocene and Holocene periods. These include viruses, bacteria, and parasites. Diseases like measles, smallpox, and pertussis likely emerged when humans started domesticating animals in Europe.

As time went on, we started traveling more, and this changed our interactions with different climates and people. We encountered new diseases. Crowded living conditions and immunity also played a role in disease spread.

Things got more complicated during the Middle Ages. Trade, religious journeys, and wars led to the rise of diseases like leprosy, smallpox, measles, tuberculosis, and typhus. Additionally, the Little Ice Age caused health and food problems and ended Norse settlement in Greenland.

One of the most complex diseases in history is the plague, caused by the bacterium Yersinia pestis. It started in Central Asia and spread across the world in multiple pandemics over 5000 years. These pandemics, including the Plague of Justinian and the Black Death, affected millions in Europe. Climate and weather patterns, especially in Eurasia, played a role in plague's return.

Plague outbreaks were linked to climate cycles and involved rodents and fleas, which spread the disease. Infections spread through trade and human movement, and maritime trade brought plague to Europe. Plague also reached North America from southern China and Hong Kong in the early 1900s.

Plague still exists today, but there hasn't been a worldwide outbreak for over a hundred years. In contrast, cholera has caused several global outbreaks due to climate changes and globalization. Cholera, caused by Vibrio cholerae bacteria, first appeared in India in the early 1800s. We are currently in the seventh pandemic, which started in 1961 and infects millions each year.

Cholera tends to appear near the Bay of Bengal, especially during climate events like El Niño. Warmer sea temperatures and changing marine ecosystems help the bacteria thrive. International shipping and tourism also spread the disease.

Diseases affecting our food crops are another threat. Wheat is vulnerable to rust fungi, which can cause big losses. These fungi came from different parts of Eurasia but became a problem with wheat domestication. They spread as humans moved and traded wheat. Efforts to remove barberry, which hosts the fungi, didn't work because the fungi adapt. These fungi can infect various grasses, including wheat, and continue to spread through trade. Nematode parasites also spread worldwide due to livestock movement in agriculture and trade.

All the examples we discussed have a common factor: diseases emerge due to recent climate changes. Diseases like hantaviruses, plague, and yellow fever are sensitive to small climate shifts. For instance, yellow fever's spread in the 19th century in the United States was linked to temperature and humidity changes. Global climate warming affects northern ecosystems, influencing disease transmission.





Understanding Natural Disasters
Natural disasters are extreme events caused by natural forces like floods, hurricanes, tornadoes, volcanic eruptions, earthquakes, tsunamis, and storms. These events pose significant threats to human security, jeopardizing lives, damaging economies, and causing trauma to survivors, their families, and friends. Disasters typically happen suddenly, with a massive impact on the environment and society, occurring within a specific area and having limited duration. However, in the case of droughts, they can develop slowly as resources gradually diminish.

The term 'natural' disaster is somewhat misleading. These events should be called natural hazards because disasters result from the interaction between these natural phenomena and vulnerable human populations. Natural hazards, on their own, don't necessarily lead to disasters. Disasters occur when there are people and assets exposed and vulnerable to these hazards. The UN defines a 'natural' disaster as the consequences of events triggered by natural hazards that overwhelm local response capacity and seriously affect a region's social and economic development. In essence, a disaster is a crisis that presents a risk or potential danger to life or property.

Disasters are classified based on various factors, including the level of damage, the number of casualties, the declaration of a state of emergency, and requests for international assistance. Mega-disasters are those that result in more than 100,000 fatalities. Natural hazards are also classified by their root causes, such as geophysical threats (earthquakes/tsunamis and volcanoes), hydrological threats (floods and landslides), meteorological threats (storms and extreme temperatures), and climatological threats (droughts and wildfires).  

The frequency of disasters has doubled over the past two decades, affecting about 200 million people annually. From 1950 to 1999, disasters caused over 4 million deaths and affected over 4 billion people. Since 2000, they have resulted in an average of 60,000 deaths per year globally, accounting for roughly 0.01% to 0.4% of all deaths. Earthquakes have become the deadliest disasters, causing 55% of deaths. However, flooding remains the most impactful, affecting more people than any other disaster type. Disasters also come at a high cost, with the average 'major' disaster costing around $500 million.


Figure: Source: Number of deaths by type of natural disaster. Hannah Ritchie, Pablo Rosado and Max Roser (2022) - "Natural Disasters". Link


While disasters affect the entire world, they don't impact all regions equally. Asia experiences the most disasters, with 42% occurring there, largely due to its high population density. Latin America and the Caribbean also face a significant number of disasters, leading to numerous fatalities. Notably, some types of disasters, especially climate-related ones like floods and storms, are occurring more frequently due to human-induced environmental changes.


The increase in disasters is not just because there are more natural hazards like floods, hurricanes, and earthquakes. It's also because there are more vulnerable areas in the world now. The number of people affected by disasters has grown because there are more people overall, and many of them live in places where they're at risk when a natural hazard occurs. For example, the number of people living in flood-prone river areas has increased by 114%, and those living along cyclone-exposed coastlines have increased by 192% in the last 30 years. Additionally, more than half of the world's large cities with over 2 million people are at high risk of earthquakes.

To reduce the threat of disasters, we need a sustainable development approach. In the past, the study of disasters focused on how natural hazards affect people. Now, we understand that human activities, like climate change, population growth, and economic development, can make people more vulnerable to disasters. Many disasters are also compound events, meaning one disaster, like an earthquake, can trigger another, like a landslide or fire, causing even more harm.

Human activity often creates conditions for disasters. Societies differ in how well they prepare for natural hazards. Societies that have proper regulations, invest in disaster mitigation, and provide zoning guidelines are better equipped to handle disasters and prevent high casualties. Factors like poverty levels, access to insurance, and healthcare quality also affect a society's resilience to disasters. Where people live, the quality of their buildings, and their access to hazard protection matter too.  

Disasters are a major threat to human security in both developing and developed countries. However, they lead to higher casualties in low-income countries. Deaths, injuries, and displacements decrease as a country's income level rises. Even within wealthy countries, the poorest citizens often suffer the most during disasters. For example, Hurricane Katrina had a devastating impact on the poorest populations in the US. Disasters are more frequent in regions lacking infrastructure to withstand them. Developing countries are often located in disaster-prone areas, and their governments are ill-equipped to respond effectively. Disasters can disrupt basic services, increase crime, reduce education and nutrition, displace millions of people, and push vulnerable populations deeper into poverty, creating enduring poverty traps.

Tropical Storms (Hurricanes, Typhoons, Cyclones, and Floods) are rapidly rotating storms with low-pressure centers, strong winds, and heavy rain. They usually originate over warm tropical oceans. Depending on where they occur, they are called hurricanes, typhoons, or tropical cyclones. Regions at high risk for these storms include Asia and Latin America. Hurricanes can cause extensive damage, primarily through storm surges, flooding, and high winds. Climate change has made hurricanes more intense and slower-moving, leading to increased costs and risks.

Floods happen when water accumulates on usually dry land due to excessive rain, dam breaches, melting snow, or large storms. River floods develop slowly, allowing people time to evacuate, while flash floods can occur suddenly and be very destructive. Floods can disrupt power and clean water supplies, leading to waterborne diseases like cholera. Once the floodwaters recede, areas can be covered in mud and silt, with potential contamination from sewage and pesticides. Floods cause significant economic damage and can disrupt agriculture and infrastructure.

Earthquakes occur when the Earth's crust releases energy, often due to tectonic plate movements along fault lines. The Pacific Ring of Fire is a hotspot for earthquakes, where about 80-90% of them happen. Earthquakes can lead to tsunamis, volcanic activity, and landslides. The destruction caused by earthquakes includes building collapses, mudslides, fires, tsunamis, and floods. They have resulted in significant loss of life over the years, with some years being deadlier than others.

Earthquakes are relatively common in various parts of the world. They can happen in places like the United States, Guatemala, Chile, Peru, New Zealand, Greece, Iran, Turkey, the Philippines, Indonesia, Mexico, Pakistan, India, and Bangladesh. These events occur due to the movement of tectonic plates beneath the Earth's surface.

Iran is prone to earthquakes because it sits between the Eurasian and Arabic tectonic plates, with its capital, Tehran, facing significant risk.
Turkey, with its largest city, Istanbul, located above an active fault line, is also susceptible to earthquakes.
The Philippines and Indonesia, situated along the Ring of Fire, face threats from both volcanoes and earthquakes.

Mexico, positioned atop three major tectonic plates, experiences seismic activity. Mexico City's soft soil amplifies the impact of earthquakes. Earthquakes are especially problematic for developing countries already dealing with poverty. They cost the world an average of $40 billion annually. In 2010, a devastating earthquake in Haiti resulted in around 300,000 deaths, leading to a humanitarian crisis.

Tsunamis can follow earthquakes and cause additional destruction. The 2004 Indian Ocean tsunami, for example, claimed approximately a quarter of a million lives and left many areas struggling to recover.


Volcanic eruptions occur when there is a release of magma, gas, and ash from volcanoes. While not as common as other disasters, volcanic eruptions can be devastating. They can lead to lava flows, ash clouds that affect air travel, and even tsunamis if they happen near the coast. The impact of volcanic eruptions depends on factors like proximity to the volcano, the type of eruption, and the preparedness of the affected area.

Volcanic eruptions occur when molten lava and ash are released from volcanoes. These volcanoes are typically located near the edges of tectonic plates. While the majority of active volcanoes are in the Pacific Ring of Fire, they can be found on all continents.

Latin American and Asian countries are most frequently affected by volcanic eruptions. There are approximately 1,500 active volcanoes globally, with about 50 eruptions annually. Notably, more than 10% of the world's population lives within 100 kilometers of a historically active volcano.

Volcanic eruptions can be explosive or effusive. The former occurs when trapped gases create pressure, leading to explosive eruptions, while the latter involves lava flows. The dangers from volcanoes include pyroclastic flows, avalanches of hot rocks, ash, and toxic gases, as well as volcanic mudflows.

Although volcanic eruptions are generally less destructive than earthquakes and tropical cyclones, they can still result in loss of life and property damage. The deadliest volcanic eruption on record was the 1815 explosion of Mount Tambora in Indonesia, which killed about 10,000 people and caused a "year without summer." More recent eruptions, like the 1982 El Chichón eruption in Mexico, have also claimed thousands of lives.

Disasters often have interconnected effects and can compound each other. For example, storms can trigger landslides, earthquakes can cause tsunamis, and droughts can increase the risk of wildfires and floods.

It's worth noting that improvements in forecasting and early warning systems have helped reduce the number of casualties from some of these disasters. However, climate change is making some of these events more frequent and severe, posing new challenges for disaster management.

Droughts happen when there's very little rainfall over an extended period. They affect soil moisture, crop growth, and water in rivers, aquifers, and reservoirs. Droughts come in various forms with different characteristics, like how severe they are, how long they last, and how often they occur.

These dry spells are slow to start and can get worse over time. They're also more widespread and can happen in different places at different times. Nowadays, we're seeing longer multi-year droughts, which some think are linked to climate change. However, not all countries have the tools to measure drought conditions accurately.

Droughts have many negative effects on the environment and economies. They're among the costliest natural disasters because they cause both direct and indirect losses.

Direct losses hit poor communities hard, especially those relying on farming for income. If droughts reduce water for crops and livestock, it can lead to hunger and suffering. Even wealthier farming regions like southern Africa can suffer from droughts, affecting crop yields and food supply.

Droughts also have indirect costs. They increase the risk of wildfires, harm ecosystems, raise food prices, and can even lead to famine. They can worsen health problems and diseases due to reduced food and water, and they can damage water quality and sanitation. Droughts can force people to leave their homes, leading to migration and displacement. They also reduce water available for industry and hydropower, which affects electricity production.

The impact of droughts isn't always immediately visible, and their effects can last for years. From 1900 to 2016, nearly 12 million people died because of droughts, and millions are affected by them every year.

Disasters and public health
Disasters can have a significant impact on public health. Events like earthquakes and hurricanes can completely disrupt healthcare systems. They can lead to traumatic injuries, sending people to hospitals where disease transmission can occur. Additionally, disasters can wipe out crop production, causing food shortages that make people more vulnerable to infectious diseases.

For example, the 1976 earthquake in Guatemala resulted in 23,000 deaths and 1.5 million people being displaced. Many of these deaths occurred later due to malnutrition and disease. Lack of access to electricity can also be deadly for those relying on medical equipment.

In regions like Africa, Latin America, and Asia, cholera, diarrhea, malaria, and dengue fever outbreaks have been common after major storms.

Exposure to contaminated environments post-disaster makes people more susceptible to infectious diseases. Flooding, in particular, can contaminate drinking water with sewage, leading to waterborne diseases. For instance, severe flooding in China led to an increase in hepatitis infections. After Hurricane Maria in Puerto Rico, flooding led to the spread of leptospirosis, a bacterial blood infection. Contaminated floodwaters after events like the 2004 tsunami and Hurricane Katrina caused bacterial infections.

When disasters destroy sanitation systems, it makes the spread of diarrheal diseases more likely. Poor hygiene, lack of clean water, and contaminated food increase vulnerability to diseases like diarrhea, hepatitis, malaria, and more.

Storms can disrupt the environment, increasing interactions between humans and disease-carrying agents. Heavy rain can boost rodent populations and interactions with humans. Vector-borne diseases like dengue fever can spike after storms, as the recovery phase creates new breeding sites for disease-carrying vectors.

Even droughts can create breeding grounds for diseases like malaria due to desiccated riverbeds trapping pools of water. Displaced people often live in crowded and unsanitary conditions after disasters, which can lead to disease outbreaks. Norovirus, rotavirus, and acute respiratory infections have all seen outbreaks in these conditions.

Disasters and Infectious Diseases
Natural disasters like earthquakes and tsunamis lead to loss of life, not only due to direct injuries but also because they harm the environment. They damage homes, infrastructure (like power, water, and transportation), and spread pollution. This worsens hygiene, which can then lead to respiratory infections and worsen chronic lung diseases for months or even years.

In the decade (1999-2008), more than 7,100 disasters occurred worldwide, causing 1,243,480 deaths and over a billion dollars in damage, according to the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies. In 2005, 42% of the 650 severe natural disasters worldwide happened in Asia, resulting in over 97,000 deaths and affecting 150 million people. In 2006, 174 disasters affected 28 million people in Asia and the Pacific.

In 2008, nine out of the top 10 countries with the highest disaster-related deaths were in Asia. Asia faces an estimated annual average of $39.5 billion in physical losses from disasters. Examples include the 1999 earthquake in Turkey, which caused over 17,000 deaths, and the 2002 flood in Central Europe, resulting in economic damages exceeding $15 billion.

One of the most devastating events in the last decade in Iran was the Bam earthquake. On December 26, 2003, a powerful earthquake measuring 5.6 on the Richter scale struck the ancient city of Bam in southeast Iran. This tragic event claimed the lives of more than 30,000 people, destroyed around 80% of the city's houses, and left more than 100,000 people homeless.

Natural and complex disasters, such as earthquakes, significantly increase the risk of diseases. While epidemics of infectious diseases after disasters are rare, they can still have a significant impact. For example, 63% of the illnesses among Nicaraguan refugees in Costa Rica in 1989 were due to acute respiratory infections. In 1993, acute respiratory infections caused 30% of deaths in Kabul, Afghanistan, and 23% of deaths in displaced populations.

Additionally, after earthquakes in El Salvador in 2001, 30% of infections were upper respiratory infections. The top five causes of death in emergencies and disasters include diarrhea, acute respiratory infections, measles, malnutrition, and, in areas where it's endemic, malaria. With appropriate intervention, the high morbidity and mortality resulting from these diseases can be greatly reduced.


We can categorize the impact of natural disasters into three phases: the impact phase (0-4 days), the post-impact phase (4 days to 4 weeks), and the recovery phase (after 4 weeks). During the impact phase, victims receive initial treatment. The post-impact phase sees the emergence of infectious diseases due to poor living conditions. The recovery phase presents risks for those returning to partially damaged and contaminated homes.

In the post-impact phase, survivors often move to crowded shelters with inadequate ventilation and hygiene. This can lead to respiratory infections, pneumonia, asthma, and worsened chronic lung diseases.

As time passes, some people return to homes contaminated by sediment and mold, while others stay in shelters with increased mold levels. Restoration workers are at risk of inhaling dust with microbes. These conditions can trigger asthma, fungal lung infections, and pneumonia.

After disasters, epidemics of acute respiratory infections, including pneumonia, are common. Pneumonia is a significant concern among the elderly, who may face challenges in shelter environments. Influenza outbreaks can occur in crowded shelters, and tuberculosis is a risk due to poor living conditions and delayed medical care.

There has been a significant increase in cases of pneumonia leading to hospitalization and death in Japan. This increase occurred after two major earthquakes: the Hanshin-Awaji Earthquake in 1995 and the Great East Japan Earthquake. Many elderly people, who often have physical and mental limitations, were hospitalized for pneumonia after these disasters. The germs causing pneumonia in these cases were similar to those before the disasters. The most common germ was Streptococcus pneumoniae, followed by Haemophilus influenzae, Moraxella catarrhalis, and Klebsiella pneumoniae.

In the aftermath of disasters, elderly individuals faced challenges like not having enough food, lack of caregivers, and a shortage of water. These difficulties made it harder for them to perform daily activities and maintain good oral hygiene. Poor daily activities and oral hygiene are significant risk factors for pneumonia. In many cases, it was difficult to provide enough water and sanitary supplies. As a result, it was necessary to relocate elderly individuals to places like temporary housing or nursing homes in areas not affected by the disaster.

When disasters happen during the flu season, influenza outbreaks can occur in shelters and crowded places where people seek refuge. Factors like overcrowding, poor ventilation, and limited access to clean water can increase the risk of flu outbreaks. To prevent these outbreaks, it's essential to isolate infected individuals, actively search for more cases, encourage hand hygiene and mask-wearing, and provide preventive medicine to those who might have been exposed to the virus.

People who become refugees or are displaced by natural disasters are more vulnerable to tuberculosis because they often live in crowded conditions and may lack proper nutrition. Additionally, limited access to medical facilities in disaster-affected areas can delay medical care for tuberculosis. To address this, it's crucial to educate people about the risks of tuberculosis in these situations and improve access to healthcare in affected areas.

Infections can in many cases have a higher mortality rate due to other problems that appear after a natural disaster. Exposure to mold and contaminants after disasters can worsen asthma and increase the risk of new cases. Patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) are also at risk of exacerbation after earthquakes.

Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) is a long-lasting lung condition that makes it hard to breathe. It's a big health issue worldwide. When natural disasters happen, they can make COPD worse for people living in the affected areas.

After a disaster, more people with COPD end up in the hospital because their symptoms get worse. This continues for about a month after the disaster. Some people with severe COPD need oxygen therapy, but when disasters cause power problems and damage equipment, they may have to go to the hospital for safety.

Disasters can also make the air dirty with dust and other elements from damaged buildings and debris. Breathing in this pollution can make COPD symptoms even worse.

People with COPD may lose their medicines and oxygen supplies during disasters, and it can be hard to get medical help. This makes COPD flare-ups more likely. Plus, they might have to stay in cold, damaged homes or emergency shelters without enough heat, water, food, or sanitation, which can lead to health problems, especially respiratory infections.

COPD can get worse after natural disasters like earthquakes. Reports show that after the Great East Japan Earthquake in 2011, more people with COPD had to go to the hospital because their symptoms got worse. This increase in hospitalizations continued for about five weeks after the earthquake. People with COPD also became less active after the disaster.

Some COPD patients need oxygen therapy, especially those with severe hypoxemia (low oxygen levels in their blood). When disasters happen, like the New York City Blackout in 2003 or the Great East Japan Earthquake in 2011, these patients had to go to healthcare facilities for oxygen. In Japan, after the Great Hanshin Earthquake in 1995, they made plans for disasters, including a system to find patients who needed oxygen in real-time.

During the tsunami after the Great East Japan Earthquake, some COPD patients lost their oxygen supplies because of power problems and damaged equipment. Oxygen providers couldn't reach them quickly, so these patients had to go to the hospital for oxygen.

There aren't many guidelines for managing COPD during emergencies and disasters. Most official guidelines don't mention how to handle COPD during such situations. However, the Japanese Respiratory Society published guidelines in 2013 based on their experience during the Great East Japan Earthquake.

COPD flare-ups after natural disasters can happen because of various reasons. One major cause is respiratory infections caused by viruses or bacteria. These infections make COPD symptoms worse. The air pollution from dust and debris after a disaster can also harm the lungs and worsen COPD. Cold weather, common during disasters, can lead to more COPD flare-ups too.
Main causes of disease outbreak after a natural disaster

Natural disasters, such as earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, landslides, tsunamis, floods, and droughts, are catastrophic events that can have both rapid and slow onsets, causing severe consequences for public health, society, and economies. Over the past two decades, these disasters have resulted in millions of deaths and have adversely affected the lives of at least a billion more people, with significant economic damages, especially in developing countries. However, the connection between natural disasters and disease outbreaks is often misconstrued.

One common misconception is that the chaos following natural disasters leads to a high risk of disease outbreaks. This fear often stems from the perceived association between dead bodies and epidemics. However, scientific evidence shows that the risk factors for disease outbreaks after disasters are primarily linked to the displacement of populations and specific environmental conditions, rather than the presence of dead bodies.

In situations where deaths result directly from the disaster, human remains do not usually pose a risk for epidemics. Dead bodies may only pose health risks in rare cases that require specific precautions, such as in the case of cholera or hemorrhagic fevers. Proper management of dead bodies is essential to address these concerns.

Despite the scientific understanding of disease risks after disasters, both health officials and the media often exaggerate these risks. Reports of imminent epidemics frequently emerge from disaster-affected areas, regardless of attempts to dispel these myths. This exaggeration can lead to unnecessary panic.

The actual risk of communicable disease transmission after disasters is closely tied to the size and characteristics of the displaced population. Several factors contribute to this risk, including the availability of safe water and functioning sanitation facilities, the nutritional status of the displaced population, vaccination coverage (especially for diseases like measles), and access to healthcare services. It's important to note that outbreaks are less frequently reported in disaster-affected populations compared to conflict-affected populations.

While disease outbreaks after natural disasters are relatively rare, certain types of communicable diseases are more likely to occur. Water-related diseases, such as diarrheal illnesses, can emerge when drinking water becomes contaminated. Outbreaks of diseases like cholera, hepatitis A, hepatitis E, and leptospirosis have been linked to disasters in various parts of the world, particularly in developing countries with limited access to clean water and sanitation facilities.

When natural disasters happen, people often end up living in crowded conditions. This crowding can make it easier for diseases to spread. For example, measles can be a problem after disasters, especially if many children under 15 years old are not vaccinated. In crowded places, measles can spread quickly. In 1991, there was a measles outbreak in the Philippines after a volcano erupted, with over 18,000 cases. After the tsunami in Aceh, Indonesia, 35 cases of measles were reported, even after mass vaccinations. In Pakistan, after a major earthquake in 2005, there were over 400 measles cases in just six months.

Meningitis, a disease that spreads from person to person, can also be a concern when people are crowded together. Cases and deaths from meningitis were documented in Aceh and Pakistan after disasters. Quick action with antibiotics can stop it from spreading widely. While large meningitis outbreaks are rare after natural disasters, they have happened in conflict-affected areas.

Respiratory infections, like pneumonia, are a significant health risk after disasters, especially for children under 5 years old. Limited access to healthcare and antibiotics can make respiratory infections deadly. In Nicaragua, cases of respiratory infections increased fourfold after Hurricane Mitch in 1998. These infections caused the most cases and deaths after the Aceh tsunami in 2004 and the 2005 earthquake in Pakistan.

Natural disasters, like cyclones and floods, can change the habitats of disease-carrying insects, increasing the risk of diseases like malaria. Flooding can create new mosquito breeding sites. Malaria outbreaks have occurred after earthquakes and flooding in various places.

Dengue fever, another mosquito-borne disease, can be influenced by weather conditions but is not directly linked to flooding. However, increased mosquito breeding sites from standing water after disasters can lead to dengue outbreaks.

Tetanus, a disease caused by contaminated wounds, can be a concern when vaccination rates are low. After the Aceh tsunami, there were 106 cases of tetanus, including 20 deaths. Cases were also reported in Pakistan after the 2005 earthquake.

An unusual outbreak of coccidiomycosis happened after the 1994 Southern California earthquake. This disease is caused by a fungus in soil and was linked to increased dust after landslides. Disasters can lead to power outages, affecting water treatment and healthcare services. This can increase the risk of waterborne diseases. For example, a power outage in New York City in 2003 led to an increase in diarrhea cases.

To respond effectively to the health needs of disaster-affected populations, it's crucial to conduct accurate risk assessments. This assessment should encompass factors such as the prevalent diseases in the affected area, the living conditions of the population (including settlement size and density), access to clean water and sanitation, nutritional status, immunization coverage, and healthcare accessibility. These assessments help prioritize interventions and allocate resources efficiently.
Measures to reduce the damage
To be effective during the initial response after a disaster, having a detailed plan that prepares for the worst and regular training is crucial.We may be able to handle most of these challenges by following a risk management process and making good decisions. These are some of the lessons they learned and applied in Japan.

Having a unified system for sharing information and making decisions was really important for making relief efforts work well after the disaster. It wasn't efficient for different relief teams to do their own thing or follow directions from various organizations.

Local governments and communities should stay flexible in how they transport and organize relief supplies. When there are a lot of supplies, they need to be well-organized so they can be given out effectively.

Hospitals in disaster-affected areas should take charge of medical supplies. They should know what medicines and medical equipment are needed and ask for the right support.

People who are especially vulnerable, like the elderly or those who can't do daily activities on their own, should be moved out of the affected areas quickly. This might need agreements between different local governments.

When dealing with disasters, the first step is to understand what we need. To prevent diseases during disasters, we must identify the main risk factors. The most significant risks during disasters are population movement and displacement. Other factors like overcrowding, economic and environmental damage, poverty, lack of clean water, poor waste management, homelessness, malnutrition, and limited healthcare access also contribute to disease outbreaks after disasters.

The breakdown of public health systems and a lack of healthcare services make it even harder to prevent and control diseases. To address these risks, we need to prepare and make policies before disasters strike. Responding to disasters requires continuous planning and adjustment at local, national, and global levels.

Reducing Vulnerability to Disease

The goal here is to reduce vulnerability to diseases during disasters. We need national regulations that reduce exposure to hazards by creating guidelines to protect people. Emergency response plans should include training on identifying and managing potential diseases, preparing necessary equipment and supplies, ensuring clean water, and addressing environmental health.

Strengthening health surveillance systems, providing information to the affected population about diseases, and prepositioning emergency supplies are crucial. Having fully operational field hospitals in disaster-prone countries can save lives.

Post-Disaster Response

After a disaster, we need to respond swiftly to control diseases. This includes providing medical care, shelter, clean water, safe food, nutrition, and medical supplies. Educating people about health and ensuring the well-being of humanitarian workers is also important.

Planning Shelter: Proper shelters can reduce the spread of diseases like diarrhea, respiratory infections, and others. Shelters should have enough space, access to water, waste management, and safe food storage.

Clean Water and Sanitation: Access to safe drinking water is crucial after disasters. Chlorine can help disinfect water. Hygiene, including handwashing, is vital.

Food Safety: Ensuring food safety is important to prevent diseases. Guidelines include keeping food clean, separating cooked and raw food, cooking thoroughly, storing food at safe temperatures, and using safe water and raw materials.

Vector Control: Disasters can increase the transmission of diseases carried by vectors like mosquitoes. Preventive measures, such as insecticide-treated nets and traps, are essential.

Vaccination Campaigns: Mass vaccination, especially for measles, is cost-effective and important. Tetanus and diphtheria vaccines should also be provided.

Clinical Services: Access to healthcare services is critical for diagnosis and treatment of diseases.

Laboratory Facilities: While clinical diagnosis is usually enough, laboratories can help confirm certain diseases during epidemics.

Disaster Management in Japan

The Great Hanshin-Awaji Earthquake Disaster happened in March 1995 and caused great damage to buildings and homes. Many people died because of fires. Back then, Japan didn't have a special system for medical care during disasters. But this earthquake made them realize they needed one. So, they started preparing hospitals, medical teams, and information systems for disaster care. 

In March 2011, the Great East Japan Earthquake Disaster occurred. It caused the death of around 17,000 people. Most of them drowned because of a huge tsunami. This disaster also caused problems at a nuclear power plant, which led to pollution of the land and sea and disrupted the lives of local people.

In April 2016, the Kumamoto Earthquake disaster happened. It directly caused 50 deaths and 175 related deaths. Many people had to leave their homes and stay in temporary shelters. Some slept on the floor, in tents, or in their cars because there weren't enough places to stay. These conditions caused more deaths, including some from blood clots in the lungs.

The Steps After the Red Queen Theory, Pathogen Host Evolution
In the past, scientists had different ideas about how evolution worked. Some believed in a heroic version of evolution, where species faced challenges and magically developed the right traits to survive. Others thought evolution had internal rules guiding it, not just external factors. They believed that species evolved through specific steps and specialized in different ways. 

These ideas were popular in the late 19th century and had various theories. Vernon Kellogg, said that the main question in evolution was how species always managed to adapt perfectly to their environments at the right time. He disagreed with the idea that traits necessary for survival had to exist in a species beforehand, even in small numbers. This idea later proved to be incorrect, but it made sense at the time.

Henry Fairfield Osborn, had his own take on evolution. He believed that isolated regions with diverse features like topography, soil, climate, and vegetation gave rise to various types of animals.  These animals evolved by adapting to their surroundings, and this process was called adaptive radiation. Osborn thought that species moved through different adaptive zones, becoming more specialized in each one until they eventually went extinct. He didn't believe in Lamarckian inheritance or natural selection.

Osborn was known for his support of the concept of orthogenesis, which proposed that evolution had a predetermined direction or path. He believed that certain lineages of organisms evolved along fixed trajectories, leading to specific outcomes. This idea was in contrast to the more Darwinian view of evolution as a result of natural selection.

Osborn emphasized the importance of paleontological evidence in understanding evolution. He believed that the fossil record provided critical insights into the history of life on Earth. He conducted extensive research on fossils, particularly dinosaur fossils, to trace the evolutionary history of various groups. He also suggested that the rate of evolution could vary among different lineages and over time. He argued that some groups of organisms might evolve more rapidly than others and that environmental factors could influence the speed of evolution.

Osborn contributed to the study of heterochrony, which examines changes in the timing of developmental events and how they can lead to evolutionary changes. He explored how alterations in the timing of growth and development could result in the evolution of new characteristics and forms.

His idea of adaptation was different from Darwin's. Osborn saw adaptation as a functional ability, while Darwin linked it to being well-suited to the environment. Osborn thought that nature followed creative and direct paths to achieve specific adaptations. He also emphasized the importance of relationships between different species, including those involving pathogens and hosts. He believed in symbiotic adaptation, where species adapted to work together. This idea played a significant role in his theories.

Later, neo-Darwinians like George Gaylord Simpson combined Osborn's ideas with natural selection. Simpson proposed that evolution happened in three steps. 

First, small populations accumulated mutations, making them less adapted to their environment. 
Then, they made a "quantum leap" into a new adaptive zone, carrying the potential for survival in this new environment. 
Finally, they diversified into different species either by spreading geographically or by adapting to various ecological niches.

Simpson's ideas on adaptive radiations coincided with the rise of quantum mechanics in physics, which deals with the dual nature of particles and waves. He introduced a similar duality into his theories, with adaptive zones being defined both by the groups that occupied them and the traits that matched the environment. This made it challenging to pinpoint what exactly constituted an adaptive zone.

Simpson managed to push aside the idea of orthogenesis by adopting a new concept called adaptive radiation. However, his attempt to create a grand vision for adaptive radiations within neo-Darwinism led to fragmentation in the study of large-scale evolutionary diversification. 

The term "zone" proved to be difficult to define objectively. If you focus solely on ecology, adaptive zones may seem like groups of species that share common characteristics but may not necessarily fit together ecologically. 

When you look at adaptive zones from an ecological perspective, you might see them as collections of species that have things in common, but they may not have a clear ecological relationship. On the other hand, if you approach adaptive zones from a phylogenetic viewpoint (which looks at the evolutionary history and relatedness of species), you might see them as ecological groupings that don't always follow a clear evolutionary pattern. In simpler terms, sometimes species that are closely related in terms of their evolutionary history don't necessarily occupy the same ecological niche.

Another challenge is figuring out what can be considered a "key innovation" and how it leads a population of organisms to move from one adaptive zone to another. A key innovation is a significant new trait or characteristic that helps a species survive better in its environment. However, objectively defining what qualifies as a key innovation and how it influences a population to shift from one adaptive zone to another can be quite difficult.

In adaptive radiation, a common ancestor gives rise to various descendant species, each with distinct traits and adaptations that allow them to thrive in specific environments or exploit different resources. These adaptations typically occur in response to new ecological opportunities, such as the colonization of new habitats, changes in environmental conditions, or the absence of competition from other species.

These adaptations typically occur in response to new ecological opportunities, such as the colonization of new habitats, changes in environmental conditions, or the absence of competition from other species.

Rapid Speciation: A relatively short period of time (in geological terms) is associated with the emergence of multiple new species.

Diversification: Descendant species exhibit a wide range of morphological, behavioral, and ecological differences.

Ecological Niches: Each species occupies a specific ecological niche or habitat, reducing competition for resources.

Evolutionary Adaptations: The descendant species evolve unique traits and adaptations that enhance their fitness and survival in their respective niches.

Common Ancestry: All of the species within an adaptive radiation share a common ancestor.

This fragmentation led to two separate research approaches among scientists influenced by Osborn and Simpson. One group delved into how organisms adapt when they encounter new environments, while the other group sought to understand the factors driving the creation of new species and the variations in species numbers across different groups.


Diversification of Adaptations in New Zones: One group of scientists chose to study how species adapt and develop diverse traits when they enter new environments or ecological zones. Their primary focus was not on the creation of new species (speciation) but rather on how the existing biological diversity diversified in terms of function and adaptation. In other words, they were interested in understanding how organisms change and adapt to different ecological challenges. One classic example is the diversification of Darwin's finches in the Galápagos Islands, where a single ancestral finch species gave rise to multiple species, each with specialized beak shapes and feeding habits adapted to different types of food sources available on the islands.


Diversification of Species: The other group of scientists concentrated on studying the process of speciation and the formation of new species. They were intrigued by why some groups of organisms had more species within them than others. Their research aimed to uncover the underlying mechanisms and processes responsible for the variations in the number of species found in different groups. A well-known example of this approach can be seen in the study of cichlid fish in African lakes, such as Lake Victoria and Lake Malawi. These lakes are home to an astonishing variety of cichlid species, each adapted to a specific ecological niche. Researchers in this group would investigate why these lakes have such high levels of cichlid diversity and what mechanisms have led to the evolution of numerous distinct species within the same family of fish.

Differences in species numbers between sister groups could occur for various reasons. First, it could be a random outcome, where speciation occurs randomly without any specific external or intrinsic factors influencing it. Second, environmental harshness could play a role, with more species found in less harsh environments. Third, geological history and geographic isolation could lead to more species in certain areas due to complex geological changes.

The concept of a key innovation was reintroduced into the study of radiations, with a focus on how it affected the number of species in a group. A key innovation could positively impact diversity in two ways: by increasing the likelihood of rapid speciation or by increasing population size and range, reducing the chances of extinction. However, these factors are often intertwined, making it challenging to separate their effects.

It's important to note that the idea that speciation progressively divides the environment into smaller and more specialized subunits is not in line with Darwinian thinking. Additionally, the concept that environments have predetermined niches that species fill is flawed because organisms shape their surroundings based on their unique characteristics and history. There is no external force pulling species into predetermined niches.

Organisms find their way to specific environments or resources because of their unique biological characteristics, a process known as ecological fitting. Essentially, it's about how an organism's traits and adaptations align with the conditions in its environment, allowing it to thrive and reproduce. 

The idea that environments are created as niches is similar to an optical illusion, where it may seem like the environment shapes species, but in reality, it's the evolutionary history that's responsible. Imagine a group of birds called Hawaiian honeycreepers living in the Hawaiian Islands. These birds didn't always look and act so differently. Over a very long time, they changed and evolved into various types or species. Each of these species became really good at doing a specific thing, like eating nectar from flowers or breaking open hard seeds.

Now, here's the important part: some people might think that the Hawaiian Islands with all their different environments and food options forced these birds to become so diverse. It's like saying, "The islands made them this way." But that's not exactly true.

What really happened is that over millions of years, these birds had babies, and each new generation had a mix of traits from their parents. Sometimes, a baby bird would have a trait that made it better at eating nectar, while another baby might have a trait for cracking seeds. These special traits came from the birds' family history, like inheriting a talent from your parents.

So, in a way, it's like the birds had these skills in their genes, thanks to their ancestors. When they arrived on the Hawaiian Islands, with all their different environments and food sources, some birds with specific traits could use those environments better than others. This allowed them to fit into different jobs or niches on the islands.

In the early 21st century, scientists tried to establish a protocol to confirm instances of adaptive radiation, but it turned out to be challenging because each step of the protocol had numerous qualifiers. There was a lack of a comprehensive framework for studying evolutionary radiations.

Imagine you have a group of animals, let's say birds. These birds live in different places and have various ways of surviving. But suddenly, something changes in their environment. Maybe a new island forms, or the climate shifts. Now, these birds face new opportunities and challenges.

What happens next is pretty interesting. Some of these birds start changing and adapting really quickly. They might develop new features, like longer beaks for reaching specific foods or colorful feathers for attracting mates. These changes allow them to take advantage of the new environment in unique ways.

As time goes by, these fast-adapting birds begin to diversify into many different species. You end up with a whole bunch of new bird types, each specialized for a particular role in their environment. It's like they explode into various forms, almost like fireworks in the sky.

This phenomenon, where a group of animals rapidly evolves into many new species to fit different niches or roles in their surroundings, is what scientists call "evolutionary radiations."

The search for a general explanation for evolutionary radiations has failed because scientists attempted to merge an orthogenetic framework with a neo-Darwinian one. However, there's still hope if we return to the basic principles of evolution.


Orthogenetic Framework: This is like a way of thinking that suggests there's a sort of inner force or direction pushing organisms to change in a particular way. It's like saying there's a set path or plan for how species should evolve. Imagine it's like following a recipe step by step, and you can't deviate from it.

Neo-Darwinian: Now, this is a more modern idea based on the work of Charles Darwin. It says that organisms change and evolve because of things like natural selection. It's like saying there's no set plan; instead, species change because the ones with traits that help them survive and have babies pass those traits on to their offspring. It's a bit like a "survival of the fittest" idea.


Most species, when faced with climate change, move to areas similar to their previous habitats, using inherited traits to survive. This perspective aligns with Darwin's concept that evolution is not heroic but quietly effective.

External disruptions caused by major climate change events can change the conditions in an environment. Species that survive are typically those that can adapt to the new conditions by taking advantage of opportunities based on traits they already possessed before the disruption.

This can also be applied to the diversification of the hosts. This is supported by evidence, including the capacity for ecological fitting in hosts, which includes contextual flexibility (phenotypic plasticity), situational flexibility (co-option), and historical flexibility (evolutionary conservatism).
Contextual flexibility (phenotypic plasticity): This means that living things can change how they look or act based on what's happening around them. It's like how a chameleon can change its color to blend in with its surroundings.

Situational flexibility (co-option): This is about using things in new ways when needed. Woodpeckers are known for their ability to create holes in trees for nesting and finding insects to eat. However, their situational flexibility becomes evident when they encounter environments where suitable trees for nesting are scarce. In some cases, woodpeckers have been observed co-opting man-made structures, such as utility poles or wooden buildings, as nesting sites. When they cannot find natural tree cavities, they adapt to their surroundings by using these artificial structures to create nests. This behavior demonstrates their ability to use things (man-made structures) in new and unconventional ways when needed for nesting.

Historical flexibility (evolutionary conservatism): This means that over a long, long time, some things about an organism stay the same because they work well. It's like how certain features in animals might not change much because they're already really good at what they do.

These categories of traits highlight how organisms, including hosts, adapt to their surroundings and cope with changes in their environments. They show that ecological fitting is a widespread phenomenon among all forms of life. One example is the study of ectomycorrhizal communities associated with different trees, which demonstrates the influence of specific and conservative elements in structuring biodiversity.

We might be tempted to say that if Darwin's theory of evolution applies to all living creatures and if the environment for pathogens is messy, then it must be the same for hosts. And host fitness space is indeed somewhat messy, and this messiness actually helps us understand how diseases emerge. One way to see this is by looking at how well invasive and introduced species do and our ability to predict such events.

Let's break this down. When native species tend to stick to what they know, and newcomers are more adventurous, it's likely that when they clash, there's room for flexibility in the system. This can lead to both species coexisting. Usually, a newcomer explores a bit initially, while a resident with similar needs focuses on exploiting its niche. Initially, the newcomer might seem to outcompete the native species, but over time, things can change. The newcomer might shift its strategy, and if it directly competes with a resident, the advantages the native species had might come into play. This could lead to the invader settling in less favorable habitats, and the native species making a comeback. Sometimes, the invader becomes a naturalized part of the ecosystem, especially in places where the native species may not thrive.

Scientists have developed ecological niche models that are quite effective at predicting where species might be unintentionally introduced or deliberately introduced. Why does this work? 

Well, first, introductions and invasions are quite common because many species can fit into various ecological niches. The opportunities are vast because fitness space is messy, and there's always more potential than what's actually realized. Secondly, the traits that matter for exploiting these opportunities are specific and conservative, meaning they don't change easily. This predictive power is based on the idea that the future will resemble the past, especially when specific and conservative traits are involved.

Fitness space is so jumbled, and species are so adaptable, that many species can be introduced anywhere in the world if given the chance. Even if we wanted to prevent such introductions, it's often difficult to do so, and this applies to both hosts and pathogens.
Host pathogens and fitting space

A long time ago, Simpson proposed that adaptive radiations, where species diversify rapidly due to new ecological opportunities, happened because of ecological flexibility. However, there was a missing piece to this puzzle: how do species become generalized or specialized in their fitness space? 

Becoming more generalized in fitness space only requires the ability to fit ecologically, a portion of the overall fitness space, and a way to encounter new parts of fitness space that were previously inaccessible. With these capacities, species can alternate between being generalists and specialists in fitness space.

In simple terms, animals can become more adaptable by being a good match for their environment, being good at some things that give them and advantage in that environment or a new one, and finding ways to explore new places. This lets them switch between being good at many things or focusing on one thing, depending on what helps them survive best.

Let's illustrate this with an example involving leaf beetles called Ophraella. Many speciation events in these insects took place while they were colonizing the same types of host plants. This happened during a period of significant environmental change. It suggests that during times of environmental crisis, when previously isolated hosts came into contact in shrinking habitats, beetles had opportunities to colonize new hosts that were similar to their preferred resources. 

However, when beetles needed to colonize more distantly related host plants or move between different groups of hosts, these events were less correlated with environmental changes. Such transitions are more challenging to understand.

In this example, only a couple of pairs of recently evolved Ophraella species show possible cospeciation (evolving in tandem with their host plants). However, despite minimal cospeciation, the system has been heavily influenced by phylogenetic conservatism, leading to a strong signal of co-evolution despite not always evolving together.

Many species can emerge when conditions are stable and fitness space is isolated. However, when the climate changes, causing local alterations and new connections in fitness space, many species can go extinct because they lack the capacity to adapt to these changes or explore new opportunities. Often, these constraints on exploration result from a related species already occupying nearby fitness space. There's ample evidence of ecological fitting in messy fitness space, with species oscillating between generalist and specialist strategies, and this pattern is observed in both hosts and pathogens.

So, it seems that host evolution isn't fundamentally different from pathogen evolution. Now, let's explore whether hosts respond to external disturbances with taxon pulses.

Do Hosts Experience Fluctuations in Diversity?

Big ecological changes have a way of reshaping history, often linked to continents and islands mixing. Think of it like a puzzle: when pieces from different places come together, you get a bigger picture. Darwin's idea of the tree of life suggests that life diversifies over time. Evidence from fossils and the history of life on Earth supports this. Many species have disappeared, but new ones have taken their place. The "taxon pulse" is a natural process where species evolve in isolation and then mix during periods of rapid growth in the living world.

The characteristics of a taxon pulse:

Periods of Rapid Diversification: Taxon pulses are moments in evolutionary history when there's a sudden burst of new species forming. It's like a "boom" in biodiversity.

Isolation and Mixing: These pulses often involve periods of isolation, where different groups of species are separated from each other. Later, there's mixing, where these isolated species come back together.

Geographic Scale: Taxon pulses can happen on a large scale, affecting entire regions or even continents. They're not just limited to a small area.

Different Causes: These pulses can be triggered by various factors, like changes in climate, geography, or the availability of resources. There's no one-size-fits-all explanation.

Species Coexistence: One interesting aspect is that during taxon pulses, you can have different species coexisting with their "close relatives." This means species that are quite similar can live together without competing too much.

Functional Traits: Taxon pulses are also linked to the development of specific traits that help species fit into their environment. These traits might be conserved (they stay similar) or evolve (they change) over time.

Complex History: Studying taxon pulses can be complicated because they involve a mix of different species, each with its own story. It's like trying to understand a big family tree with many branches.

Evidence from Fossils and DNA: Scientists use various sources of evidence, including fossils and genetic data, to piece together the story of taxon pulses.

To give you an example, think about a time when a landmass split into two islands due to geological changes. Species on these islands might evolve separately for a while, developing unique traits to survive in their specific island environments. Later, when the islands come back together, these species might mix, leading to a burst of new species. This is a simplified illustration of a taxon pulse.

In politics, "conservative" means avoiding change, but in biology, it means that significant changes in how species live happen less often than new species forming. For instance, in many insect groups in the Caribbean, changes in functional traits occur only about once every 30 times new species emerge, which is roughly 3 percent of the time. This supports the idea that species tend to have specific, unchanging traits. 

But here's a puzzle: if specific traits that determine a species' essential living conditions (its fundamental fitness space) don't change much over time, wouldn't that prevent related species from living together? Surprisingly, not necessarily. Studies of various groups of species in Mexico, Hawaii, and the Caribbean show that the process of assembling different species involves a mix of colonization, evolution within the same area, and moving back and forth between places. In some cases, up to two-thirds of these groups consist of species living alongside their close relatives. How is this possible?

"Ecological fitting" means when old and new species find a comfy place to live together, even if they used to need the same things to survive. Imagine two species that once needed the same stuff, like the same food or home. Over time, their needs change a bit. But they still live together by adjusting to their new environment, making it work for both.

Understanding how different species evolve and come together in groups through "taxon pulses" is tricky. It means looking at many more species than before. Even in existing studies, not all species contribute the same to every event. But the idea of taxon pulses as a big process always comes up. Most groups in these studies agree on the main points but have some differences. Every species has a role in a group, but to truly understand it, you need to know the stories of the species it lives with and came from. That's why studies that look at many types of species together help us see how taxon pulses work.

One study connects hosts (like humans), proboscideans (like elephants), and hyaenids (like hyenas) since the Miocene epoch (about 12 million years ago). It found signs of shared taxon pulses. What's fascinating is that this pattern matches the evolution of parasites we talked about earlier, like schistosomes and certain roundworms. Some of this history might involve tapeworm species linked to Homo erectus in Eurasia, where hyenas lived in the Pliocene.

Eight studies have shown that diversity is shaped by these pulses in hosts. Many recent studies in historical biogeography, like those for tracking co-evolution, have found periods of expansion and isolation, leading to patchy species patterns in specific areas. We should think of these as taxon pulses unless proven otherwise. These studies cover lots of Earth's biodiversity, suggesting that species' geographic histories are histories of taxon pulses.

The rules that guide the lives of free-living and parasitic animals are quite similar. And the most amazing bursts of diversity on Earth have happened among parasitic creatures.


Pathogen diversity
Pathogens reproduce quickly, akin to investors diversifying portfolios to reduce risk. Among flatworms, the Neodermata group includes Digenea, monogenoideans, and tapeworms, mostly parasites. Ancestors of Neodermata were hitchhikers or pathogens with simple life cycles, moving between arthropod hosts.

However, the common ancestor of Neodermata added vertebrate hosts and became an endoparasite, innovating within hosts and different hosts, thereby increasing diversification. Being an endoparasite isn't always essential, and some groups shifted back to ectoparasites without losing diversity. Additionally, adding a vertebrate host doesn't always guarantee diversity.

Hosts function as resource patches in a complex fitness landscape for pathogens. Pathogens can't move as hosts do, so their transmission patterns remain relatively stable. Strategies like direct development, autoinfection, and producing larval or juvenile stages help them explore new fitness spaces. But do these strategies correlate with greater diversity among these pathogenic groups?

Consider tapeworms and Amphilinidea. Tapeworms adopt strategy 2, which involves repeating reproductive units, significantly boosting fecundity, enhancing their chances of persistence, and indirectly influencing the speciation process.

When we compare Digenea and Aspidobothrea, we see a significant difference in species richness. Digenea's complex reproductive strategy involves multiple stages, potentially producing thousands of adult parasites from a single embryo, thereby enhancing diversity.

Monogenoidea exhibits autoinfection but isn't significantly more species-rich than related groups. This suggests that factors beyond reproduction influence diversity, such as Eucestoda's high species numbers, achieved through sexual proliferation.

Diverse reproductive strategies and innovations affect the diversity of parasitic groups. It's not just about the number of offspring; it's also about exploring fitness spaces and ensuring persistence. The relationship between these innovations and diversity is intricate, with various factors at play. Understanding these dynamics provides valuable insights into the evolution of pathogens.







Understanding Climate Change

Climate change, often called global warming, is caused by an increase in certain gases in the Earth's atmosphere. These gases, known as greenhouse gases, include carbon dioxide, nitrogen oxides, methane, and certain chemicals like CFCs. Greenhouse gases work like a blanket, trapping heat from the sun in our atmosphere, which makes our planet warmer.

The main greenhouse gas, carbon dioxide (CO2), is released into the air when, among other things, people burn fossil fuels like coal and oil. This burning has become much more common since the Industrial Revolution. Changes in farming and land use have also added to the levels of these gases in the atmosphere. As a result, our planet has gotten warmer, affecting both land and oceans. The rise in temperatures over the last century, especially in the Northern Hemisphere, is more significant than any time in the past thousand years.

Climate change doesn't just mean higher temperatures. It refers to long-term shifts in weather patterns. This includes changes in usual weather conditions like temperature, rainfall, wind, and sunshine, as well as an increase in extreme weather events. The scientific consensus is that human activities, like burning fossil fuels, are the main drivers of climate change. This has led to rising global temperatures, higher sea levels, and shrinking Arctic sea ice. For instance, sea levels have risen 2.5 times faster from 2006 to 2016 compared to most of the 20th century.

As a result of climate change, oceans are warming and becoming more acidic, and we're experiencing more extreme weather events. This also harms ecosystems, putting pressure on food production. This can lead to problems like crop failures, malnutrition, hunger, displacement of people, and conflicts over resources.

After more than a century of industrialization, global trade, deforestation, and large-scale farming, the levels of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere have reached levels not seen in millions of years. Experts warn that even a 2°C rise in global temperatures will cause irreversible damage to ecosystems and our climate. A 1.5°C increase would still have a massive impact, requiring significant changes across society to prevent further harm.

Globalization, the increased interconnection of economies around the world, has brought about major changes with far-reaching consequences. In this context, we'll focus on two aspects: the impact of environmental degradation and urbanization, and the trade of animals and animal products.

Environmental degradation, driven by globalization, has led to unsustainable growth. This includes mass urbanization, which means more people living in cities, and the large-scale production and trade of livestock. Additionally, globalization allows for the free movement of animals, goods, services, and people.

These factors have contributed to the increase in infectious diseases and their rapid spread. Environmental degradation and urbanization create conditions where diseases can thrive, and the trade in animals and animal products can introduce new diseases to different regions. The free movement of people allows diseases to travel quickly.

The environment plays a big role in whether germs can thrive or not. Some germs need something else, like a vector or an intermediate host, to complete their life cycle. New diseases emerge when these germs find the right conditions to infect a new host. It's not common, but it's happening more often than before. Since the mid-1980s, we've seen at least 30 new infectious diseases that can be potential global dangers.

There are several reasons for the increase in diseases. This includes germs jumping between different species, changes in the populations of animals that carry these germs, the germs evolving and changing, and our improved ability to spot diseases. However, this discussion will focus on climate change, how humans interact with the environment, and our activities that disrupt natural conditions. Changes in how humans and animals interact are the main factors behind many diseases. Unsustainable development, like deforestation and urbanization, drives these changes.

Climate change is causing more frequent and intense extreme weather events, like heavy rains and droughts. Global warming and these extreme weather changes affect ecosystems and weather patterns that can impact infectious diseases, the creatures that carry these diseases, and the hosts they infect.

Extreme rain can carry new germs and cause outbreaks of diseases. Rainy seasons can increase harmful microorganisms in water due to soil disturbance, leading to more disease-causing microorganisms. Floods can wash germs into water sources, causing waterborne diseases. Floods also encourage the growth of fungi, like those linked to lung disease in children. Diseases like salmonellosis and cholera become more common with more flooding. Heavy rain after a drought can also lead to more germs and disease outbreaks.

Diarrheal diseases in Latin America increased after El Niño brought heavy floods, and led to outbreaks of leptospirosis in poor areas in Central and South America and South Asia. Hurricane Mitch caused flooding in Central America and led to a cholera outbreak in Honduras and Venezuela. In Mozambique, floods in 2000 caused typhoid and cholera outbreaks.

Heavy rain supports mosquito breeding, which can lead to diseases like malaria. Increased rainfall and higher temperatures in Kenya led to more malaria cases. Hotter temperatures can also lead to waterborne diseases like cholera, as higher temperatures help bacteria reproduce. Climate change, which causes both hotter and colder conditions, can create conditions for many diseases to thrive.

Climate change can also lead to water shortages, causing outbreaks of waterborne diseases. Lack of water increases the chance of contact with waterborne germs. Droughts in wet regions can create stagnant water that mosquitoes use for breeding. Low-flowing rivers can concentrate waterborne germs.

Impact of Deforestation on Diseases

Deforestation has significant effects on diseases, particularly those that spread from animals to humans (zoonotic diseases) and those transmitted by vectors like mosquitoes.  

When forests are cut down, it reduces the number of animals that prey on disease-carrying vectors like mosquitoes. For example, droughts can lead to fewer amphibians and dragonflies, which are natural mosquito predators. In California, droughts reduced the populations of owls, eagles, falcons, and hawks that prey on rodents. When heavy rains followed the droughts, it created ideal conditions for rodents, which, in turn, increased the risk of a new viral disease (HPS) transmitted by rodents.

Deforestation, often driven by global demands for products like beef, soy, palm oil, and wood, accelerates environmental degradation. It's a major contributor to climate change, second only to burning fossil fuels. The destruction of forests releases large amounts of greenhouse gases, which worsens global warming. 

Deforestation negatively affects biodiversity. When forests are rich in species diversity, diseases carried by animals are less likely to spill over to humans. But when humans encroach upon forests or destroy them, these diseases are more likely to jump to humans. 

Deforestation can push animals that carry diseases out of their natural habitats and closer to human settlements. This increased contact with wildlife raises the risk of diseases spilling over to humans. Additionally, impoverished communities may venture into deforested areas in search of resources, putting them in direct contact with disease-carrying animals. Roads cut through forests and puddles left behind after clearing trees become ideal mosquito breeding grounds. This leads to higher mosquito populations, increasing the risk of diseases like malaria.

Livestock and Disease Spread

The livestock industry, which includes raising animals for meat, has a significant impact on the spread of infectious diseases. As the global demand for meat products grew, so did meat production. Between 1980 and 2004, meat production nearly doubled to 260 million tons. To meet this demand, livestock farming has shifted towards intensive systems, where animals are kept in crowded conditions.

This means animals are kept in tight spaces, which raises concerns about waste management, sustainability, and disease risks. Intensive livestock farming can increase the risk of diseases that can spread to humans. For instance, bird flu, a highly infectious disease, can spread quickly in crowded poultry farms. Large-scale poultry production can act as a breeding ground for pathogens due to the dense population of birds. Crowded conditions and close human-animal interactions in wild animal markets can lead to the transmission of zoonotic diseases. The SARS outbreak, for example, was linked to these markets, where animals were sold for food.

The movement of animals in the livestock industry also poses risks. Transporting animals long distances for slaughter can lead to viral recombination, creating new strains of viruses. In the US, thousands of cattle are moved daily, increasing the likelihood of disease spread. Stress during transport can weaken animals' immune systems, making them more susceptible to disease. For instance, pigs transported across the US can experience stress that contributes to disease outbreaks.

The international movement of animals for various purposes, such as sporting events or research, can also carry disease risks. In some cases, animals have inadvertently transported disease-carrying mosquitoes.
Climate change and the evolution of pathogens
In our modern age, we're facing some pretty serious environmental challenges, and these are linked to the rise of new diseases. This poses a threat to our way of life and future generations. It's kind of a mixed bag of news. On the bright side, these challenges create opportunities for new forms of life to evolve and thrive. But on the downside, it also means diseases can evolve and become more of a problem. So, we can't just make diseases, or ourselves, disappear to solve this issue.

Interestingly, there's a ray of hope in all of this. Nature is always changing and adapting to different situations. It's like a jigsaw puzzle that's always shifting around. Some studies looking at how life evolved during past climate changes give us hope that we can learn from the past to deal with the challenges brought on by today's climate changes. The disease problem is just one part of how nature copes with these big changes.

The good news is that when our environment undergoes significant changes, it can lead to the creation of many new species, making life more diverse. However, the downside is that when nature adapts to major changes, it can also result in the emergence of new diseases. So, as we grapple with climate change, we might also see more new diseases popping up.

The concept of Stockholm Paradigm can be summed up like this: 
When the environment changes, it causes living beings to adapt based on what they can already do (ecological fitting).  This adaptation leads to a more general approach to survival (ecological fitting in a less strict environment). 

When the climate stabilizes again, isolated pockets of species form, and they become more specialized, whether or not they strongly interact with each other. These interactions, which can be antagonistic or mutualistic, don't follow a uniform pattern everywhere. Instead, they adapt to local conditions. For example, in some regions, predators and prey might engage in intense coevolutionary battles, leading to the development of new adaptations. Meanwhile, in neighboring areas, the same species might have more relaxed interactions due to different environmental factors. This variation in species interactions across landscapes results in a complex mosaic pattern, where each area tells a unique coevolutionary story. 

Gene flow between regions can further influence these dynamics, making the theory a powerful framework for understanding the diversity of ecological and evolutionary relationships in different parts of the world. (geographic mosaic theory of coevolution). 
This specialization helps them survive when the environment changes again. Imagine a population of wolves and a population of rabbits. When there are many rabbits (a prey species), the wolf population (the predator) may increase because there's an abundant food supply. However, as the wolf population grows, they eat more rabbits, causing the rabbit population to decline. 

With fewer rabbits to eat, the wolf population also decreases. This, in turn, allows the rabbit population to recover, starting the cycle anew. The oscillation hypothesis suggests that these population fluctuations occur in a predictable, cyclical manner. It's important to note that not all ecological systems follow this pattern, but it helps scientists understand the dynamic relationships between species in nature. (the oscillation hypothesis). Then, new environmental changes happen, bringing in new species, and this mixing leads to complex ecosystems (taxon pulses).

The way pathogens (like disease-causing organisms) and their hosts (like the animals, insects or plants they infect) evolve doesn't seem to be fundamentally different. It's all part of evolution, just like how Charles Darwin explained it. It's not a heroic process, but it's effective. Evolution is the story of species adapting to their surroundings, sometimes thriving and sometimes just getting by, but always dealing with whatever conditions they face in the best way they can.

Evolutionary pressure never stops
In the realm of conservation biology, individuals from diverse backgrounds unite with a shared concern for Earth's biodiversity amidst the challenges of climate change. However, the pivotal role of evolution often remains overlooked. Evolutionary principles are essential for understanding how life has not just survived but thrived during past environmental changes. Yet, integrating these principles into conservation policies remains incomplete.

Many conservation policies aim to preserve current biodiversity or restore ecosystems to pre-industrial states. These well-intentioned goals may be unattainable and unsuitable for the dynamic biosphere shaped by evolution.

In a Darwinian context, species evolve in response to changing environmental conditions. What may seem as stability is an artifact of our limited perspective. The biosphere is in constant motion, renewing life and carrying evolutionary legacies. This dynamism isn't chaos but reflects life's resilience within a certain vitality window.

Complex systems like the biosphere respond unpredictably to significant external perturbations. History shows that well-intentioned human attempts to control natural systems often lead to unintended consequences. Therefore, interventions must be approached cautiously.

Preserving the biosphere should focus on safeguarding the process of evolution rather than specific entities, locations, or relationships. The biosphere is an evolving system with inherent resilience, capable of withstanding external disruptions.


A Pragmatic Approach: Preserve, Connect, and Allow Evolution to Flourish

Rather than preserving a static status quo, a more effective strategy involves conserving diverse ecosystems and fostering connections between them. This promotes adaptation and resilience in the face of environmental shifts. While it may lead to the loss of some species, survivors will adapt, ushering in a transitional biosphere toward a new stable equilibrium.

Evolutionary radiations are nature's response to significant environmental disruptions. When the climate undergoes dramatic changes, some species unable to move or adapt rapidly face extinction. However, those capable of relocation or adaptation can survive and thrive. This involves expanding into new territories with favorable conditions or evolving new capabilities to endure changing environments. It begins with a surge in biodiversity due to disturbances that challenge existing conditions and create opportunities by connecting previously isolated parts of the environment.

Mass extinctions in Earth's history, resulting from profound disruptions, have led to the extinction of a significant portion of species. These events reset the evolutionary clock and paved the way for new diversity among both hosts and pathogens. This highlights the remarkable evolutionary potential within the biosphere, enabling it to generate abundant biological diversity after catastrophic events.

It's crucial to recognize that evolution is the primary mechanism driving the recovery of complex ecosystems following major disturbances. Conservation efforts should embrace this fundamental truth. Changes are often viewed negatively, prompting interventions to halt their causes. However, this approach lacks criteria for explaining how biological and environmental changes might be linked to evolutionary adaptations. 

A crucial distinction must be made here. Well-intentioned efforts to maintain stability may inadvertently disrupt the ongoing evolutionary process. We should avoid interfering with the sole known mechanism that enables life to adapt to climate change. Evolution is an unending process, and change is an inherent and unavoidable aspect of it.


Pathogens
In conservation biology, there are diverse views on pathogens. Some see them as natural foes to be eliminated, while others believe they play vital ecosystem roles. A minority argues pathogens are vulnerable to climate change and need protection. Let's approach this objectively. Pathogens have functions, not purposes, in the natural world. They interact with their environment, including hosts, in various ways. Evolution doesn't aim to eradicate them or hosts; it resolves conflicts and establishes functional relationships.

Mass extinctions in Earth's history reset the evolutionary clock, fostering new diversity. Evolution is the mechanism driving ecosystem recovery after disruptions. Instead of viewing changes negatively, we should understand their link to evolutionary adaptations. We must avoid interfering with evolution's role in climate change adaptation.

To ensure our survival, we should focus on survival strategies and prioritize research on thriving species and habitats. These topics evoke emotional reactions but stem from a non-Darwinian view of nature. Early ideas of a balanced, unchanging nature have evolved into a recognition of nature's evolutionary and functional nature.

Conservation biology sometimes clings to outdated ideas of a timeless, unchanging nature. These views clash with the understanding that the biosphere is a product of evolution, where change is essential for survival. Nature has witnessed upheavals leading to mass extinctions, followed by bursts of evolution generating new species.

While preserving our love for nature (biophilia), emotions shouldn't dictate biosphere decisions. Imposing stability hinders the biosphere's ability to respond to disruptions, which is vital for survival. Infinite sustainability relies on infinite variation, making evolution our lifeline.

We've seen global climate change before, impacting the biosphere. Comparing current consequences to past episodes can provide valuable lessons.

Healthcare and new emerging diseases
Cholera outbreaks threaten entire countries, Ebola outbreaks strain the World Health Organization, and diseases like yellow fever and plague drain global vaccine supplies. The economic toll of diseases exceeds the GDP of most countries. In such a situation, we need unconventional solutions.

Healthcare experts in the past couldn't fully anticipate the emerging disease crisis. There were warning signs, but we didn't pay enough attention. The sheer number of emerging diseases since the turn of the century has made researchers pause, but policymakers haven't changed their approach much. Their framework doesn't allow them to fully grasp the situation, leading to a lack of proactive measures. Some believe the crisis can be handled through reaction alone.

For a long time, emerging diseases were seen as if some sinister force created the capacity to seek new targets. Some thought that natural selection would always counterattack, and if humans helped selection fight off pathogens, we would win. But modeling efforts revealed that selection couldn't necessarily eliminate pathogens or reduce their harm. Disease indicates that a pathogen is exploring new fitness opportunities by adapting ecologically, not that it has turned into an enemy attacking a new host.

We have no excuse for being repeatedly surprised. The Darwinian concept of preexisting capacity taking advantage of new opportunities explains emerging diseases. Changes caused by climate change increase connections in fitness space, inviting both humans and pathogens to explore. While we plan, pathogens adapt.


Pathogens have specific transmission methods and microhabitat preferences linked to signs and symptoms. This helps in treating diseases as it allows doctors to make rapid diagnoses and prescribe appropriate treatments. However, this works both ways, as similar symptoms can be caused by multiple pathogens. 

Genetic load refers to the reduction in a population's overall fitness when not all individuals have optimal genetic traits. It's an unintended outcome of medical advancements. When we intervene to help a host develop resistance to pathogens, we counteract selection from both the host and the pathogen. Mass vaccination programs target individuals who aren't already resistant, and this, paradoxically, increases the genetic load in susceptible populations. So, more of the population needs vaccination to survive, leading to herd immunity policies. This makes it almost impossible to stop mass vaccination. When mass vaccinations stop, more hosts are at risk of disease than before the program started.

Annual vaccinations also have unintended consequences. If a pathogen has varying abilities to infect hosts, selection tends to match pathogen genetic variation with host genetic variation. Seasonal vaccines may target the most common pathogen variant, but if successful, they reduce its prevalence, making rare variants more common. This can lead to unpredictability in the most prevalent pathogen variant, making vaccination programs less effective.

Additionally, when hosts and pathogens selectively respond to pharmaceuticals rather than to each other, we introduce another factor that can contribute to the problem of increasing genetic load.

Rachel Carson's book "Silent Spring" made many people realize that destroying biodiversity to control disease might be too costly. The book raised significant concerns about the widespread use of pesticides, particularly DDT, and their impact on the environment, wildlife, and human health. Carson argued that these chemicals were causing ecological imbalances, harming non-target species, and potentially leading to long-term health risks for humans.

Carson's book played a pivotal role in raising public awareness about the dangers of chemical pesticides and their indiscriminate use. It catalyzed the modern environmental movement and led to increased scrutiny of pesticide regulations and their impact on ecosystems. "Silent Spring" is often credited with influencing environmental policies and regulations, including the eventual banning of DDT in the United States and the establishment of the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).

However, this approach still persists in some cases. One example is biological control, which involves trying to control an introduced species by introducing another species. When you think about it, it sounds a bit like trying to fix one mistake with another.

In biological control, an introduced pest insect is causing damage to a native or introduced plant of commercial value. In its native habitat, this pest insect is controlled by a parasitoid wasp that lays its eggs in the pest, eventually killing it. So, the solution seems simple—introduce the parasitoid wasp to the place where the pest is causing problems, and let nature take its course.

However, what often happens is that the introduced parasitoid starts targeting native species of insects, sometimes even preferring them over the introduced pest. This unintended consequence can give the introduced pest a break from its predators. In the worst-case scenario, the native species now targeted by the parasitoid could be economically important, like a pollinator for crops or a protected wild plant.

Additionally, introducing pathogens or hosts to suboptimal environments can increase the risks of these pathogens evolving and becoming more harmful. When we change landscapes and species distributions without considering the long-term consequences, we may inadvertently create new problems.

For example, when Egypt built the Aswan High Dam between 1960 and 1970, parasitologists warned that it could lead to an explosion in the populations of snails that carry the parasite Schistosoma haematobium, which causes a debilitating disease. Despite these warnings, the dam was built, and schistosomiasis rates in the area increased significantly.

So, while we might wonder if climate change could lead to the extinction of pathogens, it's more likely that climate change could lead to the extinction of hosts, with pathogens surviving and potentially causing new problems. Parasitologists have observed that some hosts act as "parasite hotels," hosting a wide variety of parasites compared to their relatives. These hosts might be survivors of extinction events, with their relatives' pathogens moving to them as their relatives went extinct. Pathogens are highly adaptable survival machines.

Climate change and our current situation
Climate change is causing significant and long-lasting damage to our environment and, as a result, our food security and safety are at risk. This isn't just about diseases that affect humans; it includes diseases that impact animals and crops too. Climate change disrupts the way water is distributed, leading to problems with food production and making it easier for diseases to spread.

One of the key ways in which climate change is affecting food security and safety is by changing the circumstances under which diseases can spread. This alteration is multifaceted and involves both small-scale and large-scale changes in the distribution of pathogens, amplifying the potential for the emergence of diseases. As climate patterns shift, we witness diverse groups of pathogens coming into contact, creating critical obstacles to global food security. These pathogens can threaten a wide range of food sources and industries, from domestic animals like ungulates to aquaculture, fisheries, and various crops.

The distribution and availability of water play a pivotal role. Changes in precipitation patterns, including excessive rainfall in some regions and severe droughts in others, are crucial. These fluctuations in water availability are closely linked to food production, as they directly affect the ease with which pathogens can be transmitted.

Furthermore, climate change poses challenges to both the availability of potable water and the sustainability of agricultural water resources. Land use changes, ocean warming and acidification, rising sea levels, and desertification all contribute to the dynamics of freshwater sources. Attempts to harness freshwater sources, for instance, through the construction of dams, may inadvertently lead to significant alterations in aquatic ecosystems, potentially influencing disease transmission dynamics and causing the collapse of fisheries.

In the past, our ancestors faced similar challenges when they moved to new places and encountered new diseases. They had to leave their homes sometimes because of diseases, among other things. As populations grew, people explored new areas, and this helped diseases spread.

So, we're now dealing with the consequences of these actions, like urbanization (more people living in cities) and globalization (people and things moving around the world more easily). These factors have made it easier for diseases to spread.

More than half of the world's population now lives in cities, a significant increase from just 14 percent a century ago. In the next ten years, it's expected to rise to 65 percent. For most of the past 12,000 years, people coped with changes in the environment and the increasing risk of diseases that came with more crowded living conditions by leaving their settlements in search of better places. This led to more abandoned cities than inhabited ones.

Three generations ago, scientists warned that climate change and environmental disruptions would cause massive migrations. They were right. But by the second half of the 20th century, urbanization had changed the game. Instead of spreading out to new areas, humans started moving to fewer places. While urbanization had its advantages, it also became a trap, as we depended more on resources from outside. Many people today believe that highly technological cities are safe from disease outbreaks. However, alongside the benefits of city life come factors that make emerging diseases more likely. 

Firstly, modern cities rely on a constant flow of energy, water, and goods from outside. This high level of connection to a vast world with numerous pathogens is a risk.

Secondly, cities have high population densities and frequent human contact, which can lead to rapid disease spread once an outbreak starts.

Thirdly, cities with extreme division of labor and interdependency can be heavily impacted by disease if even a small part of the workforce gets sick.

Fourthly, large cities with green spaces can provide environments where animals carrying diseases thrive. This includes domestic animals like dogs and cats, as well as wild animals like raccoons and birds.

The cost of disease during urbanization isn't just about the number of people who die. It includes those who get sick and can't work, the resources spent on healthcare, the replacement of sick workers, lost productivity as parents care for sick children, and disrupted education as teachers and students fall ill. The same goes for diseases that affect plants and animals important to our economy.

Despite recognizing links between our lives and diseases, we kept moving into new areas, encountering unfamiliar germs and spreading diseases. Urbanization brought even more risks due to higher population density. We developed health-related technologies, but they often led to even more people living in cities. This made trade essential rather than a luxury, setting the stage for hyperconnectivity among human groups.

Urban areas handled the population density by creating complex trade networks, connecting cities to resources outside their borders. As cities grew, they needed more resources from farther away, and this gave rise to globalization. While true cities have been around for thousands of years, it's only in the last few thousand years that we've had the means to move people and goods worldwide. The recent development of rapid transportation and real-time communication has made the world a much smaller and faster place.

This technological progress has allowed us to create a vast amount of "fitness space" for ourselves, enabling us to move things faster and farther than ever before. However, it also makes us vulnerable in some ways. 

Every major shift in human civilization has brought new disease risks. We still encounter new germs when we move into new areas, and we still have known disease problems in our cities. Globalization amplifies these issues by introducing non-human hosts and their germs to new fitness spaces. It's not just humans moving into new areas; we're also bringing many species of plants, animals, and their diseases with us. This increases the likelihood of pandemics.

One might think that advanced cities can detect and prevent incoming pathogens through inspections and quarantine. While this is theoretically possible, it's costly in terms of time, money, and human resources, and it slows down trade. So far, the economic cost of slowing trade has outweighed the potential cost of a major disease outbreak. However, we don't need a deadly pathogen like the 1918 flu to disrupt us. Even a steady stream of less deadly pathogens can have a significant impact in a connected world. These diseases persist as "pathogen pollution," always ready to flare up. This is how the connectivity trap increases disease risk.

The COVID-19 pandemic serves as a significant example of how fragile our current economic structure and society can be when faced with a novel pathogen. Here's an in-depth exploration of how the pandemic highlighted this fragility:

Global Interconnectedness: The modern world is highly interconnected. Goods, services, and people travel globally at an unprecedented rate. While this interconnectedness has driven economic growth, it also creates pathways for the rapid spread of diseases. COVID-19 demonstrated how a virus can move from a single location to every corner of the globe in a matter of weeks.

Dependency on Global Supply Chains: Many economies depend on intricate global supply chains to function efficiently. When countries went into lockdown to curb the spread of the virus, supply chains were disrupted. This resulted in shortages of essential goods, such as medical supplies, electronics, and even food. Businesses relying on these supply chains faced severe disruptions, leading to economic losses and job cuts.

Urbanization and Population Density: The world has seen a significant shift towards urbanization. Cities are hubs of economic activity, but they also have high population densities. This concentration of people makes cities ideal breeding grounds for contagious diseases. COVID-19 spread rapidly in urban areas, overwhelming healthcare systems and putting immense pressure on essential services.

Healthcare System Vulnerabilities: The pandemic exposed vulnerabilities in healthcare systems worldwide. Many healthcare systems were ill-prepared to handle a sudden surge in patients requiring intensive care. Shortages of medical equipment, including ventilators and personal protective equipment, highlighted the need for better preparedness and resilience in the face of health crises.

Economic Disparities: COVID-19 disproportionately affected marginalized communities and individuals with lower socioeconomic status. These groups often lacked access to quality healthcare, faced job insecurity, and lived in crowded conditions, increasing their vulnerability to the virus. The pandemic underscored existing economic disparities and highlighted the need for social safety nets.

Travel and Tourism: The travel and tourism industry, a significant driver of economic growth in many countries, came to a virtual standstill during the pandemic. Lockdowns, border closures, and fears of infection drastically reduced travel, leading to job losses and economic turmoil in this sector.

Mental Health and Social Well-being: The pandemic took a toll on mental health and social well-being. Isolation, uncertainty, and fear contributed to rising mental health issues, including anxiety and depression. This, in turn, had economic implications as individuals struggled to maintain productivity and cope with the emotional toll.

Vaccine Distribution Challenges: The race to develop and distribute vaccines highlighted disparities in access. Wealthier countries secured vaccine supplies more quickly, leaving lower-income nations at a disadvantage. This raised ethical and economic concerns as the global recovery hinged on widespread vaccination.

Government Responses and Policies: Government responses to the pandemic varied widely. Some nations implemented strict lockdowns, while others adopted more relaxed approaches. These differences in strategy had economic consequences, affecting businesses, jobs, and public sentiment.

Throughout history, as civilization has advanced, the risk of diseases has increased. The progress we've made in various aspects of life, such as agriculture, urbanization, and globalization, has come with a downside—higher disease risk.

Our interconnected world allows diseases to spread rapidly from remote areas to densely populated cities. In today's globally connected and densely populated world, isolation is no longer an effective means of protection. Just like climate change and population growth, globalization creates links between previously separate environments. This interconnectedness encourages the spread of diseases. Climate change, population growth, and hyperconnectivity all contribute to a kind of expansion in the spread of diseases, and they amplify each other's effects. 

The increased risk of diseases is not only due to the challenges of overpopulation but also the concentrated populations in cities and the global interconnectedness. This combination creates a situation ripe for the emergence of Emerging Infectious Diseases (EIDs).


The Effects of Climate Change in Africa
Climate change affects human development mainly through extreme weather events that harm health. This is especially true in poor regions like sub-Saharan Africa, which is the world's poorest area and has a significant burden of disease. Africa has been experiencing more droughts, floods, storms, and changes in biodiversity, leading to health issues like malnutrition and infectious diseases.

Despite these challenges, global measures systems have not effectively addressed the health impacts of climate change. There's a lack of recognition that climate change and diseases like HIV/AIDS are interconnected issues.  

Countries often resist cooperating with external entities on health issues, seeing it as interference with their sovereignty. This tension between state responsibility and international accountability complicates global measures efforts to tackle climate change and health together.

To address these challenges, we need innovative approaches to global health measures that consider both national sovereignty and international cooperation. This is crucial in a world where health and climate change are interconnected. However, finding a balance between national interests and global concerns can be challenging.

Vulnerability to climate change impacts varies with socioeconomic factors and the health status of populations. Adaptation, which involves responding to climate change impacts, is crucial for reducing vulnerability. While international negotiations initially focused on mitigating greenhouse gas emissions, there's now more attention on adaptation in developing countries.

Creating an integrated global health measures system that respects health sovereignty and addresses climate change challenges can be approached from two perspectives. First, we need to consider the institutional structures of international organizations and how they impact decision-making. Second, we must focus on policy changes at both international and domestic levels to adapt to climate change's health risks. States play a significant role in reshaping global health measures to address these interconnected issues.

Effects of climate change in healthcare
Climate change has caused many disasters, especially in poorer regions, which have led to health emergencies. Climate-related events have influenced the spread of diseases due to changes in temperature and rainfall. These impacts on health can be immediate or long-term and affect people through various pathways:

1. Poverty and Inequality: The poorest people, often living in vulnerable areas like floodplains and slums, are the most affected by climate change. They lack resources to cope with the damage caused by climate-related disasters. Climate change exacerbates social inequalities and threatens health, particularly in sub-Saharan Africa.

2. Pattern and Burden of Disease: Rising temperatures and extreme weather events can directly and indirectly impact health and increase the burden of diseases. For example, malaria can spread to higher altitudes due to temperature changes, and diseases like dengue fever can become more widespread. Urbanization in developing countries can further contribute to the spread of diseases in densely populated areas.

3. Food Insecurity: Climate change affects food security and nutrition, especially in regions relying on rain-fed agriculture. Droughts and changing rainfall patterns disrupt food production, leading to malnutrition and food insecurity. Southern Africa, for instance, faces food shortages due to decreased rainfall.

Addressing these challenges requires considering equity and justice. Climate change disproportionately affects the world's poorest, who are least responsible for its causes. Achieving climate justice is vital, especially for Africa, which is on the frontline of climate change impacts.

To combat climate change's impact on food security, more equitable global food distribution is needed. Currently, a significant portion of the population in wealthy countries is over-nourished, while many in sub-Saharan Africa face under-nutrition. Equitable food distribution can alleviate global food crises and improve health outcomes for both undernourished individuals in poor countries and overfed populations in rich countries.

Climate change can force people to move from places where the climate has become inhospitable, like drought-stricken or flooded areas. This migration, especially in sub-Saharan Africa, can affect people's health. For instance, migrants and refugees are at a higher risk of contracting diseases like HIV because they might engage in unsafe activities to survive.

Climate change-related disasters can lead to loss of life and people leaving their homes. This can make it harder to provide healthcare and other essential services, especially during emergencies. This combination of health risks and reduced human resources can worsen poverty in already disadvantaged regions.

Population growth and migration will also increase competition for limited resources such as food, water, and land. Changes in temperature and rainfall have already caused water shortages in many places, which can lead to more competition for this vital resource, particularly affecting the poorest communities. Responding to climate change impacts might divert funds away from important development programs and basic services, undermining a country's ability to care for its citizens.

To address the health effects of climate change, a global measures framework is needed, involving cooperation between countries and international organizations. This framework should focus on policies to reduce carbon emissions, address climate-related health risks, and strengthen healthcare systems at the national level.

The health and climate change sectors have mostly worked separately in responding to the challenges posed by climate change and its impact on health. While both have recognized these challenges, there hasn't been much collaboration between them.

The health community, led by the World Health Organization (WHO), has acknowledged the link between climate and health since the 1990s. They have published reports and documents highlighting the potential health effects of climate change. In 2008, WHO even outlined five major health consequences of climate change. The World Health Assembly also issued a resolution in 2008 urging member states to take action to mitigate the health impacts of climate change.

Non-governmental organizations (NGOs), foundations, and public-private partnerships have also played a role in addressing climate-health issues. For example, the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies established a climate center to address health concerns related to climate change. The Global Fund to Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria identified climate change as a factor contributing to the spread of diseases like malaria. The Rockefeller Foundation supported initiatives focusing on climate change impacts, including health.

On the climate side, the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change (UNFCCC) recognized the climate-health connection early on. However, the recognition of this link has varied over the years, with a decline in recent times. While there have been some acknowledgments and discussions of climate's impact on health within the UNFCCC process, it has not been a central focus.

Despite the scientific evidence supporting the climate-health link, the UNFCCC process has not given it the attention it deserves. Even when the link has been recognized, it has had little impact on the negotiations and agreements within the UNFCCC. The Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) has consistently highlighted the connection between climate and health, but this hasn't led to as many changes as we might need in the UNFCCC's approach.

Both the health and climate change communities have acknowledged the climate-health link to some extent, but there has been limited collaboration and action to address this critical issue. 

How can we deal with the problem of arising infections caused by climate change?

Our usual approach to disease management is reactive rather than proactive. This approach, although understandable given our busy lives and priorities, is not sustainable in the long run.

The Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), known for assessing climate change impacts and adaptation strategies, previously indicated a lack of evidence to anticipate and prepare for climate change effects. This led us to primarily focus on reacting to events as they occurred.

On the other hand, when it comes to evolutionary processes, such as those described by Darwin, we have some ability to anticipate challenges. By studying the traits that enable pathogens to survive and spread, we can make predictions about how diseases might enter new areas, spread within those areas, and potentially move to other regions. This knowledge can empower us to prepare for and mitigate disease outbreaks in advance.

While we have achieved successes in managing diseases like smallpox and polio through vaccination, almost eradicating polio, and controlling animal diseases such as rinderpest and foot-and-mouth disease, challenges persist. These efforts often require substantial resources and provide temporary solutions.

To address emerging diseases effectively, we need to shift our focus from responding to outbreaks after they occur to implementing proactive measures that make better use of our resources. This shift is analogous to repairing and upgrading a bridge during a drought, as opposed to reacting after it collapses during a flood, causing harm.

Our approach should encompass diseases that may not yet be causing problems. Some diseases may have a delayed onset of symptoms or outbreaks when introduced to new locations or hosts. Detecting these diseases before they escalate can prevent or reduce outbreaks.

The DAMA plan emphasizes proactive management of emerging diseases and includes various strategies. Organizations like the Food and Agricultural Organization (FAO) and the World Organization for Animal Health (OIE) conduct comprehensive surveillance of animal diseases to aid in our response to emerging threats. The USDA's Plant Pathogens and Quarantine (PPQ) program employs risk-based assessments to contain the spread of plant pests and pathogens, contributing to food security.

This data helped predict how many zoonotic viruses are in mammals. They looked at both environmental and living factors that contribute to disease outbreaks. These factors include changes in the environment, transportation, trade, climate, and population density. The diversity of pathogens is linked to the variety of host species and climate conditions. The risk of transmission is higher in areas with dense populations, bushmeat consumption, and close proximity to livestock.

DAMA, designed for a changing world impacted by climate change, complements other disease prevention approaches. It targets less common but significant pathogens of various types through collaboration among field scientists, citizen scientists, and local educators. This collaborative approach aims to expedite and focus actions, utilizing similar technology and infrastructure to large-scale scientific projects.

Systematics, a branch of biology, establishes a consistent naming system for organisms, aiding in understanding their origins, history, location, and interactions. Accurate taxonomy is essential for diagnosing and treating diseases. However, there's a global shortage of taxonomists and reduced funding for taxonomic research, hindering effective disease management.

Advancements in technology enable the rapid and cost-effective collection of data about pathogens in specific locations. Taxonomists play a crucial role in identifying these pathogens correctly, crucial for disease management. Molecular taxonomy helps trace the origins of diseases, as seen in the case of monkeypox in Central Africa and the American Midwest. Recognizing these connections enhances protection through vaccinations.

Properly documenting biodiversity involves planning and funding for adapting data-collection equipment. Facilities like laboratories, collections, and databases are crucial. GBIF aids global information sharing for detecting emerging issues.

To address the EID crisis, DAMA combines traditional methods with genetic barcoding for species identification. Museums and taxonomists anchor molecular markers. Technology enables noninvasive sampling to identify host species and pathogens. Metagenomics identifies microorganisms and larger parasites.

Inventory efforts provide comprehensive data about potential pathogens, including characteristics, hosts, distribution, evolution, and natural history. These combine modern tech with conventional studies for big data and hyperconnected information.


Assessment and control of possible pathogens
While documenting biodiversity is essential for addressing the EID crisis, the DAMA protocol goes beyond collecting information. It aims to assess this information in the context of disease risk and turn these assessments into effective actions.

We need to assess the information we gather during our inventory efforts to prioritize our actions effectively in response to the Emerging Infectious Disease (EID) crisis. Given the urgency of the situation, we can't afford to spend too much time studying every single species in great detail to understand their impact on humans. Instead, we must make quick and focused assessments of the pathogen information we collect.

These assessments involve three key questions:

Have we found any species that are already known to cause diseases?
Have we encountered species closely related to known pathogens?
For the pathogens we're interested in, what are their reservoir hosts and where do they live?


Modern molecular taxonomy and powerful computers aid in identifying pathogens by matching inventory data with known pathogen data, potentially preventing outbreaks. Phylogenetics helps determine species' closest relatives, assessing risks based on historical ecological data. Understanding pathogens requires a focus on assessment, infrastructure, and activities. Valuable host and pathogen data, along with trained systematists, are essential. Infrastructure like taxonomy labs is needed, while activities involve tracking known pathogens and ecological changes.

Monitoring necessitates collaboration between citizens and specialists. Population geneticists and modeling experts play crucial roles. Existing infrastructure can be repurposed for monitoring, with technology facilitating citizen involvement. Coordination across society levels is key for effective monitoring and decision-making.

In addressing climate change and emerging diseases, proactive action is crucial. Tracking known pathogens and educating people on outbreak recognition are essential. Customized action plans should adapt to specific regions and needs.

Cooperation and neighborly support are vital in facing emerging diseases and climate change. Teaching action-taking skills requires specialists in public activism and education. This collaborative effort extends an environmental ethic to include biodiversity and health concerns.

Infrastructure support includes educational programs and facilities for documentation, assessment, and monitoring activities, fostering community engagement and government support.
Advances in biotechnology and artificial intelligence (AI) have ushered in a new era of climate risk reduction and mitigation, offering innovative solutions across various sectors, from climate modeling to public health. The convergence of these technologies holds immense potential for addressing the challenges posed by climate change and its far-reaching consequences.  

One of the key areas where biotechnology and AI are making a significant impact is in climate modeling and natural disaster prediction. Supercomputers, powered by AI algorithms, now have the capability to model complex climate patterns with greater accuracy. This progress enables more reliable forecasts of extreme weather events and natural disasters, providing governments with valuable tools for preparedness and risk mitigation.

Biotechnology and AI have also revolutionized environmental monitoring. AI-driven drones and advanced sensors can now provide real-time data on pollution levels, air and water quality, and greenhouse gas emissions. This wealth of information empowers authorities to take swift actions to protect public health and the environment.

In sectors like agriculture, forestry, and fisheries, AI technologies are optimizing the use of natural resources. By intelligently managing resource allocation, these innovations reduce the strain on delicate ecosystems, contributing to long-term sustainability and biodiversity preservation.

AI models are aiding in the design of climate-resilient infrastructure. This includes the development of improved drainage systems to combat flooding and the creation of energy-efficient buildings. Such infrastructure improvements play a crucial role in both climate adaptation and mitigation.

Biotechnology advancements and AI-driven analytics are enhancing public health responses to climate-induced threats. These technologies enable advanced monitoring and predictive modeling of health impacts related to climate change. They help identify vector-borne diseases, predict heatwaves, and assess diseases linked to air pollution.

AI-based models are becoming indispensable tools for governments crafting effective climate policies. These models offer valuable data and predictive scenarios, guiding evidence-based decision-making and allowing policymakers to anticipate the potential consequences of their choices.

In the global battle against mosquito-borne pathogens like malaria, biotechnology offers innovative solutions. This case study delves into the application of biotechnology to reduce the effects of pathogens through the use of genetically modified mosquitoes.

A great example of the use of biotechnology to reduce pathogen spread is the case of malaria. Mosquitoes, particularly the Anopheles species, are vectors responsible for transmitting deadly pathogens such as the Plasmodium parasite, which causes malaria in humans. Traditional mosquito control measures, including insecticides and bed nets, have had limited success in curbing disease transmission. Therefore, researchers turned to biotechnology to address this pressing health challenge.

One innovative approach is to create genetically modified mosquitoes that lose their capacity to reproduce effectively, thus reducing the overall mosquito population and subsequently decreasing disease transmission. Here's an explanation of how this method works:

To combat malaria and other mosquito-borne diseases, scientists primarily focus on a specific mosquito species known as Anopheles. This mosquito species is the primary vector responsible for transmitting the Plasmodium parasite, which causes malaria in humans. Before developing genetically modified mosquitoes, researchers study the reproductive biology of the target species. In the case of Anopheles mosquitoes, scientists identify specific genes and mechanisms involved in reproduction, such as those responsible for the development of eggs and sperm.

Using advanced genetic engineering techniques like CRISPR-Cas9, scientists modify the genes associated with mosquito reproduction. The goal is to disrupt or alter these genes in a way that impairs the mosquito's ability to reproduce successfully. One common approach is to create sterile male mosquitoes. These modified males are released into the wild to mate with wild female mosquitoes. Since the modified males are sterile, they produce no viable offspring, effectively reducing the mosquito population over time.

The release of genetically modified mosquitoes is typically conducted as part of carefully controlled field trials. Researchers closely monitor the mosquito population, disease transmission rates, and the impact of the modified mosquitoes on the ecosystem. As sterile male mosquitoes continue to mate with wild females, the mosquito population gradually declines. With fewer mosquitoes capable of transmitting the disease, there is a reduction in disease transmission rates.

Scientists also assess the environmental impact of releasing genetically modified mosquitoes. This includes studying the effects on other species that may interact with mosquitoes and the broader ecosystem. Successful implementation of this strategy requires community engagement and education. Local communities are informed about the purpose and safety of releasing modified mosquitoes.

The goal is not to eliminate all mosquitoes, as they play roles in ecosystems as pollinators and food sources for other species. Instead, the aim is to reduce the population of disease-carrying mosquitoes while minimizing the impact on other species. Even after successful reductions in disease transmission, long-term monitoring and maintenance of the mosquito population may be necessary to prevent disease resurgence.

It's important to note that genetically modified mosquito trials are carefully regulated and monitored to ensure their safety and effectiveness. While this approach holds promise in reducing the burden of diseases like malaria, ongoing research and collaboration between scientists, healthcare organizations, and local communities are essential to its success.

Education and Cooperation Are Essential
Enhancing the response to the escalating and evolving infectious diseases induced by climate change necessitates a multifaceted approach within health education. This approach should focus on several key aspects to mitigate the impact of these emerging health threats:

1. Climate Literacy: Health education programs should prioritize climate literacy to ensure that healthcare professionals and the general public understand the intricate connections between climate change and infectious diseases. This involves educating individuals about the mechanisms by which climate change influences disease patterns, such as altering vector distribution, increasing the frequency of extreme weather events, and affecting waterborne diseases. Climate literacy empowers individuals to recognize the health risks associated with climate change and motivates them to take preventive actions.

2. Interdisciplinary Training: Health education should adopt an interdisciplinary approach, fostering collaboration between healthcare practitioners, environmental scientists, and policymakers. This collaborative training equips healthcare professionals with a broader understanding of the environmental factors contributing to infectious disease emergence. It also enables them to engage in effective communication with policymakers to advocate for evidence-based climate adaptation strategies and public health interventions.

3. Surveillance and Early Warning Systems: Health education programs must emphasize the importance of surveillance and early warning systems for infectious diseases. This includes training healthcare workers to recognize unusual disease patterns that may arise due to climate change-induced shifts. Additionally, education should address the use of advanced data analytics and modeling techniques to predict disease outbreaks based on climate data, enabling proactive public health responses.

4. Community Engagement: Community-based health education initiatives are critical in mobilizing communities to respond to climate change-related infectious diseases. Health education should focus on community engagement strategies that empower individuals to protect themselves and their communities. This includes educating communities on vector control measures, safe water practices, and the importance of vaccination in the context of changing disease dynamics.

5. Policy Advocacy: Health education programs should equip healthcare professionals with the skills needed to engage in policy advocacy related to climate change and infectious diseases. This involves teaching advocacy techniques, such as communicating scientific evidence effectively to policymakers, collaborating with advocacy organizations, and participating in public health campaigns aimed at climate resilience and adaptation.

6. Research and Innovation: Encouraging research and innovation within health education is crucial for developing novel approaches to combat climate change-related infectious diseases. Educational programs should foster a culture of research, inspiring students and professionals to explore innovative solutions, such as the development of new vaccines, diagnostics, and treatment strategies tailored to evolving disease patterns.

Responding effectively to the increasing and evolving infectious diseases resulting from climate change necessitates a comprehensive approach within health education. This approach should encompass climate literacy, interdisciplinary collaboration, surveillance, community engagement, policy advocacy, and research to prepare healthcare professionals and communities to address these emerging health challenges proactively.

Figure: Source Climate Change Literacy in Africa (2021) Link. Climate change literacy rates across Africa a, Country-level rates of climate change literacy (that is, percentage of population that have heard about climate change and think that human activity is wholly or partly the cause of climate change) for 33 African countries. b, Percentage of survey respondents at the subnational level who are climate change literate. Dark grey regions had no surveyed respondents, while regions shaded in light grey had fewer than 30 respondents (n). c–e, Observed climate trends (1988–2018) at the location of each respondent for extremely hot months (c) heavy precipitation (number of months with rainfall > 90th percentile; d) and severe drought events (number of months per year of drought; e) (Methods and Supplementary Fig. 3). No change indicates a slope coefficient with a magnitude of less than 0.05. Significant increase or decrease indicates a significant trend (P < 0.05).


Figure: Source CCPI Ranking 2023 by New Climate Institute. Link
Proposal recommendations « the 10 commandments »
Pr Houda Filali

Here are some recommendations for holistic and collaborative strategies:

1.  Encourage African countries to form regional alliances and organisations that facilitate the sharing of knowledge, resources, and best practices. For instance, regional trade agreements can promote agricultural cooperation and food security.

2.  Invest in sustainable and climate-resilient agricultural practices. This includes promoting drought-resistant crops, efficient irrigation systems, and sustainable land management techniques. Collaborate with agricultural experts to develop and disseminate these practices.

3. Enhance healthcare infrastructure and training programs to prepare for health challenges exacerbated by climate change. Collaborate with international health organizations and experts to strengthen healthcare systems and address disease outbreaks.

4.  Promote research and development in biotechnology, particularly in crops that are adapted to local conditions and resilient to climate change impacts. Collaborate with biotech experts to develop and disseminate these technologies responsibly.

5. Develop regional and continental emergency response plans that can be activated in the event of natural disasters, disease outbreaks, or other climate-related crises. This includes stockpiling essential medical supplies and creating rapid response teams.

6. Establish innovation hubs or centers of excellence in various African countries. These hubs can bring together experts from diverse fields to brainstorm and develop innovative solutions to local challenges.

7.  Invest in education and capacity building programs to train the next generation of experts in agriculture, healthcare, and biotechnology. Encourage partnerships with universities and research institutions.

8. Engage in international collaborations and partnerships with organisations like the United Nations, World Health Organization, and international NGOs to access funding, expertise, and resources.

9.  Create platforms for sharing climate and health data among African nations and with international organisations. This can improve early warning systems and preparedness.

10. Advocate for policies that support sustainability, resilience, and adaptation to climate change at the national and regional levels. Collaborate with experts in policy and governance to drive positive change.

In addressing these challenges, it's important to prioritize the needs and aspirations of local communities and involve them in decision-making processes. This holistic approach, driven by collaboration and innovation, can help Africa build a more sustainable and resilient future in the face of climate change and health threats.
A Plan for Dealing with Emerging Diseases

Climate change impacts life on Earth, including disease-causing pathogens that affect humans, animals, and plants.

Emerging infectious diseases (EIDs) pose a global threat, with no safe havens. Factors like climate change, population growth, urbanization, and globalization increase this risk. We must recognize and address these challenges to prevent significant population reductions and disruptions in technology and urban areas.

Continuing with business as usual will lead to pandemics that can have regional or global consequences, affecting food supplies, triggering migration, straining resources, and causing conflicts. Urban areas with high populations would be most affected.

To secure our future, we need individual responsibility and collective action. We must balance the belief that change is possible with the recognition of the challenges. Even those who deny climate change share a hope for a better future, often vested in the potential of the next generation to innovate and solve problems.

Cooperation has been essential throughout human history when facing common threats. Climate change and emerging diseases require a collaborative approach. It's crucial for all concerned parties, from environmentalists to industrialists, to come together to protect technological humanity. Our children, growing up in a highly technological world, represent our hope for the future, and we must ensure their well-being. Collaboration, even between seemingly opposing groups, is necessary to address shared threats and pave the way for resolving other disagreements.


Climate change affects us all, transcending beliefs and uniting us as a species. Let's address it with humility and determination, working together to find effective solutions. Our survival throughout history has relied on cleverness, and now we must act wisely to tackle these challenges.

References

Respiratory Disease Series: Diagnostic Tools and Disease Management (2019)
The Theory of Evolution: Principles, Concepts, and Assumptions (2020)
Climate Change and Microbial Ecology: Current Research and Future Trends (2016)
Universal Health Coverage for Inclusive and Sustainable Development: A Synthesis of 11 Country Case Studies (2014)
A Short History of Medicine (2008)
The Stockholm Paradigm Climate Change and Emerging Disease (2019)
Climate Change and Health: Improving Resilience and Reducing Risks  (2016)
The DAMA Protocol, an Introduction: Finding Pathogens before They Find Us (2022)
Five decades of infectious diseases outbreaks in the African region (1970–2018) a geographic snapshot (2023)
Wikipedia (Overview of different evolution theories, and pathogen related data)
Climate Change, Policy and Security: State and Human Impacts (2018)
Apollo's Arrow (2020)
Human Security in Disease and Disaster (2021)
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC). Climate Change 2022: Impacts, Adaptation and Vulnerability. Contribution of Working Group II to the Sixth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change.
WHO annual reports on trends in healthcare in Africa.
United Nations Climate Change Annual Report (2022)
African Development Bank (AfDB), annual report (2022)
Climate Change Literacy in Africa Nature Climate Change (2021)
WMO State of the Climate in Africa 2022 (2023)
"Natural Disasters" ourworldindata.org. (2022)

